Authors
Murali Krishnan
Number of Reviews
79

Title
Review for Bringing Out the Dead (1999)
Cinematic storytelling often gravitates towards people in professions
that are inherently dramatic and stressful. That is why there are more
movies about police than about engineers. (Although in real life,
police work likely contains longer periods of tedious banality than
how it is portrayed on screen.) This film is about a profession that
is directly connected to disaster without being directly
involved--paramedics.
By definition, the job of a paramedic is frenetic and stressful. They
are always handling life and death situations in the aftermath of
disaster or tragedy. Any mistakes made can result in death, and
lingering guilt.
Frank Pierce (Nicolas Cage) is a veteran New York paramedic on the
verge of burnout. He is lacking an important quality required in his
profession-- detachment. Frank gets too involved with the people he
treats, and pays the price. The story begins with Frank coming to the
aid of an older man, Mr. Burke (Cullen O. Johnson), who suffered a
heart attack. Frank is able to revive him and take him to the
overburdened local hospital, but the man lingers in a suspended state
between life and death. The sympathetic Frank develops a relationship
with the man's daughter, Mary Burke (Patricia Arquette), who
frequently visits him.
Like the drugs that infest the neighborhood, Frank's job is the source
of his highs and his misery. He wants to quit, but never manages to do
so. The lingering state of suspended animation in which Mr. Burke
hovers symbolically represents Frank's state of mind. Although Frank
is effective at his job, he has become too involved and feels that his
best option may be to euthanize his career.
Veteran director Martin Scorcese presents dazzling visual images of
the surreal netherworld of the afterhours in New York City. The high
speed views of the ambulance coursing through the congested streets of
the city are mesmerizing. However, in terms of structuring the story,
the film is not as successful. The subplot of Noel (Marc Anthony), a
confused and unstable young man, is muddled and almost superfluous.
The character of Frank is well developed and well acted, but outside
him and his colorful partners, the other characters are not
compelling.
Recommended. The film is well directed, but unfocused. It dwells upon
its basic themes, and reiterates its ideas.

Title
Review for Butcher Boy, The (1997)
The Cuban Missile Crisis is a looming threat, and so is Francie Brady. We
see from the opening scene that Francie has done something bad, and the rest
of the story is told in flashback. Francie's childhood, a mentally unstable
mother and a drunk, often abusive father, is a recipe for disaster and there
is no mystery about how he will turn out. His irrepressible personality is
endearing as a small boy, but becomes menacing as he ages. As a boy, his
wild imagination is normal. What child does not pretend to be a larger than
life comic book hero fighting against the evil forces of a dastardly
villain? Francie's problems begin when the heroes and villains of the
imagination intermingle with the people in his real life, particularly as he
perceives loyalty and betrayal in his friends.
This film has many similarities with the 1995 release "The Young Poisoner's
Handbook" (which was a better film overall). As in that story, this film is
an exploration of the mind of a troubled young person, and the development
of a mentally disturbed criminal. There is no mystery in where Francie will
end up, so the interesting theme of the narrative is how he gets there.
Although the we know the symbolically present Cuban Missile Crisis will be
resolved favorably, we also know that Francie's story has more grim results.
The weakness of the film is the directionlessness in the first half. I
missed large parts of the dialog due to the strong Irish accents (this is
more of a shortcoming of my own rather than the film's) and as result I
could not tell if the parts of the story that I could not follow were my
fault or the film's. The second half of the film is stronger and is more
understandable since it closes the narative and remains focused.
The young newcomer Eamonn Owens has the bulk of the screen time and gives an
outstanding performance as Francie, and is able to give remarkable depth to
the character. Although Francie is often a bit of a bully, he is still a
charming boy with an irrepressible spirit. As time progresses we see fantasy
imaginations of childhood turn into the symptoms of psychosis, perhaps
schizophrenia.
Moderately Recommended. It can be difficult to follow because of the heavy
Irish accents and vernacular, coupled with some of the surreal aspects of
the presentation.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Dulce olor a muerte, Un (1998)
(Dialog in Spanish, English subtitles)
This film was released under the English title "A Sweet Scent of Death".
This film was screened at Cinequest 10, the San Jose film festival.
The rural countryside is often depicted as a serene realm with a
simple life. However, it can also be a complex place filled with love,
tragedy, honor, and deception. It can be a place where friends are
held exceptionally close, and outsiders are distrusted and avoided.
The story begins with the young Ramón (Diego Luna) opening the day at
his mother's general store. He is visited there by the object of his
affection, Adela, and he give her a gift of a bottle of perfume. She
is friendly and accepts it, but they clearly have not yet developed a
relationship. Her family is one of several newcomers to the area,
which are all considered outsiders to the town, and are warily
mistrusted by the longtime resident families.
A web of intrigue begins to emerge when Adela is found naked and
lifeless in an oat field. Being a newcomer, she is not immediately
recognized by the people. When Ramón appears on the scene, he tries to
give the corpse some dignity by covering her with his shirt. The
openly grieving Ramón is identified as her boyfriend, and although he
knows this falsely represents their relationship, he does not deny it.
Although the corrupt federale wants to quickly investigate the crime
(he suspects Ramón, as a jealous lover), the paternal sheriff Justino
(Hector Alterio) manages to keep the investigation a local affair.
Being the godfather of Ramón, he knows the boy well enough to feel
that he is innocent.
Most of the village's people pin the crime on "The Gypsy" (Karra
Elejalde), a shady vagabond who has many scattered lovers. The men of
the village encourage Ramón to avenge the death of his girlfriend by
seeking out "The Gypsy" and killing him. Ramón relishes the
recognition of Adela as his girlfriend, an accomplishment he was never
able to achieve, and he lets the attention sweep him into
self-delusion.
The film is a complex story with many dimensions, whose many parts
construct a single portrait. The many different components are
effectively explored without dwelling on any single aspect. Although
parts of the story drag for too long, there still remain several
colorful and engaging facets that keep the film enjoyable. This is
clearly a film about this particular culture, the themes of honor and
revenge can seem alien and jarring to viewers from other cultures. In
the end, the primary mystery is solved, but the primary satisfaction
is not the closure of this thread, but the overall portrait that was
painted.
Recommended. This is a multifaceted film, whose primary mystery is
perhaps not its most interesting aspect. It weaves a tapestry of the
many dimensions of life in rural Mexico.

Title
Review for Map of the World, A (1999)
Facing extraordinary challenges or circumstances can define a person's
character. When an individual undergoes a trial by fire, they are
either destroyed or else they gain the ability to view themselves from
a pragmatic perspective. This film is an adaptation of a novel by Jane
Hamilton in which a woman is forced to cope with potentially
destructive challenges.
The story is primarily an examination of its main character, Alice
Goodwin (Sigourney Weaver). Her husband Howard (David Strathairn)
desires to be a farmer, so she has to deal with the many difficulties
of being a farm wife. The elder of her two daughters is at an age
where she is sometimes bratty and resentful of her mother. Her job as
a school nurse can be a minefield of uncooperative children and
negligent parents. Still, all these are merely minor inconveniences,
and the couple manage to enjoy their life. They are especially close
to their neighbors, Theresa (Julianne Moore) and Dan Collins (Ron
Lea), who have two daughters of a similar age, that are ideal
playmates for the Goodwins' girls.
The whole balance of life is disrupted when the younger Collins
daughter accidentally drowns while visiting the Goodwins' farm. As to
be expected, this wrenching tragedy unleashes a flood of emotions in
all the people involved. Dan and Theresa are devastated at their loss,
but Alice is even more debilitated by self-blame and grief.
At this point the film has a well constructed premise and it has
salient issues to explore. A small mental lapse can lead to grave
twist of fate. A web of smooth, established relationships can be
shattered in an instant by unexpected complications. Tragedy and grief
are sometimes unexpectedly injected into lives and those involved are
thrust into an uphill battle to recover. Just when these themes are
being addressed, the situation becomes even worse. Suddenly, sexual
molestation charges are brought against Alice by a mother of a young
school boy. Alice suddenly finds herself in jail and facing criminal
charges.
The film then enters two more extended acts, one where Alice is
isolated from her family and must deal with life behind bars, and then
a courtroom drama as she must defend herself against the sensational
claims. Although these additional developments may have been plausible
in the source novel, it is simply not possible to force this much
material into the restricted format of a feature film and expect all
facets of the issues to be adequately addressed. The story continues
to raise serious issues, such as the presumed guilt of people accused
of violence against children, and the abuse a community can dump on
the accused. However, each successive plague that is visited upon the
main character only detracts from the meaningfulness of the story.
To its credit, the story does not attempt to resolve all issues with a
saccharine ending. Clearly, the film is striving to present believable
characters in engaging, thoughtful situations. The film could have
done more emotionally if had done less narratively.
The screenplay is the only detriment to the film. Veteran actors
Weaver, Strathairn, and Moore, breathe life into deep characters.
Weaver is presented with the challenge of a prominent, charged
character, and she manages to keep it subdued even when it is being
inflated by the script.
Marginally recommended. This is an ambitious film that attempts to
address many deep issues. However, by taking on such a broad scope, it
fails to address each of its dimensions adequately. It encompasses
more issues than can be accommodated within the limits of a feature
film, and therefore can feel long and tedious. The acting is capable,
and the direction makes the most of the flawed script, so the end
result is a competent, but not completely successful, film.

Title
Review for Happiness (1998)
The title of this film might be initially misleading. It is not a happy
story, but rather, happiness is missing from the lives of most of the
characters. The story is based around three sisters, Trish, Helen, and Joy.
Also involved are their parents, Mona and Lenny, plus Helen's neighbor
Allen.
Trish, the eldest, is married to a successful therapist, Bill. While Bill is
a good husband and a caring father, he is a very disturbed individual, and
has hidden his destructive problem from everyone. Helen is a successful
writer who often feels inadequate, and that perhaps she is a pretentious
fraud. Joy is the youngest, and her family always thought she might not
amount to anything. It appears they were right because Joy is approaching
30, is lonely and single, has no career, and is sweet but generally
unfocused. After many years of marriage, Lenny no longer has feelings for
Mona (or anything for that matter) and wants to live alone. Allen is a
technical professional with no self-esteem. He is neither attractive
physically nor in terms of his personality. He is socially inept, and his
only relationship with women is making obscene phone calls.
Director Todd Solondz brilliantly guides the many intertwined stories
through difficult material. It would have been very easy to let all the
misery bloat the characters into cartoonish caricatures, but this never
happens. Instead, each character is carefully crafted and developed with the
exception of Helen, who is not well realized. Although it is not really a
thriller, an amazing amount of tension is produced by slowly unravelling the
layers of each character. The film runs a long 134 minutes because of the
amount of screen time given all the characters. However, the length is not
tedious because although the characters are often extreme in their
depravity, the progression of the story is never predictable. For example,
when Joy begins a relationship with a refugee student, it is not clear if he
will turn out to be genuine, or a scoundrel as some of the other characters
are presented.
Highly Recommended. This is an engaging character drama with frequent
episodes of black comedy. However, this is a very difficult film to watch.
Many disturbing issues are dealt with in a frank manner, and people who
would not be comfortable with the strong (perverse) sexual content should
avoid this film.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Election (1999)
Most people who have attended a typical American high school will
agree that few events are as inconsequential as the student election.
The only people who really care are the ones who are running for
office, and that because they want to make themselves appear
well-rounded when applying to college. When people take the election
seriously, as in this film, the politics can be intriguing and darkly
humorous.
This year's student council presidential election initially appears to
be uneventful, because the only person on the ballot is Tracy Flick
(Reese Witherspoon). Not too many people have much interest in the
election, but Tracy is not a typical student. She is highly serious,
motivated, and driven. Tracy takes everything so seriously that she
does not appear to have a clear view of reality. Everything she sees
is distorted by her overachiever's view of the world, where people are
either allies or rivals.
Tracy is well known and appreciated by the faculty, because she is
enthusiastic and involved. However, Tracy has an unusual relationship
with Jim McAllister (Matthew Broderick), the history teacher.
Underneath the surface of their unremarkable teacher/pupil
relationship, they have a source of tension. Besides simply being
annoyed by Tracy's overambitious demeanor, Jim also holds her
responsible for the breakup of a friend's marriage and the destruction
of his career. It so happens that Tracy had an affair with a teacher,
a close friend of Jim, which ultimately led to his dismissal although
the details of the case never became public. While it may initially
appear that there will be a struggle between the obsessive, ruthless
Tracy and her wiser, principled teacher, Jim is shown to be a more
ambiguous character. A glaring discrepency exists between Jim's
lectures on morals and ethics, and how he implements those principles
in his personal life.
The story takes an unconventional approach by making neither of the
main characters likable. Tracy is cloyingly perky, annoying in her
desire to wield power when she can, ruthless and willing to step on
others in the pursuit of her own goals. Credit must be given to the
screenplay and to Witherspoon for bringing to life such a
multi-layered character. Witherspoon deftly keeps Tracy between being
too cute, and also keeps her from becoming simply malicious. Although
Tracy might not be a likable character, she is not as disagreeable as
Jim. While Jim is initially an involved and clearly inspiring teacher,
significant flaws in his character soon emerge. Jim's desires
eventually drive him to become as ruthless and selfish as Tracy.
The thought that Tracy will easily get what she wants, in terms of
becoming the President of the student counsel, bothers Jim. He decides
to encourage the injured football player, Paul Metzler (Chris Klein),
to also run for president. While Paul does not have the drive and
ambition of Tracy, he is a star athlete and a popular student, so
Tracy perceives a sudden threat to her desires.
The story ambitiously adds another dimension when Paul's sister Tammy
(Jessica Campbell) decides to run to spite her brother for a
transgression he is clueless about. Tammy runs on the platform of
apathy, saying that if she is elected she will do nothing, and this
strikes a chord with a large part of the student body. The election
will mean nothing to most students, but it will be cut-throat for a
few involved, and will suck in Jim also.
The film is note worthy in the number of characters it develops and
the number of subplots it connects. However, it could have done more
with the unidimensional Paul. Also, Paul's girlfriend Lisa (Frankie
Ingrassia), is given significant screen time, but is never developed
beyond existing as a plot device. The remaining characters, however,
are all substantially examined and presented believably. The story has
one glaring weaknesses, a key development that was a conveniently
sloppy mistake, where the offending character will obviously be
caught. However, the story as a whole is original and engaging.
Because the characters are given so many directions, it is not easy to
predict which direction the story will travel. At times the plot has
suspense and intrigue, and it is consistently filled with black humor.
Highly recommended. This is an entertaining film which strikes a
balance between comedy and drama. It strives to present complete
characters, and even succeeds in using main characters that are
identifyable, but not likable. The plot is engaging, and although it
telegraphs some key events, it still remains engrossing.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Girl Next Door, The (1999/II)
The world of adult films is a compelling subject for a documentary
film. It is a topic that many people are aware of, but not in much
detail. It has a sordid nature that draws prurient interest, but it is
also yet another human endeavor, with the same banality as other
occupations.
Rather that examining the porn industry directly, this film by veteran
documentary filmmaker Christine Fugate follows the career of one
particular individual, adult film star Stacy Valentine. The film
follows Stacy for several years and focuses primarily on her personal
life, which is also highly influenced by her professional life.
As the film begins, Stacy is an established presence in the adult film
world. Stacy gives a first person account of how she entered the
business. She relates that her husband at the time encouraged her to
send nude photos to a magazine. Upon winning an amateur contest, she
progressed to doing professional magazine layouts, and then to
starring in films. The professional success and financial foundation
that came from these first forays into the business gave her the
confidence to leave her controlling husband and move to Hollywood to
pursue a full-time career as a porn star.
The film then follows Stacy as she builds her career. In detailing her
professional life, the film follows her on some actual shoots of her
films, as well as following her self-promotion as she attends adult
film conventions, industry awards, and even a trip to Cannes. Also
chronicled is the regular maintenance that must be performed to keep
up to date for her job, like going to tanning salons and having
various types of plastic surgery performed. The film follows her
personal life as she travels back to Oklahoma to visit her mother, and
as she tries to develop a relationship with her boyfriend, Julian.
The primary flaw with the film is that it lacks a clear vision for its
subject. It follows Stacy for too narrow a period of time to make a
clear point. The strength of the film is that it skillfully balances
both the lurid and mundane aspects of its source material. When
dealing with a sensational topic like this, it is easy for a film to
focus on the sordid details and lose sight of its main subject. The
primary focus of the film is on Stacy as an individual, and a
secondary portrait of the adult film industry can be extrapolated. The
film cannot avoid containing a significant amount of frank sexual
imagery, but it tries to keep the clinical, professional perspective
in which it was produced. The most objectionable imagery may be the
detailed coverage of Stacy's many plastic surgeries.
The film is successfully able to humanize Stacy. Her reasons for
choosing her profession are an odd mix of security and insecurity. She
is totally comfortable with sex and her sexuality, but she feels that
sex is the only thing she is good at. She likes the financial rewards
of her job because it gives her total independence, which is important
because she does not want to be dependent on a man for security.
Ultimately, Stacy feels the same types of personal and professional
pressures as most people, but her world is totally alien compared to
that which most people inhabit.
Recommended. Although the film lacks enough focus to be completely
engaging, it competently outlines its subject. It shows the ways that
individuals who are part of the adult film business deal with career
related problems like everyone else, and also presents some of the
obstacles particular with that line of work. Because of its subject,
the film necessarily contains a large amount of nudity and sexual
content.

Title
Review for Everest (1998)
The latest Imax production is a documentary following three climbers in
their pursuit of the world's highest peak. One member, Ed Viesturs, is an
Everest veteran, but the other two, Spaniard Araceli Segarra and Nepali
Jamling Norgay (whose father Tenzing Norgay was the partner of Sir Edmund
Hillary in the first successful scaling of the summit) are making the
attempt for the first time.
The main draw of this film is the spectacular scenery of the beautiful but
deadly Himalaya. Often grand, sweeping shots of the mountainside are shown,
with the sense of scale unapparent until the tiny outline of the climbers
and their tents appears. The crew was making their attempt immediately
following the infamous group that was caught in sudden storm, with several
members losing their lives. The story of the ill-fated expedition provides
much of the tension and drama, and serves as a reminder that even this group
of experts are risking their lives.
The only real criticism of the film is that the static, panoramic views of
the Himalaya are not the best use of the Imax format. I personally enjoy the
more dynamic scenes, such as a helicopter winding through a river valley,
that capitalize on the full range of view that is the hallmark of the Imax
format. In fact, I enjoyed the short scenes of Viesturs and his fiancee
biking through a Utah national park (filmed from a helicopter) and of
Segarra rock-climbing, as much as the remainder of the Everest scenes. There
is also some wasted (in the sense that the Imax format did not contribute)
time detailing Norgay's desires to follow the accomplishments of his father,
in an attempt to construct a narrative for the story.
Recommended. This may not be the best in the Imax series, but certainly is
enjoyable. Everyone who likes Imax films will also enjoy this one.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Mahanagar (1963)
This film is also known by the English title "The Big City".
In most ways, the Mazumdar family is a typical, traditional Indian
family. Subrata (Anil Chatterjee) is the head of the family and the
breadwinner, while his wife Arati (Madhabi Mukherjee) keeps
everything in order at home. Besides their two children, Subrata's
parents also live with them. That make quite a few people to support
on a single income, and Subrata's job as a bank clerk does not
always provide everything the extended family needs. Because they
live in Calcutta, a large modern city, they have the option of
getting a second income if Arati was to also join the workforce.
This choice is too tempting, so that is what they decide.
The Mazumdars live in a place and time where it is becoming
acceptable for women to work, but the idea does not sit well
with everyone. Initially, only Subrata is in favor of Arati
working because he know how badly the family needs the money.
Subrata's father, Priyogopal (Haren Chatterjee), is especially
opposed to Arati pursuing a career. The retired school headmaster
thinks it is undignified for women to work, yet he hypocritically
visits his successful students and begs favors from them.
Arati is initially unsure of the new world she has entered, and
she must learn how to be a door-to-door sales representative. Her
dedication and determination pay off as she becomes rather
successful, and a favorite of her boss. The extra money she brings
the family noticeably boosts their standard of living. The family
members are more accepting of her career now that they have access
to material comforts that they previously did without.
The story is set (and was filmed) in a time when it was still
uncommon for women to work outside the home. The practice was just
becoming acceptable in modern urban India. What may seem commonplace
by the standards of today, was more exceptional at the time the film
was made.
With this film, Satyajit Ray has crafted another good film. The
story is engaging and the viewer gets closely involved in the story
of the Mazumdar family. However, it does not reach the high
standards set by many of his other works. The problem is not that
the film is flawed in what it attempts, but rather it does not make
much of a statement beyond the narrative. The plot tells a story in
a single dimension, and does not contain much symbolism or
allegory. It is an enjoyable film, but it is not engaging.
Recommended. This is a well-made and realistic film. However, it
does not deliver much more than the surface level story, and as a
result is not as profound as other Satyajit Ray works.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Three Seasons (1999)
(Dialog in Vietnamese, English subtitles)
The climate of Vietnam passes through three seasons, and just as the
seasons endlessly disappear and return, so to the human spirit cycles
through periods of loss and redemption. This sentimental film follows
the parallel stories of several characters in Vietnam and details the
similar journeys of the different people.
The narrative is comprised of several distinct, and occasionally
intersecting stories. The first consists of a young woman who joins
the employ of a scholarly leper who raises and sells lotus flowers.
Another follows a former American Marine (Harvey Keitel) who has
returned to search for a daughter he abandoned years ago. Another
follows a young urchin who ekes a living by peddling trinkets. Another
presents a cyclo (cycle rickshaw driver) who yearns for a young woman
apparently unavailable to him.
The common element to the stories is that they all embody loss and
rejection. The Marine and the urchin depict people coping with loss,
and the flower seller and the cyclo embody the power of redemption.
The narrative deftly cycles between the subplots, and tempers the
drama of each with the context switches. The characters are well
drawn. It is obvious that they all have a past, but exactly what it is
is implied, and left as an exercise for the viewer. This is the
antithesis of formulaic filmmaking, where the story overexposes its
character to make up for a lack of depth.
When presenting a story with such weighty themes, a weak film will get
bogged down by melodrama. Filmmaker Tony Bui avoids this trap by not
overstating the emotions that are presented. The actions and events
are neither extreme nor manipulative. The film successfully uses
subtlety and symbolism to craft a moving story.
The film is both well written and well acted. Its only real flaw is
that at times it relies on stereotypical characters, and one cliche
relationship. However, it generally avoids convenient resolutions, and
thus remains an enjoyable film.
Recommended. This is a slow, sentimental film that is captivating. The
beautiful cinematography captures the oppressive heat, the drenching
rain, and natural beauty of Vietnam. Its symbolic stories also reflect
the power of the human soul, and its ability to persevere. Although it
has shortcomings, it is a moving and pleasant film.

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
The use of spirits and ghosts in stories has existed in ancient
folklore and continues in modern literature. It is a topic that is
inherently interesting to some people, and automatically
disinteresting to others. The stories involving non-material spirits
often presume their actual existence, which turns off those who do not
believe in them. When they are used for horror effect, which is one of
their most common uses, it creates an uninteresting experience for
non-believers.
This film is a rare instance of a ghost story which is engaging even
for viewers who do not believe in the existence of ghosts. The story
centers around the relationship between two primary characters,
Malcolm Crowe (Bruce Willis) and Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osment).
Malcolm is an expert child psychiatrist who is haunted by a past
incident when a disturbed ex-patient shot him. The young man was upset
that Malcolm was not able to solve his problems so he attacked the
doctor, and Malcolm feels guilty at not being able to help the
desperate man. After some time, he eventually decides to take on the
case of Cole, a child who shows similar symptoms to his assailant.
Malcolm feels that his will give him a chance to redeem his
shortcomings that lead to his assault.
Cole claims to see the ghosts of dead people. His single mother, Lynn
Sear (Toni Collette), has previously taken him to doctors who could
not help him. She struggles to help Cole lead a normal life, but the
meek boy is harassed mercilessly by schoolmates because of his
peculiarities. Cole is initially wary of Malcolm, but Malcolm gently
works to win Cole's trust.
The film is successful for two reasons. First, it is a simple and
cleverly crafted story. Second, its use of spirits is ancillary. This
is foremost a story about the relationship between Malcolm and Cole.
If that aspect had not been adequately developed, the film could not
have been successful. Although the use of ghosts may appear to be a
gimmick, it must be noted that the story also contains other
dimensions that are carefully and successfully constructed.
Good performances are given by both Willis and Osment, but the prime
credit for the film's success should be given to M. Night Shyamalan,
who both wrote and directed it. The strength of the film is the story,
and the direction skillfully executes it. The main complaint may be
that the languid narrative becomes slow at times, and it even drags
before the climax.
Highly recommended. This film is the rare case of a ghost story that
has appeal to viewers who generally dislike that genre. It is anchored
by a strong story and is supported by capable directing and good
acting.

Title
Review for Devi (1960)
(Dialog in Bengali, English subtitles)
This film is also known by the English title "The Goddess".
Religious devotion can be a double-edged sword. Kalikinkar (Chhabi
Biswas) is a widower whose two sons and their families live with
him. His younger son, Umaprasad (Soumitra Chatterjee), is away at
college, but Umaprasad's young wife, Doyamoyee (Sharmila Tagore),
remains at home. Doyamoyee is well liked by everyone, especially
Kalikinkar, who appreciates the efforts she goes through to attend
to his needs. Kalikinkar has spent years in fervent devotion to the
mother goddess Kali, and it is his main solace in his old age. The
balance of the household is disturbed when Kalikinkar suddenly
receives a vision that his daughter-in-law is an incarnation of
Kali. Kalikinkar replaces the stone idol in the prayer room with
Doyamoyee, and she spends practically the entire day sitting as the
object of extended worship sessions which attract people from the
local area who also start believing Kalikinkar's vision.
Not everyone is convinced of Doyamoyee's holiness. The rational
Umaprasad is horrified when he discovers what has happened, because
he know that Doyamoyee will not protest the wishes of his father
and will allow herself to be imprisoned by her respected elders.
Umaprasad's older brother, Taraprasad (Purnendu Mukherjee), goes
along mainly because he always agrees with his father. Taraprasad's
wife, Harasundari (Karuna Bannerjee), is not educated like Umaprasad,
but like him she does not understand how people can come to such
a fantastic conclusion based on the whim of one man.
This story by Prabhat Mukherjee deals with a topic that is universal
to the human condition. It describes events that occur in India, as
well as in other parts of the world within different faiths. Strong
faith, which can be a crutch to the weak, has the danger of being
destructive when it eclipses rationality. Human beings, in the grip
of devotion, will often see reality as they want to see it. They
will interpret coincidences as convenient proofs of their delusional
charade. Although they may be well-intentioned, their actions can
trigger grave consequences.
Satyajit Ray effectively presents the goddess in her duality. On
one hand she is a benevolent mother figure depicted as the smiling,
fair-skinned Durga who brings comfort to her followers. On the
other, she is a fierce and destructive force, depicted as the pitch
black Kali wearing a necklace of skulls, which can destroy those who
come too close to her. By mixing the various images of the goddess
with the cautionary story, Ray is able to show the thin line between
security and obsessiveness that is straddled by faith.
Although the film is well crafted and the story is meaningful, the
main criticism is that the point made is obvious and is not quite
enough to sustain a full feature film. The problem is not that the
film does anything wrong, but rather, it does not cover enough
ground. The main assertion of the story is of the dangers of blind
faith, how it will consume those who are obsessed, and how it will
be mitigated by rationality. In taking such an patent stance, the
film misses making a salient statement.
Tagore gives an excellent performance as Doyamoyee, who is the
only character with depth. Because she is exceptionally loving
and generous as the young bride, it is easy to understand why
she is so adored. She is bewildered but compliant as the object
of worship. She is initially doubtful of her holiness, but she
wishes to go along with what is asked of her, so her young mind
is willing to accept the indulgence. Although Chatterjee and Biswas
give believable performances as Umaprasad and Kalikinkar, those
characters are narrowly drawn and never progress beyond the expected
character types.
Recommended. This film tells a powerful story, but it is simple in
ocus. It is well crafted and engrossingly intense, but the direction
in which it travels is never beyond what would be expected.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Cleopatra's Second Husband (1998)
Retrospective: Cleopatra's Second Husband (1998)
In any abusive relationship, the two involved parties usually fall
into the clearly defined roles of abuser and victim. These are most
commonly associated with the abusive husband/abused wife scenario, but
aspects of these archetypes can be found in any human relationship
where one person exerts control over the other. This film is a study
of the dynamics of such a relationship.
The story begins with Robert Marrs (Paul Hipp) and his wife, Hallie
(Bitty Schram), leaving for a vacation. Needing someone to look after
their house while they are away, they decide to let friend-of-a-friend
Zack (Boyd Kestner) housesit, along with his girlfriend, Sophie (Radha
Mitchell). The Marrs' relationship is not outwardly fragile, but it
has grown strained, exacerbated by the couple's inability to conceive
a child.
Upon returning early from the vacation, Robert and Hallie discover
that although the house has been adequately taken care of, their
guests have not been completely conscientious. For example, the
tropical fish have died from lack of care. Although Robert wants to
get rid of Zack and Sophie, Hallie is more forgiving, and she is
sympathetic to their inability to find a place to live (they have just
moved to the area), so she invites them to stay with them temporarily.
She quickly regrets the decision as their intrusions provide the
catalyst that deteriorates her relationship with Robert. When Hallie
leaves, Robert allows Zack and Sophie to remain. Eventually, the
relationship between Robert and Zack slowly evolves into victim and
abuser, respectively. The decay is slow, and by the time that Zack
realizes what has happened, he has no power to change the
relationship.
The story is necessarily disturbing, as the viewer helplessly watches
Robert slowly sink into the morass of Zach's manipulative personality.
By intentionally adopting a pace that is slow and a mood that is dark,
the film incarcerates the viewer in Robert's shrinking world. Robert
would not have chosen to enter the psychological prison that his
relationship with Zach becomes, but he is oblivious to the slow
progression.
The acting performances must be noted for their skillful execution.
The role of Zach required Kestner to expose the personality of the
character over time, and he adeptly executes this without allowing
Zach to balloon into a caricature. The role of Robert entails very
subtle challenges. Hipp needed to communicate the laconic Robert's
reasons for entering the relationship with Zach. With the exception of
the garrulous Hallie, the characters are expressed in an atmosphere of
minimal dialog. Without the benefit of having the characters verbally
express their inner thoughts, the actors need to have them
communicated through physical expression. This also indicates that
writer and director Jon Reiss was willing to work hard to express the
story without taking convenient shortcuts. Add in the fact that Reiss
needed to have the audience relate to characters that are not
particularly likeable, and it is clear that the film was carefully
constructed and proficiently executed.
The meaning of the title is not apparent in the film's story, and one
must credit the director for not spoonfeeding it to the viewers. It is
a reference to the relationship between Cleopatra and Marc Anthony in
the 1963 Hollywood film production Cleopatra.
Recommended. The film is a noir psychological thriller. It is engaging
enough to keep viewers involved in the slow progression of the story.
The depiction of degradation in the abusive relationship is
disturbing, but because of director Jon Reiss' focus, they do not feel
licentious.
--0-1189641421-966401586=:27754--

Title
Review for Chicken Run (2000)
The escape film is a standard genre which has been employed throughout
motion picture history. Its inherent tension and suspense provide a
natural framework on which to build a gripping story, and this has
been done so often that it is difficult to create anything original
within that genre. However, being such a stalwart formula also makes
it a ripe target for parody, and this film does that by replacing all
the standard human characters with primarily chickens.
The film is an animated feature made by a process of stop motion
animation with clay figures - "claymation", a specialization of
Aardman Production, which produced this film. It is written and
directed by Nick Park (who is known for his claymation shorts Wallace
and Grommit) and Peter Lord. This technique has been in existence
since the early days of film, but has become rare since the
development of less labor intensive special effects, notably computer
generated imagery.
The story takes place at the Tweedy chicken farm, where the resident
chickens (all hens save for one aged rooster) are held captive. They
are constantly searching for a way to escape the unpleasant conditions
at the farm, where they must keep up their egg production quotas or
literally get the axe. They make many attempts to escape, led by
natural leader Ginger (Julia Sawalha), but never meet with any
success. One day they see Rocky the Rooster (Mel Gibson) fly overhead
and accidentally crash into their fenced compound. In Rocky, they see
someone who could teach them to fly, and thus give them a means to
escape the farm and reach a sanctuary to live a life of freedom.
Although a grim storyline is the basis of the plot, this is actually a
funny and entertaining film. Their enclosure is portrayed as the
common prisoner of war camp of film, and all the components of that
genre are expressed - clandestine meetings, contrived escape plans,
close camaraderie from shared hardship, and a barter economy with
black market traders (in this case, Cockney rats).
Although it may appear derivative, the story goes to such great detail
to anthropomorphize the chickens, that it feels that the genre itself
is the aspect being manipulated to fit the plot. When a formulaic
storyline is used as a shortcut for original, writing, it is dreary.
When it is used as a basis for a genre spoof, it can be the outlet for
intelligent humor. Discerning viewers will notice the multiple layers
employed by the film, and will be impressed by the challenges that the
film sets and meets.
The film is constructed to have appeal for all viewers. It does not
euphemize death and killing for its younger audience, but it also does
not present intentionally disturbing images. For younger viewers, the
film provides colorful characters, typical cartoon action sequences,
and limited musical sequences. For adult viewers, it provides clever
one-liners, caricatures of stereotypical characters, and subtle
references to classic films.
Highly recommended. This film uses a standard storyline to great
effect. It is a simple, common structure that can be followed by
children, and it is also a target for parody that will entertain adult
viewers. It is consistently humorous, entertaining, and clever, and
thus has appeal for a wide audience.

Title
Review for Cookie's Fortune (1999)
The nature of small town life in the American South is the topic of
this film by established director, Robert Altman. This film follows a
traditional narrative, rather than having a ensemble style of earlier
Altman works, such as Nashville or Ready to Wear, but in typical
Altman fashion, the characters are given surprising depth considering
the number that are presented.
The oldest living member of the Orcutt family is Jewel Mae "Cookie"
Orcutt (Patricia Neal). She is a widow living alone and missing her
beloved husband. Her primary company is close friend Willis Richland
(Charles Dutton), who acts as the caretaker of Cookie's estate, which
mainly consists of a stately home and its possessions. Cookie's
closest family in town are her two nieces, Camille Orcutt (Glenn
Close) and Cora Duvall (Julianne Moore). The eccentric Camille is
director of the Easter play that the small town in putting on, in
which the dim-witted Cora is playing the lead. In the play as in real
life, Cora always taking orders from her bossy sister Camille. Cora's
daughter, Emma Duvall (Liv Tyler), has recently return to town.
Although she has a strong attachment to her friend Willis and her
lover, police officer Jason Brown (Chris O'Donnell), she does not get
along with either her mother or her aunt, who disapprove of the
spirited young woman's lifestyle and disregard for decorum. Life in
the small town is quiet until Cookie's death. Although the frail old
woman was longing to rejoin her departed husband, her departure
resembles a murder scene.
Fishing a recurring theme, as it symbolizes the tranquillity of the
small town and the camaraderie it fosters between people. When people
fish together, the long quiet times together build a bond of trust.
This is why one of the deputies, Lester (Ned Beatty), is sure his
fishing buddy Willis is innocent, even though the circumstantial
evidence initially makes him the prime suspect in Cookie's death.
The languid pace of southern life pervades even the murder
investigation. Although all initial evidence incriminates Willis, no
one really believes he is involved. In such a small, interconnected
society, people understand the character and motivations of others.
Indeed, even as he is being held in jail, Willis is surrounded by his
friends and lives a comfortable existence until the investigation
finally unravels the truth.
Altman extracts strong performances from the cast, except from Close,
who goes too far. Camille is an exaggerated and exceedingly annoying
character. Given the narrowness of her character, she is given too
much screen time. Dutton and Tyler are strong as the other main
characters who are given enough time to develop.
The narrative becomes weak when the uninspired theme of just desserts
and racial politics is presented. This part of the story is annoying
because it is unnecessary. The interesting components are the variety
of characters and their relationships. The criminal act and
investigation give a skeleton on which to build a story, but too much
importance is given to this component alone.
Recommended. As usual, Robert Altman uses a composite of many
characters to draw a larger picture, capturing the flavor of the
locale. The writing is capable when it is developing the characters,
but sags when it becomes somewhat preachy. The acting is generally
strong and enjoyable except for one grating character and manic
performance.

Title
Review for Body Shots (1999)
The narrative concept of humankind's reactions to its impending
annihilation is not original. Numerous stories have been written that
explore the compelling question of how people deal with a world that
is ending. During the Cold War, this question was especially poignant
because it was felt that such a scenario could actually play out. This
made it a relevant question to explore at that time. Today the
zeitgeist is more optimistic, and the idea has become more abstract,
but no less compelling.
The story immediately posits that the end of the world will occur at
midnight of that day, and it follows several different characters in
their various methods of coping with the tumult. It is implied that
the destruction cannot be avoided. As would be expected, there are a
multitude of ways in which people deal with the issue of impending
destruction. On the lowest level, there will be those who see no
recourse for their action, so they indulge in nihilistic destruction.
This is the least interesting dimension of human reaction, because it
is simply pandering to the basest elements. None of the main
characters take this approach.
The story is a composite of many characters and subplots, but the
primary character is apparently Patrick Wheeler (Don McKellar), a
young man not unfamiliar with loss. He indulges his parents by
attending a dinner with his family that is played as a holiday
reunion. It is a pathetic attempt to reawaken the warm memories of the
past, and Patrick is barely able to conceal his cynicism. The approach
of his parents is a melancholy resignation to their demise, which
perhaps is to be expected of those already in the later years of their
lives.
One subplot follows Craig (Callum Keith Rennie), a friend of Patrick's
whose final desire is to complete his collection. Another of Patrick's
acquaintances fulfills his life-long desire to perform his music
publicly. The president of the gas company takes it upon himself to
call each of his customers personally and thank them for their
patronage. This provides a common thread as his calls touch each of
the characters presented. Another subplot follows Sandra (Sandra Oh),
a young woman who has decided along with her husband that they will
kill each other at the final moment rather than passively allow
themselves to be taken.
The setup used in this story is often the kernel for a science fiction
or action narrative, by having the characters devise a plan for saving
themselves. This approach is dismissed by not even entertaining the
possibility that destruction can be avoided. The primary concern of
the film is its characters. It examines how each individual reacts
differently, and how the composite describes the human condition. The
feel of the film is like that of a scientific experiment where normal
characters have a disruptive influence injected into their existence,
and the viewers are observing their reactions in order to understand
them at a deeper level.
Highly recommended. The film clearly sets out to examine the specific
elements of its premise that deal with introspective human drama.
Although there may have been opportunities to explore many aspects of
the given scenario, the film limits itself to those dimensions that
are the most compelling

Title
Review for Apur Sansar (1959)
[2.5/4.0]  (dialog in Bengali, English subtitles)
This film, with the English title "The World of Apu", is the final
episode of Satyajit Ray's "Apu Trilogy".
At the end of the narrative of "Aparajito", Apu is left alone in the
world. At the beginning of this story, a few years have passed, but
his fortunes have not much improved. Apu (Soumitra Chatterjee) is
forced to leave college due to the lack of money. Still, his spirit
is not broken. Apu accepts that his life is destined to have hardship,
but that his only recourse is to live it as fully as he can. It is
difficult for him to find a job, so he does private tutoring and
spends the rest of his time working on a novel. He decides to join a
friend, Pulu (Swapan Mukherjee), on a trip to the countryside to
attend the wedding of Pulu's cousin, Aparna (Sarmila Tagore). In a
strange twist of fate, the bridegroom is struck insane so the wedding
must be scrapped. The only way to salvage Aparna's honor is to find a
replacement bridegroom so the wedding can take place. Apu does the
noble thing and marries Aparna. He is not sure that she can be happy
going from a life without need with her parents to a life of poverty
with him, but Aparna makes the best of her fate and thrives in her new
life. Apu is a new man now that he is focussed on married life and he
and Aparna fall deeply in love. Once again, tragedy befalls Apu when
Aparna dies in childbirth. This leave Apu a broken man. Apu then
abandons all parts of his life, including his new son, Kajal, and
embarks on a journey of introspection, hoping to find peace.
Whereas the first two chapters of the trilogy succeed because they
build drama from subtlety, this film is disappointing in its rejection
of that technique. Instead it opts to use melodramatic turns to drive
the story, and force the narrative through wrenching contortions. The
idea that a stranger would step in and rescue an abandoned bride at
her wedding is a standard plot device of Indian cinema. It is slightly
unfair to penalize this film for the years of formulaic overuse in
films that followed it, but still this is a jarring departure from the
simple universal truths of the human condition that the first two films
dealt with. The change in style is so unsettling that the character of
Apu presented here seems a stranger, disconnected from the character
from the previous films.
The pace of the film is exceptionally slow, and while this worked well
in "Pather Panchali", it is a detriment in this film. Obviously the
intent was to show the depths of mourning and levels of introspection
that Apu goes through, but the consequence is the assertion that Apu
grieves over his latest tragedy on a scale that dwarfs the previous
tragedies he had experienced. Perhaps the message being made is that
the dependence on romantic love is far greater than on familial love.
Perhaps it is that tragedies affect adults more than they can affect
children. Neither statement feels credible. One would have expected
that the hardships of his early life would have given Apu some amount
of inoculation for the difficulties of adulthood. Apu actually appears
self indulgent when his reaction to tragedy is compared to how his
mother reacted to similar, if not greater, tragedy.
The wonderful music that backed the other films is surprisingly absent
in this one, outside of a few scenes of Apu playing the flute (a talent
Apu apparently picked up between the previous installment of the story
and this one). Another disappointment is the performance of Soumitra
Chatterjee, which is often overdone, and does not smoothly communicate
the transformations undergone by the character. No other characters are
given much examination.
To be fair, this is a very ambitious film that attempts to deal with
the heavy topics of human emotions. The visual imagery is beautiful
and evocative. It is unlucky in that it is judged by the high standards
set by the masterpieces that preceded it.
Moderately recommended. Although this is not such a bad film on its own,
it is definitely a disappointment after the first two magnificent parts
of the trilogy. The poignancy of those films is replaced here with
melodrama, sometimes overwrought. In fact, nothing from the first two
films needs to be known to understand this one, so it might be best to
see this one first, and then subsequently enjoy the brilliance of the
others.
--== Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/ ==--
---Share what you know. Learn what you don't.---

Title
Review for Your Friends & Neighbors (1998)
Jerry is a drama professor and his wife, Terri, is a writer working in
advertising. Their relationship has become tenuous, as highlighted by the
fact that he feels the need to continuously talk and she desires silence,
particularly during sex. As a result, Jerry has decided to pursue Mary, who
is the wife of his friend Barry. Their relationship is also strained, since
her frigidity is squelching his amorousness. Meanwhile, Jerry and Barry have
another friend, Cary, who is not in a relationship. This is very
understandable since he is an emotionally sadistic jerk who is only
interested in control and domination. The final character in the story is
Cheri, an artist's assistant whom Terri meets in a gallery and develops a
sexual relationship as a response to Jerry's infidelity.
The film is an examination of the characters and the often brutal nature of
relationships. Sex is pervasive in the story, but it is not gratuitous,
because the physical intimacy experienced by partners reflects a deeper
emotional connection, and these are what the characters are missing. This is
not limited to just the couples. The three male characters have an enduring
friendship, but there are subtle homosexual overtones even here, as
witnessed by their locker room behavior.
The title of the film and the fact all the characters have similar, rhyming
names is a suggestion that these characters reflect the actual relationships
of actual people we may know. Indeed, even the close friends in this story
often do not see what transpires below the surface of the complex
relationships of their own friends and neighbors. The writing and acting are
well developed, as the characters are more than flat stereotypes. The main
weakness of the film is a lack of involvement in the story. As we are
watching the story of the characters, there is the feeling that we are
detachedly watching a laboratory experiment and waiting for its outcome.
There is no sense of involvement or empathy with the characters. Perhaps it
is because most of the characters are multi-dimensional and flawed, but this
is not a handicap for a well made film (like "Happiness").
Moderately recommended. This is a dreary story of the difficulty of
relationships. Although it has good material to work with and the characters
are well drawn, it lacks the engaging quality that most good character
dramas have.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Hugo Pool (1997)
Many people around Los Angeles have swimming pools, so pool maintenance
businesses are not uncommon, but the Hugo Pool company is a bit odd. It is
run by the spirited young Hugo Dugay (Alyssa Milano), and on one particular
day, she has 44 pools to clean. Hugo enlists her father Henry (Malcom
McDowell), a former junkie, to steal water from the Colorado River to fill
the pool of a customer. Hugo also gets her mother Minerva (Cathy Moriarty),
a gambling addict, to join her. Henry and Minerva have been long divorced,
and the dysfunctional family somehow attract other bizarre characters to
them. During his water foray, Henry takes along a weird hitchhiker (Sean
Penn) with a dazzling pair of shoes. Hugo and Minerva run into a customer
confined to a wheelchair, Floyd (Patrick Dempsey), who is apparently the
only "normal" person in the story beside Hugo, and decide to let him join
them in the back of their on their rounds. Floyd has given Minerva a feel
for a winner of an upcomming horse race, so she is dying to get to the track
after the pools are done. To get all the pools done, each visit consists of
quickly scooping up floating leaves, dumping in a few chemicals, and
interacting with the odd customers, like Franz (Robert Downey Jr.), who is a
film director on the run because he shot an extra on his set.
Basing a film on quirky characters is not a simple task. To do it correctly
there must be a balance of both oddness and reality. That is, oddness can be
an exaggeration of the character but it cannot be the sole definition of the
character. The main problem with this film is that it tries to be amusing by
having eccentric characters, but instead it goes overboard and becomes
overbearing. In fact, the character of Franz is so exaggerated (from an
unidentifyable accent to manic behavior) that he becomes grating, and almost
makes the film unwatchable. At times, some characters take on a more
brooding quality, in an apparent attempt to give the story a more profound
base, but instead of balancing them, it seems to exaggerate them further. It
is clear that there are metaphorical meanings attached to the characters and
their stories, but this gets lost in their silliness. Although there is an
unpredictability to the characters, the main plot and subplot go exactly
where one would expect them to go.
The perfomances of the cast lacked credibility in general. Although Cathy
Moriarty frames a believable Minerva, the rest of the cast is handicapped by
poorly writing, and as a result we feel like we are watching actors playing
characters, rather than the characters themselves.
Recommended against. Perhaps this film can be enjoyed if the viewer likes
offbeat films and is in a forgiving mood. A few parts were entertaining, but
I almost quit in the middle.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Three to Tango (1999)
The genre of romantic comedy often gets critical sneers, not because
it is inherently weak, but rather because it has mass appeal, and thus
films of this type often follow standard formulas in order to appeal
to the largest market possible. It is well understood that the
greatest number of viewers will be pleased by delivering a happy
ending. This film frustratingly follows all the elements of the
formula.
Oscar Novak (Matthew Perry) and his partner Peter Steinberg (Oliver
Platt) are capable who are looking for the big job that will establish
them. They are bidding for a renovation project for tycoon Charles
Newman (Dylan McDermott), but they are competing with a more
established firm. As a result, they feel they must do everything
possible to win the contract. Through a series of misinterpretations,
aided by the pairs' competitors, the gay Peter is presumed to be
straight and the straight Oscar is presumed to be gay.
The possessive Charles wants to find someone to keep tabs on his
artist mistress Amy Post (Neve Campbell), and Oscar appears to be just
the man for the job. Charles see no threat in having a gay man
associate with his mistress, and Oscar is willing to ascend to Charles
demands because he wants to win the contract. Oscar falls for Amy, and
she becomes attracted to him also, but Oscar cannot reveal his true
feeling without jeopardizing his and Peter's professional future.
The film has one clever dimension, and that is the concept of a
straight man pretending to be gay. In real life, it is the reverse
that usually happens. By allowing viewers to relate to a character who
is forced to pretend to be different from his nature, perhaps some
members of the audience will be more compassionate to the plight of
homosexuals who are forced to masquerade as heterosexuals.
Perry give an entertaining performance. Although most of Oscar's
one-liners are telegraphed, Perry is able to keep the character witty
and likable. Pratt gives an understated performance and thankfully
does not allow his character degenerate into a typically overwrought
stereotypical gay man. The remaining performances were not pleasant to
watch. Charles is not written as anything more than an unlikable
villain, and McDermott does not extend the character beyond that
single dimension. Campbell is particularly ineffective as Amy by
constantly making forced efforts to have the character appear cute and
quirky, and sacrificing any depth of personality.
One disingenuous aspect is the inexplicable relationship between
utterly likable Amy and the irredeemable Charles. Amy explains that it
is difficult for her to meet the right man and establish a
relationship, which is not an uncommon situation for many single
women. Still, it is not understandable how a young, highly attractive,
sociable, and energetic woman would not be able to establish a
relationship with any man in Chicago, except a lout. She does not even
take money or get security from Charles, so the only thing she appears
to derive from the relationship is companionship, which would not be
hard to find elsewhere.
The most disappointing aspect of the film is the utter lack of
originality in the plot. The narrative was designed to please the
maximum number of viewers. The ludicrous climax has all characters and
subplots merge and resolve themselves to the satisfaction of all
involved, which makes the whole narrative hollow. The film aspires to
no artistic goals, but will possibly appeal to the mass audience, and
there is no reason it will not be successful there.
Marginally recommended. The film achieves what it sets out to do, and
as a result it will likely have some amount of commercial success.
However, it is successful because it sets very low goals. It has one
core idea that is interesting, but that gets buried beneath may layers
of familiarity, predictability, and convenience.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
Due to a savvy marketing campaign, The Blair Witch Project was among
the most anticipated of the summer, particularly among fans of
independent film. It is a small budget film which demonstrates that an
extravagant Hollywood production is not necessary to make a good film,
as long as originality and creativity are employed.
The prologue to the film claims that the filmmakers disappeared over a
year ago, and that the film was constructed from the remains of their
footage which was eventually found. In a clever stroke of marketing,
the film's website goes into great detail about the disappearance and
it constructs a detailed background legend that the filmmakers were
investigating. Official websites for films are often merely an
advertising mechanism that provide an overview of the story, a
description of the cast, and a few stills from the film itself. It is
noteworthy that the website for this film actually enhances the film
by acting as an extension to the story.
Although portrayed as reality, the events in this story are all
fiction. In an age when every mundane new event (like a 45 mile per
hour car chase on a crowded highway) is given national prominence by
the network news organizations, it is unlikely that the bizarre events
purported by this film could have escaped notice. As confirmation,
there is the usual "all characters and events in this film are
fictitious" disclaimer displayed at the end of the credits. However,
knowing that the film is fictitious does not detract from the viewing
experience. It actually enhances it because the viewer is allowed to
enjoy the story fully rather than be distracted by implausibilities.
The footage begins as the three main characters are embarking on their
project. They are college students putting together a film
investigating the legend of the Blair Witch. Heather (Heather Donahue)
is the director of the film and the project leader. Joshua (Joshua
Leonard) is the camera operator and Michael (Michael Williams) is
handling the sound. The footage begins as they interviewing current
residents of Burkittesville, Maryland, which was previously a colonial
town called Blair. The interviewees relate vague stories of the
legendary witch who lived in the nearby woods, and also the story of
serial child killer who murdered several of the town's children about
fifty years earlier. It seems the killer was a hermit living in the
woods who claimed to be possessed by the witch when he perpetrated the
horrific crimes.
Eventually the trio enters the woods in their search for particular
historical landmarks related to the legend. From the premise it is
known that they will meet with misfortune, and the tension builds as
they proceed deeper into their journey. As they become lost and
encounter strange occurrences, the suspense noticeably tightens as the
audience wonders what their final fate will be.
The genre of mock documentary (mockumentary) has been well
established, and primarily used for comic effect (such as in the
hilarious Man Bites Dog and This is Spinal Tap). While the comic
mockumentary creates satire by portraying lampoons and exaggerations
as reality, this film is unique in that it tries to build suspense and
fear by attempting to keep all events believable. The fictitiousness
of the stories is never belied by the acting as all three actors give
outstanding, credible performances. The characters gradually transform
from enthusiastic adventurers to terrified, edgy, and confused waifs.
The main flaw is the uneven, and sometimes lingering pacing. The
production is obviously amateur, but the genius is that it tries to
portray a fictitious amateur production, so it succeeds perfectly in
that aspect.
Highly recommended. This film was subjected to a large amount of hype
both before and after its release. For people who are expecting too
much, or are expecting a tradition horror slaughterfest, it may be a
disappointment. It is not the scariest movie, and is not intended to
be. However, it carefully draws its boundaries and successfully
executes within them. Although it is not perfect, it is a marvel of
simplicity, originality, and creativity.

Title
Review for Affliction (1997)
Wade Whitehouse is afflicted, but it is not a physical disease that ails
him, but rather it is the psychological and emotion scars of his childhood.
His detachment, distrust, and distorted perception are the result of
constant berating and beating in his formative years. As the oldest of the
siblings, he took it upon himself to intervene, and as a result, he was the
one who bore most of the wrath of his father. His younger brother Rolfe
learned early on (by avoiding the mistakes of Wade) how to avoid the abuse,
and has become a seemingly well-adjusted adult. Wade, however, was not so
lucky. He does not have a serious problem, but he is not able to maintain a
stable relationship. He want to wrest more visitation rights from his
ex-wife, but he is oblivious to the fact that his young daughter does not
enjoy the time she spends with him. A combination of events interact to push
Wade over the edge.
This film is similar in mood to "The Sweet Hereafter", another film based on
a novel by Russell Banks. Similar to that story, this one is filled with
symbolism -- from the bleak New Hampshire winter, to Wade's progressing
toothache. It provides an uncommon depth to the story. Nick Nolte gives a
fantastic performance as Wade by giving a subdued presentation of the
character, thus not relegating him to a simple psychotic. The viewer sees
all the events presented to Wade and can see how Wade's perspective is
causing him to potentially read too much into situations. Wade's childhood
abuse is made menacing by the fact that very little violence is shown, but
rather we only see its effects.
A common occurrence in child abuse cases is that sometimes a beating is so
severe (eg. broken bones) that medical attention is required. In order to
keep the abuse concealed from others, a lie is constructed. The ruse given
is that the injuries were caused by an accident, usually some type of fall.
The story suggests that one of the subtle scars that abuse victims carry is
a suspicion that events described as "accidents" may be actually be a cover
for more sinister events. This is often manifested at a subconscious level,
so even those who feel they have not been afflicted might miss this in
themselves.
Highly Recommended. This file features excellent writing, directing, and
acting. It will be enjoyed by viewers who like brooding, reflective
character studies.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Mosafere jonub (1997)
[Screened at the Cinequest Film Festival 9, San Jose]
[3.5/4.0]  (dialog in Farsi, English subtitles)
Reza Amri is a 14 year old boy making a trip from his home in southern Iran
to Tehran to stay with his cousin and have a vacation. On the same train, in
the next compartment to Reza's, is the elderly Mrs. Nasiri, who is
travelling to Tehran to catch a flight to Germany so she can visit her son
whom she has not seen for many years. Reza is initially put off by the
cranky old woman, but during a brief train stop, he has a conversation with
her and sympathizes with her plight. He has no set schedule, so he figures
he could make himself useful and help her to the airport, because she seems
to be in poor health and generally appears uncomfortable getting around by
herself.
What initially appears to be a gesture of goodwill leads to a larger
adventure. When Mrs. Nasiri collapses at the airport we learn that she has a
serious heart condition. Reza is able to get her taken to the hospital but
finds that since she has no insurance, she will have to pay cash for the
necessary treatment. With the old woman now incapacitated, Reza takes it
upon himself to become her temporary guardian. He must manage her
possessions and try to exchange her Deutsch Marks and pawn her jewelry to
raise the money she needs for her medical care.
With this simple story, director Parviz Shahbazi has created a moving and
convincing picture of life in modern day Iran. Westerners have a very
limited exposure to Persian culture, and Americans especially have kept a
stilted view of it since the Islamic Revolution and accompanying American
hostage incident. It is refreshing to see a perspective from inside that
nation that gives an insight to many of the mundane aspect of daily life.
Like in many other developing countries, it is necessary to have street
smarts and a good knowledge of how the system operates in order to get
anything accomplished. Reza is an extremely resourceful person and genuinely
enjoys the challenge of haggling fares with taxi drivers and negotiating a
place to spend the night with a hospital night watchman. Still, despite the
amount of ruggedness required of individuals, there are many small acts of
generosity and hospitality on the part of strangers that is often absent in
other cultures.
An unbelievably strong performance is given by the young actor Reza Moghadam
as Reza. A tremendous challenge presented by the role is the sparseness of
dialog. Much of the story consists of Reza navigating the city and most of
the time Moghadam must use solely his physical expressiveness to sculpt the
character. He aptly defines the character of the quiet but plucky boy who
shows maturity beyond his years by taking on responsibility that is in no
way required of him. From his ability to negotiate resourcefully with store
clerks and hospital administrators, to his fierce pride in his cultural
background, we see a character of tremendous depth that is a result of both
superb writing and acting.
Because most of the action is filmed on location, there is the feeling that
what is being watched is not a narrative film but rather a voyeuristic
documentary. Just as one would expect if one were following a person around,
we see Reza simply gazing out the window of a bus, small children running
around playing or picking their nose. Given its basis, the story could have
easily become a melodramatic tragedy, or an uplifting morality tale.
Thankfully it avoids both of these and simply tells the story of charming
boy, and a charming country.
Highly recommended, a must-see for anyone interested viewing daily life in
another culture. It is a simple but poignant story, and a brilliant
performance by a young actor. It is a very compelling portrait of life in
Iran. Deservedly, this film won the Maverick competition at Cinequest.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Going Nomad (1998)
[Screened at the Cinequest Film Festival 9, San Jose]
The "asphalt nomads" are a subculture that enjoy spending nights driving
around Manhattan in their 70's era large American cars. One of these nomads
is El Cid Rivera. El Cid lives in New York City and has an insular life,
bounded geographically by the island of Manhattan, and restricted socially
to his former grammar school friends who also have no reason to explore the
world outside the Big Apple. His friends include Telly, a part-time
professional wrestler, The Rev, a former priest and current toll booth
attendant with a weakness for women, Chuckles, who helps people find
apartments downtown, and Eddie, whose only real passion in life is the
maintenance of his hair. The other character involved in the story is
Officer Geraldine Fusco, with whom El Cid had a fight in fourth grade, and
who has had a grudge against him ever since. Although their relationship
mainly consists of her trying to run him down to seek her revenge, it has
obvious romantic potential.
This film has much in common with the film Swingers. While that film was
about a group of guys and their relationship with Los Angeles, this film
also has a motley group of young male friends and it explores their
relationship with New York. Anyone who is charmed by the physical beauty of
New York City is rewarded by many picturesque views of the Manhattan
skyline, and is almost made to feel jealous of the main characters in their
possession of it in their daily lives. The city itself becomes a character
in the story. Like a loving parent, the city nurtures and provides
everything that the characters need, but as El Cid finds, there is a time
when a person must leave home and establish a relationship with the greater
world. Ultimately the story is about El Cid's relationship with New York,
his surrogate mother, and his desire to live a more meaningful, independent
life.
At regular intervals, the film takes the approach of presenting other
"nomads" in almost a documentary style of them speaking directly to the
camera defining and explaining various aspects of the nomad subculture.
Although these characters are not really involved in the main narrative of
the film, they provide a significant depth to the story by coloring the
characters of El Cid and the city. There is the feeling that the other
nomads are given a little too much screen time and their views are
repetitious, but their extended monologues over superbly selected music
provide a pleasant, reflected respite from the comedy of the main story.
Besides El Cid, none of the characters are fully developed. In fact, some of
his gang remain shallow, and almost appear to be stereotypical eccentrics.
However, the story is solely about El Cid, and it is quickly apparent that
his gang of friends are merely a manifestation of the light, colorful, and
comic side of his life, while the nomads represent his deeper, reflective
self. Although El Cid is in his 30's, this is actually a coming of age
story, with the summation being El Cid moving on to a more mature stage of
life.
Highly recommended. This is not a perfect film, but is actually rather
ambitious, and mostly successful. Although much of the humor is of the silly
variety, the story is able to deliver genuine laughs throughout.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Lola rennt (1998)
(Dialog in German, English subtitles)
This film was released under the English title "Run Lola Run".
A recent series of television beer advertisements pokes fun of the
stereotype of abstract and conceptual tendencies in German literature.
Coming almost as proof of the stereotype is this film -- a nonlinear,
kinetic story filled with action, suspense, color, and music.
The frenetic adventure for Lola and Manni is immediately hinted by the
punk couple's colorful appearance. Lola (Franka Potente) has
florescent hair, florescent clothes, and tattoos. Manni (Moritz
Bleibtreu) is also tattooed, and works as a courier for a small time
gangster. The narrative begins when Lola receives a phone call from a
distraught Manni explaining that he is in deep trouble. Manni was
running an errand for the boss, but he accidentally left the payoff on
the subway. He needs to meet the gangster in a short time, and he will
be in deep trouble if he does not deliver the 100,000 marks. Manni
gives Lola 20 minutes to come up with a plan to raise the money, or
else he will hold up a store to get it. Lola's moped was stolen
earlier, so now she is left without transportation. The only way for
her to get the money and then get to Manni is to sprint across town.
The story is presented in a cleverly nonlinear fashion. The plot is
split between actual events and the imaginations of the characters
without any clear indication beforehand which is which. The narrative
has its share of improbabilities and implausibilities, but these do
not detract from the film because its focus is clearly on the mood and
flow of the story. It attempts to tell story in which imagery (both
visual and sonic) are as important as the actual events. Writer and
director Tom Tykwer intentionally created the imagery first, and then
developed the story to drive it. However, the narrative is not merely
a formula in service to the effects. The story follows multiple
threads of time and explores the ripple effect of decisions made early
in a sequence of events.
Most of the story consists of Lola sprinting through Berlin in a race
against time, trying to reach Manni before he makes a stupid mistake
out of desperation, and somehow getting the money along the way. This
automatically sets a high energy level, which is well regulated by
effective breaks that allow the story elements to emerge and develop.
Although the high adrenaline approach help to camouflage story
weaknesses, it also creates an involved viewing experience. The fact
that it effectively intersperses action and suspense makes it an
engaging film.
Highly recommended. The film is a fast-paced, high-energy, visual and
musical experience. It evokes the feel of an extended music video in
its use of techno music and its mix of live action, cartoon, and
stills. The appeal of the film is more for its imagery than for its
story, which is interesting, but slightly porous. This would be a good
choice for a group of people to watch together as a midnight movie. It
may not appeal to an audience that does not appreciate modern
electronic music, and expects a straight forward plot.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Virgin Suicides, The (1999)
The challenges of adolescence is a topic that has been frequently
explored. It is a universal theme that practically all viewers can
identify with. This film explores this topic with the allegorical
story of a troubled family.
The film is set in a middle class Michigan neighborhood of the 1970's.
A narrator (voice of Giovanni Ribisi) introduces the story beginning
with the suicide attempt by the youngest of five daughters of the
Lisbon family. The narrator is recounting the story from his past,
since he was a member of a group of boys who knew and liked the girls.
A foreboding tone of impending doom is set immediately, and the
details slowly unfold. The girls are attractive, cheerful, and
seemingly well-adjusted, so no one understands how they came to their
terrible fate. Although their social activities were restricted by
their parents, particularly their devoutly religious mother, their
family never outwardly appeared exceptionally draconian or
dysfunctional.
By setting the story in the 1970's and displaying the pop culture of
the era, the film uses nostalgia to evoke a feeling of remembrance,
but this is not the primary focus of the story. The film has a cogent,
if oblique, plot that it develops. From the film's title, the
narrator's introduction, and the symbolism of the opening scene where
municipal workers mark the Lisbon's tree for removal (to control a
Dutch Elm Disease epidemic), the eventual result is clear.
What differentiates this story from typical teenage angst stories is
the fact that the source of the conflict is not part of the plot. The
perspective is from the outside, as the narrator is merely an observer
of the events. The narrator states that the events of their
adolescence have lingered into their adulthood, and they habitually
reflect this one troubling dimension of their remembered past. The
point being made is that among the halcyon days of youth, there are
problems that may not always be tangible. It is not with morbid
perversity that the tragic events are examined, but rather as a symbol
of part of the pain of growing up.
All aspects of the film are executed well. The story, based on a novel
written by Jeffrey Eugenides, provides a strong foundation. Director
Sofia Coppola skillfully focuses the scope of the film to its
essential elements. The film uses nostalgia for a past decade without
becoming a slave to this dimension. The acting is uniformly
proficient. All the roles of the adolescents are believable, and the
performances of James Woods and Kathleen Turner as the Lisbon parents
required subtlety, as their involvement in their daughters' torment
are unclear.
Highly recommended. This is a highly mood-oriented film whose story
does not attempt to raise questions and answer them. It is a well
crafted exploration of the remembrance of past tragedies and
mysteries. Although it has some light-hearted moments, the film is
essentially quite dark and brooding. It is a success because it keeps
esoteric perspective, and manages to communicate an understandable,
yet murky, story.

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
Washington Irving's story The Legend of Sleepy Hollow is a classic
Halloween tale, so it is a bit odd that this interpretation of that
story was release during the Christmas season. Perhaps it was intended
for the October time frame but was delayed.
Only a scant few elements of the original story are kept. Character
names are preserved, but the story is completely different. Whereas
the original is a simple story of jealousy and deception, this Gothic
film is a much more complex and intricate work. Deeper themes of
objectivity and reason, spirituality, treachery, and even pure carnage
are incorporated.
In this rendition, Ichabod Crane (Johnny Depp) is a police
investigator in 18th century New York. His rigorous insistence on
rigorous scientific inquiry and thorough investigation is seen as
meddlesome by the courts, so he is banished to the rural village of
sleepy hollow to investigate a series of brutal murders.
The people of the village attribute the gruesome decapitations to the
legendary Headless Horseman, a mythical figure inspired by pure
bloodlust. Ichabod sets up residence at the home of village elder
Baltus Van Tassel (Michael Gambon), but dismisses the beliefs of his
host and the others. To Ichabod, the world is starkly rational, with
scientific explanations for all processes. His patronizing attitude
causes him to be not particularly well-liked except perhaps by his
host daughter, Katrina Van Tassel (Christina Ricci).
The world that Ichabod enters is dark and eerie, a signature creation
of director Tim Burton. The most enjoyable parts of the film are the
noir mood and Gothic themes that are elaborately constructed.
Unfortunately, the story is weak, and does little to complement the
cinematography. Although the film is able to maintain suspense and
keep its mysteries hidden, the story is ultimately muddled and it
builds into a ridiculously frenetic and overly cathartic climax.
Moderately recommended. The success of the film is in its mood and
visuals, not its story. The narrative is clumsy and becomes
uninteresting, but the imagery and special effects are entertaining.
It is not a retelling of the classic story, but a complete reworking
of it that fits it into a different vision.

Title
Review for Charulata (1964)
(Dialog in Bengali, English subtitles)
This film is also known by the English title "The Lonely Wife".
Ambition can be blinding.  Bhupati Dutta (Shailen Mukherjee) is a
wealthy man who pours all his efforts into running his political
newspaper in colonial India of the 1870's. He is an intelligent,
trusting, and gentle man, but the total immersion in his work has
isolated him from his beloved wife, Charulata (Madhabi Mukherjee).
Charulata loves Bhupati, so she does not attempt to pry him away
from his newspaper. As a result, she endures a lonely existence
in their large Calcutta house. When Bhupathi finds that his young
cousin Amal (Soumitra Chatterjee) is floundering in his studies,
Bhupathi invites him to join them, and perhaps help with the paper
and gain some focus. Amal arrives (symbolically, along with a storm),
and it is immediately apparent that the two men are very different.
Bhupathi is serious and dismisses sentimental literature for the
stolid political discussion of his paper. The mercurial Amal cannot
be tied down with responsibility. Bhupathi asks Amal to pay
Charulata the attention that he himself has been neglecting to give
her, perhaps even encouraging her to write. Bhupathi is unaware of
the potential danger of mixing a new dynamic into a strained
relationship. Inevitably, Charulata will be drawn to the attention
she craves.
Satyajit Ray takes this simple, straight-forward story and makes
it a rich, complete film by interweaving many layers of symbolism.
>From the initial scene, where we see the cloistered Charulata
embroidering a handkerchief for her absentee husband and observing
the outside world through viewing glasses, it is apparent that
every component of the film is telling a story. When Charulata
tellingly peers at Bhupati, who is pacing and lost in thought,
that single action immediately gives a snapshot of their
relationship with not a word spoken.
This story, by Rabindranath Tagore, is simple and familiar, but
because of its many nuances, it becomes fresh and engaging. It is
no surprise that Charulata becomes attached to Amal. What is
engrossing is how the relationships are represented on multiple
levels. Bhupati is not a bad person. His failing is that he is
living in a sphere that cannot be shared with his wife. He feels
that the only meaningful writings are the sober political opinions
that he espouses in his newspaper, in English. Charulata is also
educated, but does not have any interest in the serious writing of
her husband. Her interests lay in Bengali literature, in emotional
writing which is dismissed by Bhupati. When Amal writes a poetic
story that he shares with Charulata, it is a deep meaningful
gesture. It is an act of sharing and inclusion that the emotionally
hungry Charulata is longing for.
Class plays an interesting role in the nature of the characters.
Bhupati comes from a wealthy family, so he is free to spend his
time in pursuit of his avocation. As a man of high standing, he
is able to take a daring political stand and speak out on issues
in Britain that affect colonial India. Charulata, on the other
hand, is almost a prisoner. Although they live in a large
comfortable house with a beautiful garden, it is her whole world
because she never goes outside. It is actually very lonely for her
and the only company she has is her younger, immature sister-in-law.
All these factors escape Bhupati, and he is not aware that Charulata
only needs a small piece of him. He is so self-absorbed that he does
not even try to construct a world in which both he and his wife can
live.
The story is neither sentimental nor cathartic. It simply attempts
to put a relationship under a microscope to view it in full depth.
The explored themes are universal.
Highly recommended. Satyajit Ray is a the height of his talent in
crafting this film. It is a complex, multilayered story, but the
presentation is kept simple and compelling.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Plunkett & Macleane (1999)
The eighteenth century in Western culture was a different time, with a
markedly different class structure from the present time. No middle
class then, and thus there was a large, unbridgeable gulf between rich
and poor. In fact, England at that time more closely resembled what
would be considered a "developing" country today. This backdrop
provides the setting for a tale of two outlaws who infiltrate the
social circles of the aristocracy in order to rob them.
MacLeane (Jonny Lee Miller) is a gentleman languishing in a debtor's
prison after losing his place in society. One day the wall of his cell
is crumbled by a coach that is being robbed by Plunkett (Robert
Carlyle) and his partner while being pursued by the authorities.
Although his mortally wounded partner is brutally killed by the savage
lawman Mr. Chance (Ken Stott), Plunkett is able to escape with the
freed MacLeane. However, the two are apprehended and sent to prison,
but not before Plunkett swallows a large ruby. In prison, the pair
negotiate their release by bribing the warden with the concealed
gemstone.
After gaining their freedom, Plunkett hatches a plan that can earn
them some money. Since MacLeane was a gentleman, he could pass himself
off as an aristocrat with Plunkett being his servant. This would allow
the pair to determine targets for robbery by getting close and finding
out who has money and what their whereabouts will be. Using a small
sum of money that Plunkett has saved, they begin their ruse.
At their first foray, MacLeane meets, is enchanted by, and
subsequently robs the captivating Lady Rebecca (Liv Tyler). Likewise,
she takes an interest in him, who contrasts with the revolting suiter
her guardian, Lord Gibson (Michael Gambon) keeps pushing on her. She
immediately suspects MacLeane of being the "gentleman highwayman" who
robbed her, but is only charmed by the gentle bandit.
Although it is sketchy and slow to develop, the premise constructs an
interesting scenario. Although the pair are conspiring to criminal
activity, they will the be the protagonists because in the class
politics of the time, the aristocracy are symbolic of greed,
corruption, and oppression. However, at the point at which the pair
begin their criminal exploits, the plot competely withers. The writing
omits any attempt at plausibility, such as having the pair barely
conceal their identities, or always finding their victims unguarded
and unarmed. Plunkett is portrayed as a former apothecary, but is
given powers more like a wizard, using a dazzling command of chemistry
and pyrotechnics to escape from hopeless situations.
The art direction is the only dimension in which the film is
successful. It is apparently the the skeleton around which all other
aspects were meant to serve, which may explain why they were so
underdeveloped. The costume and setting realistically represent the
time period, but the soundtrack gives a arresting but effective
contrast by having a modern tone. Particularly striking is an
elaborate society ball where a period dance is performed while modern
techno music is scored. While these dimensions of the film are
entertaining, they do not redeem the uninspired, cliche-driven plot.
The acting is capable but hampered by the poorly sketched characters.
Only Carlyle is able to raise his character to anything beyond dull
and cliche. Especially poorly written is the character of Chance. From
his first scene he is depicted as vile and sociopathic. However, the
script feels it necessary to bludgeon the viewer with this in every
scene he occupies, to the extent that he becomes predictable and
dismissively uninteresting.
Recommended against. This is a dull, uninspired film that is all style
and devoid of substance. The costume, art direction, and even score
are well done, but the writing is so poor as to make the entire
experience boring at best.

Title
Review for Detention (1998/I)
Many would consider the career of the public school teacher to be
among the most thankless of occupations. Stories of idealistic
individuals slogging through warlike conditions are sadly common. This
setting provides the backdrop for this film, a searing dark comedy.
This film is clearly constructed to make a case for teachers. In the
film, as in real life, teachers must face numerous obstacles. Students
are apathetic, hostile, and even violent. Administrators are
ineffectual, and oppressively burdensome with bureaucratic policies.
Parents threaten litigation in response to attempts at discipline. In
reality the situation is universally considered a tragedy, and this
film, like many good works of literature, successfully spins comedy
from tragedy.
The story begins by introducing Mr. Walmsley (John Davies), a man with
a shady past connected with the circus. He accepts a position as a
substitute teacher in a suburban public high school, a world perhaps
more bizarre than the one he left. Being new, he finds that he is one
of the few whose spirit has not been broken down by the system. He
finds a kindred spirit in the art teacher, Ms. Germaine (Marsha
Dietlein). Each in their own way fights a losing battle in their
effort to make a difference in the lives of their students.
Eventually Walmsley realizes that there is no way to reach the
students within the restrictions of the existing framework. He
fashions an extreme scheme to address some of the most troubled
students. He uses his circus background to fashion a more severe form
of "detention", which is a common and ineffective punishment for
students where they are required to stay after school hours and sit
quietly in a classroom. It is only a slight form of punitive
imprisonment. The approach taken by Walmsley will be jarring to many
viewers, and director Andy Anderson states that it is meant to be
comically disturbing.
The strength of the film is that the comedy is consistent (the story
does not follow the cliche of becoming serious and humorless at the
climax), and the comedy is often quite clever. The film is also
unpredictable. Although the viewer is aware of where the journey will
ultimately end, it is never clear how it will get there.
The primary weakness of the film is the transparent agenda that is
being pushed. This could have been a problem if the film was not so
entertaining. The other minor detriment is some of the acting.
Although most of the adult roles were convincing, the students never
emerge beyond typical adolescent stereotypes. However, the film is
well written, and reflects the satirical wit of the filmmaker.
Highly recommended. The film sometimes uses jarring imagery, but this
is to be expected in a black comedy. It is imaginative and funny, and
it results in an enjoyable experience.

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
Suburban America is often seen as a symbol of comfortable banality. In
actuality, it is not immune to the dissatisfaction, directionlessness,
and dysfunction that afflict modern life.
The film opens with an aerial view of the seeming typical and idyllic
tree-lined American suburb. A narration in the voice of the main
character, Lester Burnham (Kevin Spacey), introduces the story with
the jarring revelation that his character is dead, and the story is
the tale of events that led to his demise. This immediately signals
that the film will aspire to lofty goals. One signal of manipulative
writing is the use of heavy-handed events, like a death, in the climax
of the story to elicit emotion in the viewer. By notifying the viewer
that the story ends with the death of the main character, the
narrative does not afford itself the cheap tactic of allowing this
turn of events to manipulate the viewer. Instead, it signals that the
description of events leading to it will be the focus of attention,
that it intends to tell a good story.
Lester is passing through middle age and has become practically a
zombie. No part of his life gives him any fulfillment. His
relationship with his wife, Carolyn (Annette Bening), has evolved from
one of passion to superficiality. Although he would like to have a
deeper involvement in the life of his teenage daughter, Jane (Thora
Birch), she feels he has made only sporadic attempts when it was
convenient for him, so as a result she is resentful of him. Both
Carolyn and Jane have their own demons. Jane is an alienated teenager,
resentful of the chasm that has developed between her and her parents.
Carolyn is a moderately successful real estate agent. She has focused
all her energy into her job and her housework and gardening because
she has control over these activities, unlike the relationships with
her family, which are strained and fruitless.
The usual life for the Burhams is disrupted by several separate
events. Upon seeing Jane's striking friend, Angela Hayes (Mena
Suvari), for the first time, Lester is immediately struck with desire,
and tries to interact with her as often as he can. For her part,
Angela enjoys the attention, and confesses to Jane that she welcomes
the effect her beauty has on men. Lester's obsessions with Angela
reawakens his spirit. He has gained meaning in his dull life and he is
inspired to remove the chains that have been placed on his psyche.
The relationship that develops between the middle-aged Lester and the
underaged Angela is troubling. Although it appears to benefit Lester
and not hurt Angela in any way, the inequity in their positions, let
alone standard social taboos, is a bothersome development. Still, it
is undeniable that Lester's new obsession was the trigger for his
spiritual rebirth, and in that aspect, it seems positive. Like when a
dog runs after a car, it is not necessarily capture that is desired,
but the thrill of the chase. This appears to be the nature of Lester's
motivation, so the viewer does not fully feel uncomfortable with
Lester's seemingly deviant obsession.
A new family moves next to the Burhams, and the son, Ricky Fitts (Wes
Bentley), injects a new dynamic into the the lives of his neighbors.
Jane is drawn to the quiet but confident recluse. Jane slowly finds
she has more in common with the introspective loner than with her
cheerleader friend Angela. Ricky also becomes a friend of Lester's, by
becoming his marijuana dealer.
Most Americans who do not own guns will see them regularly in film and
television. They are a potent symbol of power, and are a convenient
and overused tool of American cinema. While guns are used in the
story, they are not overused. The narrative presents several
situations for a cliché, gun-based solution, but then steps aside from
the convenience.
The strongest suit of the film is the writing, which gives the story
power and eloquence. It mixes moments of dark humor and gripping
drama. The characters are drawn with depth and detail, and are
realized in uniformly superb performances. Bening is expressive as a
character who has gone through the same internal decay as Lester, but
has managed to cope in her own way. Bening is able to express the
settled exterior while also allowing the dark interior to show through
without being melodramatic. However, the clear master of the craft is
Spacey. Lester is a multi-faceted character who undergoes a
transformation from energyless to reclaimed. Spacey captures all
elements of the character and molds them into a coherent and utterly
believable flawed hero.
The success of the story is its ability to present difficult
situations in ways that do not appear manipulative. Although there are
several shocking turns of events, the surprise stems from the points
where the standard formula is broken, rather than from predictable
melodramatic vehicles.
Highly recommended. The film is ambitious and successful. It succeeds
with deep, thoughtful writing and effective, powerful acting. The
themes addressed will not be comfortable for all audiences, but it
should be rewarding for most viewers who like to see the realistic
portrayal of true and flawed characters.

Title
Review for Julien Donkey-Boy (1999)
Schizophrenia is a mental illness where the patient often perceives a
reality that is markedly different from what a normal mind would
perceive. Portrayal of mental illness is often given from the
perspective of the sane observer viewing the puzzling behavior of the
afflicted. This film takes the opposite approach, with the audience
viewing a confusing, incomprehensible world through the eyes of the
protagonist.
This story does not contain a clear narrative, but rather is a
composition of various scenes and occurrences in the life of the main
character, Julien (Ewen Bremner). He lives with his widowed father
(legendary German director, Werner Herzog), and his two siblings,
pregnant sister Pearl (Chloë Sevigny) and brother Chris (Evan
Neumann). Both of Julien's siblings appear to be normal, and all of
their behavior seems coherent. Julien's father comes across as an odd
character, but perhaps it is only Julien's perception of him that is
askew.
The events that take place in the household span the range from
mundane to bizarre. Chris, perhaps the most "normal" character, is
constantly practicing wrestling. Pearl shops for baby clothes,
tenderly cares for Julien, and plays the harp. Julien's father
delivers monologues about various topics, ranging from the dialog in
the movie Dirty Harry, to a talking bird competition. He sometimes
watches television while wearing a gas mask. All these factors seem
meaningless in isolation, but form a rough mosaic in composition.
The most bizarre and disturbing elements of the film occur when Julien
is followed. He engages in behaviors that are typical of people with
his mental illness, like raving at pedestrians, and emotional
immersion in religion and religious imagery. At times however, Julien
appears mostly normal, such as the scenes where he is attending a
school for other disabled persons. A friend of Julien's at the school,
a young girl with impaired vision, makes the statement that she had
always thought her vision was normal until she was told that "normal"
people can see much more clearly than she could. This is the key
insight the film makes into Julien's world. What may be disturbing and
unintelligible to the viewer, is normalcy for the schizophrenic mind.
Very few of the events that occur are coherent in the context of a
story. The initial scene presents extreme actions and imagery that jar
the viewer but does not seem connected to the following narrative.
Immediately the viewer is undecided whether what was presented were
real or imagined actions. The intention is clearly to present a world
where reality and illusion and hallucination combine to form the
sensorially riotous world of the schizophrenic. Director Harmony
Korine wrote the story which was inspired by his real life uncle who
suffers from the disease.
The film adheres to the tenets of Dogme 95, an austere school of
filmmaking that eschews many of the superficial or manipulative
aspects of modern filmmaking. For example, Dogme 95 films are shot on
location without sets or props, sound is recorded from source and not
redubbed, the camera is hand-held, etc. All of these techniques also
reflect the scattered and impressionistic nature of Julien's mind.
Much of the acting was improvised, and some of the footage was taken
as the actors, staying in their roles, interacted with real people on
location.
The film will definitely not play in multiplexes as it does not have
an audience there. It will likely have a limited run on the art house
circuit, but still struggle to attract viewers to such a detached,
abstract, and difficult film. As a portrait of schizophrenia, the film
immerses the viewer into a world of altered reality. There is a
threadbare narrative at its core, but the film is mostly a collage of
disjointed scenes, images, and experiences. The characters are left
vague and are not possible to identify with.
Conditionally recommended. The film is highly ambitious, tackling a
subject that is deep but without any commercial appeal. It makes no
concessions in its attempt to peer into a world that will not be
intelligible to the audience. The flaw of the film is that it is
tedious, requiring mental endurance and toughness from the viewer.

Title
Review for Smoke Signals (1998)
Vincent and Thomas are not really friends, but they have a connection in
that Vincent's father Arnold (who left the family years ago) saved Thomas'
life in an accident that left him an orphan as an infant. When Vincent finds
out that his father has died in Arizona, miles away from the reservation in
Idaho, Thomas offers to give Vincent the money he needs to make the trip to
recover Arnold's possessions on the condition that he accompany Vincent. The
nerdy Thomas and the tough Vincent
This is a film that I wanted to like more than I did. The overall theme is
rather moving, and it is expressed quite well in the voice-over narration in
the final scene. However, in many places the film seems forced. When a film
chooses to present extreme situations to make a point, rather than using
subtlety, it is not making the audience feel for the characters, but rather
it is telling the audience what to feel for the characters. It is easier to
write melodrama than drama. Also adding to the forced feeling is the rather
stiff acting. I was often left feeling that I was watching actors rather
than associating with characters.
Despite its weaknesses, this is still an enjoyable film. It does showcase
many aspects of the modern American Indian experience. One example is the
presentation of oral storytelling tradition. The stories that several
characters tell play pivotal roles, and what is interesting about them is
that what is considered "truth" in the narrative. Instead of being a
accurate portrayal of events as they actually happened, they often have a
more symbolic meaning. Since this is billed as the first film to be written,
directed, and co-produced by a Native American, one feels comfortable that
one is learning about that subculture rather than being presented with the
usual, often distorted, image.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Living Out Loud (1998)
It is possible to be surrounded by people and yet still be alone. That is
what happens to Judith (Holly Hunter). Since divorcing her unfaithful
husband, she is isolated in her New York high rise apartment. Her usual
social group was shared by her ex-husband, and because of that link, she
avoids contact with those people. The only outside activity she engages in
is attending a nightclub to hear her favorite Jazz singer, Liz Baily (Queen
Latifah). Judith's divorce has been devastating, but it also offers her a
new beginning. Whereas she had been putting all of her energy into her
troubled marriage, she now can focus solely on herself. She even thinks
about pursuing the medical career that she had abandonded for her husband.
However, she is mostly lost and unsure of where she is and where she is
headed.
The doorman in her Judith's building, Pat (Danny DeVito), is also a kindred
spirit. His adolescent daughter has just died from cancer, and he has been
long since estranged from his wife. She threw him out because of his
restlessness. He has racked up large gambling debts, and he does not settle
into a meaningful job (like working for his brother who inherited a bar)
because he feels he destined for bigger things. He is also blindly groping
his way through a lonely life.
The film is about the two characters, and their relationship with each
other. He is attracted to her, but obviously she will not initially be
attracted to the older, short, balding, rotund man. If this were a
stereotypical story, the focus of the film would be about how the underdog
fights to win the romantic attention of the object of his affection.
However, this is an intelligent drama with much more depth. (Their
relationship has similarities to that of Esmeralda and Quasimodo, from "The
Hunchback of Notre Dame".) Although it is not completely successful in
drawing a total coherent picture, it is engaging and avoids predictability.
DeVito gives a typically superb performance as the confident but vulnerable
Pat. Although the character of Liz Bailey is underwritten and could have
been better utilized, Queen Latifah does a commendable job with the role.
Hunter has a difficult job in playing such a nuanced character. Judith is at
different times devastated, terrified, emboldened, and introspective.
Although the scripted evolution of the character is sometimes awkward,
Hunter is able to keep the character believable.
The film has its share of flaws. Judith's furtive attempt at a new romance
is rather nonsensical. Her friendship with Liz seems improbable. Pat's
suggested background does not match the character represented on screen.
That is, it is not understandable why his wife would have thrown him out.
Judith's husband is unilaterally sinister, but fortunately has minimal
screen time. Also, the epilogue is superfluous because it presents the
characters in exactly the state in which the viewer would have guessed. The
film utilizes an interesting technique of presenting Judith's mental
projections against her reality, so that the viewer can contrast she how
dreams her life to be and how she actually lives it, but this is initially
overused and then abruptly abandoned.
Despite its problems, the story is still enjoyable. Judith undergoes a
rebirth and she reclaims her independence, and the transformance is
realistically achieved in small steps. There are no melodramatic climaxes or
twists that try to overstate the problems and solutions of the characters.
The story always remains subdued and focused.
Recommended. Although it cannot seamlessly join the different parts into a
fully coherent result, the film laudably attempts to avoid formulas and
present an intelligent examination of kindred spirits.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Jalsaghar (1958)
[3.0/4.0]  (dialog in Bengali, English subtitles)
This film also has the English title "The Music Room".
Indian culture is thousands of years old and has undergone changes at
different times. This film symbolically deals with a recent change,
the decline of the landed gentry. Biswambhar Roy (Chhabi Biswas) spends
his time idly occupying his large, empty palace. Except for a few loyal
servants, he is alone. The meager remains of a large fortune are just
enough to support the decrepit household. Spurred by the sound of
distant music, he reviews his past in flashback.
At one time he is a rich and respected zamindar (landowner). Although
it is clear that his fortune is slipping, due to the nearby river which
is slowly swallowing his lands, he remains unconcerned with the details
of managing his estate. His main focus of interest is in music, and he
makes his jalsaghar the inner sanctum of his splendid palace. There he
gives frequent concerts, employing the finest musicians. One of his
tenants, Mahim Ganguly (Gangapada Basu), is accumulating wealth by
serving as a moneylender. Although Ganguly's fortune is waxing as Roy's
is waning, Ganguly always defers to Roy and pays him the courtesy and
respect that all tenants accord the zamindar.
The main conflict in the story is not between individuals, but between
the ways of life disturbed by the inevitable forces of change. Roy
represents the ideals of the past when prestige was passed through
bloodlines, while Ganguly represents the modern ideals of earned status.
The two men are not antagonists but in a way, they are rivals. Roy
contemptuously dismisses Ganguly's profession as undignified. Ganguly
is annoyed that people still submissively esteem the bankrupt landlord,
but do not fully respect him because he is "a self-made man, no
pedigree." It is implied that it is fate, not necessarily the actions
of the men, that is behind the shifting fortunes of Roy and Ganguly.
Although Roy was generally irresponsible, there was not much he could
have done to save his lands. As for Ganguly, had he existed at an
earlier time, he would not have had the opportunity to rise above the
level of his birth. Change is inescapable, and although it helps some,
it destroys others.
Satyajit Ray based the screenplay on the novel by Tarashankar Banerjee.
The cinematography is evocative as Ray attempts to extract layers of
meaning from the visuals. Ray intends to immerse the viewer in an ocean
of music and images to fully experience the beauty and loss of the old
order. Although Ganguly actually appears infrequently, Basu is able to
define the character's lack of culture without making him exaggerated.
The rest of the character is excellently drawn by inference, with the
distant sound of his electric generator, by servants informing Roy that
sahibs are visiting him. Biswas occupies the bulk of the screen time,
and effectively defines the character with restraint. Roy speaks very
little, so Biswas is able to communicate much of the character's
emotion simply through facial and physical expression. The story builds
the character to a crescendo at the final concert and symbolically at
the dawn of the new day. The main difficulty with the film is its
pacing and length. The extended musical numbers already prolong the
story, and an almost plodding pace is employed. The theme, although
familiar, is presented meaningfully.
Recommended. This film is not without flaw, but it is still a
powerful story. It feels too long for its material, but viewers who
appreciate classical Indian music and dance are rewarded with extended
performances.
--== Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/ ==--
---Share what you know. Learn what you don't.---

Title
Review for Snow Falling on Cedars (1999)
The timing of events often has a great impact on a person's life. The
central theme of this film is how an intimate relationship between two
people can be affected by a large, outside force beyond their control.
The central character in the story is newspaperman Ishmael (Ethan
Hawke), who writes for the town newspaper he inherited from his father
in a small hamlet in the Pacific Northwest. He is a war veteran
scarred by the loss of his childhood sweetheart, Hatsue (Youki Kudoh),
who terminated their long-standing relationship while he was fighting
overseas. The story begins when Hatsue's husband, Kazuo (Rick Yune),
is charged with the murder of a local fisherman.
Although the events of Kazuo's trial form the primary component of the
plot, the heart of the story is the relationship between Ishmael and
Hatsue, and the forces that doomed it. Director Scott Hicks skillfully
intermixes the two parallel stories. Their relationship is
sporadically recounted as flashbacks, from to their friendship as
children to their breakup as young adults. The force they could not
stop was World War II, and its residual effects on American society.
Anti-Japanese sentiment is a destructive force for the couple and a
primary component of the trial. The trial overtly explores the
elements that played more subtly between Ishmael and Hatsue.
The core of the film is satisfying but it occasionally becomes tiring
when the story overuses melodramatic elements. The issue of racism
injects melodrama, but breaks no new ground. The core of the story has
wrapped up when Ishmael talks with Kazuo's lawyer, Nels Gudmundsson
(Max von Sydow), about the helpless course of human life controlled by
fate. It is a moving scene that sums up the entire story.
Recommended. This is a slow, introspective film which examines closure
for things lost. Although the story overuses the issue of racism for
dramatic effect, the exploration of the central theme is a rewarding
experience.

Title
Review for Ride with the Devil (1999/I)
One of the most inspirational chapters in American history is the
Civil War. It has been the source of voluminous works of literature,
including numerous films. Many of those examine similar themes and use
familiar settings. This film is different in that it is set in one of
the lesser known theaters of the war -- the guerilla battles in the
state of Kansas.
The opening of the film gives a brief overview of the historical
situation. It explains the conflict between the two factions among the
residents of Kansas -- the Jayhawks, who are supporters of the Union,
and the Bushwhackers, who are supporters of the Confederacy. It goes
on to explain that instead of the groups battling each other with
regular armies, they attack each other in guerilla assaults; a
particularly brutal form of war that encompasses innocent civilians.
The story begins by introducing Jake Roedel (Tobey Maguire) and Jack
Bull Chiles (Skeet Ulrich), who are young men about to be sucked into
the developing political situation. Although his father is a German
immigrant, Jake identifies himself singularly as an American, and
particularly as a patriotic Southern supporter like all his friends.
When animosity between the two groups erupts into actual violence, the
boys do what honor dictates and join a loosely organized band of
Bushwhackers in their grave fight for control of the state.
This much of the narrative is typical of a war story. Naive young men
filled with pride and honor are thrust into the hell of war and become
little more than cannon fodder. What is unusual is that the story does
not attempt to show the protagonists in a positive light. The
Bushwhackers are drawn as ruthless terrorists who callously murder and
loot innocent civilians. It is not that the opposing side is intended
to be more pure, in fact they also commit their share of atrocities.
The point is that all war is horrible, but that civil war is
especially tragic because it is necessarily cannibalistic, with hatred
born of familiarity with and proximity to the enemy.
The story adds extra dimensions by injecting a relationship between
Jack and a civilian sympathizer, Sue Lee Shelley (Jewel Kilcher).
Another interesting facet is that one member of the Bushwhacker troop,
Daniel Holt (Jeffrey Wright), is a black man. Historically, most
blacks supported the Union, for obvious reasons, but this story
presents the case of one of the very few former slaves who fought for
the Confederacy.
Although the film has many compelling issues to work with, it is not a
very impressive effort. In order to keep the main character (Jake)
likeable, he is never shown to commit any of the brutality of his
mates. His distaste of cruelty does not mesh with his willingness to
associate with it.
The film is also careless in its presentation. It is jarring to see
men who live rough in the brush consistently wearing clean satin
vests. Director Ang Lee strives to present vivid and engaging imagery,
but some aspects, like the above and the obviously choreographed
battles are disingenuously excessive. It is worthy to note that
although most of the performances are forgettable, Maguire is
successful in presenting a believable character with a charismatic
performance.
Marginally recommended. Although it is well paced and cinematically
rich, the film is pedestrian because of a weak story. Except for the
performance of Tobey Maguire, nothing in the film is noteworthy, yet
the film is watchable. The historical component of the film is
involving, but the poorly developed story is a detriment to any issues
that might be examined.

Title
Review for Ideal Husband, An (1999)
The title of this film initially appears to refer to Sir Robert
Chiltern (Jeremy Northam), who is a respected member of Parliament. He
is popular and has a bright future, apparantly on the fast track to
higher offices. He is married to the equally respected and upright
Lady Gertrud Chiltern (Cate Blanchett). Sir Chiltern is put in a bind
when the coniving Mrs. Laura Cheveley (Julianne Moore) appears on the
scene. She has uncovered evidence of a past indiscretion by Chiltern,
and threatens to expose it if he does not support a dubious piece of
legislation in which she has a vested interested. He had already taken
a position against it, thinking it a scam, but now he must choose
between saving his reputation and career, or acting in his country's
best interest.
The common link to these three characters is the primary character,
Lord Arthur Goring (Rupert Everett). He is a close friend of both the
Chilterns, and was once engaged to Mrs. Cheveley, and because of the
entangled relationships, he is drawn in to the blackmail scheme. Added
to all this is Sir Chiltern's sister, Mabel (Minnie Driver), who has
been turning down a regular series of marriage proposals because she
desires Lord Goring. Goring is by far the most entertaining character.
He is an avowed bachelor, much to the consternation of his father, the
stuffy Earl of Caversham (John Wood). Goring epitomizes the
self-absorbed bachelor, taking nothing besides himself seriously. He
is utterly vain and dismissive of those things he does not care for.
Like a typical story by Oscar Wilde, this one has plenty of wry
dialog. The humor is derived from mistaken identities and crossed
communication. The situational variety of comedy is initially amusing,
but becomes annoying when it is overused in the climax. However, the
dialog never becomes tiresome, with all the best lines delivered by
Lord Goring.
Recommended. Although the story lacks depth, it is entertaining. The
characters' wrestling with morality and ethics is mostly
uninteresting, but the story is redeemed by its humor. The situation
comedy eventually becomes tedious, but the verbal fencing is
continuosly delightful and engaging.

Title
Review for Teen Kanya (1961)
[3.5/4.0]  (dialog in Bengali, English subtitles)
This film, with the English title "Three Daughters", was originally
composed of three segments, but only two ("The Postmaster" and
"Samapti") were screened because the third story ("Monihara") is still
in the process of restoration. Because of this, the film is sometimes
distributed under the title "Two Daughters." All the segments are
based on short stories by Rabindranath Tagore.
Nandal (Anil Chatterjee) is a postal worker, who after having lived
his entire life in the city, receives an assignment to be the
postmaster of a rural village. The back room of the tiny post office
is his living quarters, and all the household duties are tended to by
the orphan servant girl, Ratan (Chandana Banerjee). Nandal has a hard
time adjusting to village life which he finds difficult and monotonous.
Besides the lack of urban comforts, such as professional music
recitals, there is also the serious threat of malaria. Nandal becomes
attached to Ratan because of her sweetness and eagerness to please him,
so he begins to teach her to read and write.
Nandal contemplates requesting a transfer because rural life is
difficult for him and he misses the city. Ratan does not have such
options, her desires are much more simple, and although her station
in life does not offer much, it is all she requires and she does not
even consider that she could be anywhere else.
The success of the story is due to its restraint. Although Ratan is a
sympathetic character, it would have been too easy to make her pitiful.
She is unfortunate in that fate has placed her in a position of
restriction, but she is not portrayed as abused or exploited in an
attempt to force her character into a sorrowful state. Instead it is
the simplicity and purity of her spirit that make her endearing, and
the viewer cannot help but embracing her. Her innocence, dedication,
and warmth make her a bright star piercing the darkness.
The story shows that the overt events in life, while melodramatic, are
not necessarily the most significant. A loss through ignorance is often
more devastating than a loss through death. The story is moving as it
shows that the most precious things are sometimes taken for granted
because they are also not obvious. This is a story about duty,
commitment, loyalty, and attachment. These are serious topics and the
film perfectly combines its pieces into the simple story without any
wasted effort. It is not too long or too short, and it conveys its
message.
According to his mother, it is time for Amulya (Soumitra Chatterjee)
to get married. He has come home on vacation from his studies and just
wants to rest, but his mother has found a girl that she would like him
to marry. Amulya is not at all interested, but to appease his mother he
goes to see her. He has confirmed his mother's lack of judgement in such
matters, but she is persistent that he should get married. The only girl
of any interest to him is Mrinmoyee (Aparna Sen), nicknamed Puglee
("Crazy"), because she is a tomboy with no sense of feminine dignity.
She spends her time playing with boys, running around, climbing trees,
and the like. Although no one would see her as a suitable wife, Amulya
sees a fiery spirit that is increased in attractiveness in comparison
to the qualities that his mother finds desirable.
The story deals with desire and expectation, and how individuals are
laced in positions where they must evaluate their roles. What Amulya
is attracted to in the single girl is not possible to have in a wife.
When one sees the beauty of a wild animal and desires to capture that
beauty by keeping it as a pet, the creature is broken, and the beauty
of its spirit is lost by its imprisonment. In a way, Amulya is
attempting to tame the wild creature, but that may be a selfish act.
The main flaw with the film is that it runs too long. It starts well
but drags with slow progress towards the end. The cinematography has
less of the visual symbolism often used by Satyajit Ray, but is
adequate as this story has a mostly straight-forward narrative.
Highly recommended. "The Postmaster" is a perfect vignette. "Samapti"
is not as good in comparison, but still a solid effort. Satyajit Ray
superbly directs the film which is based on the powerful short stories
of Rabindranath Tagore.
--== Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/ ==--
---Share what you know. Learn what you don't.---

Title
Review for Whipped (1999)
The topic of romance and dating in American society is easily
relatable since most young people devote a large amount of energy to
dealing with it. Although they both eventually aim towards the common
target of marriage, men and women may have different approaches to and
attitudes towards dating. Men can be dishonest in their pursuit of
women simply to initiate a relationship in which sex plays an
important role. This film is about a group of male scammers, men who
will do or say anything in order to enter a sexual relationship with a
woman, and a woman who infiltrates and disrupts the group.
Four young men meet regularly on Sundays to discuss their dating
exploits of the past weekend. Brad (Brian Van Holt) is a Wall Street
type with athletic good looks. Zeke (Zorie Barber) is an unemployed
writer with a huge ego. Jonathan (Jonathan Abrahams) is less overtly
macho, and usually has fewer victory stories. The final individual,
Eric (Judah Domke), used to be a core member of the group, but he is
now somewhat viewed as an outsider since getting married.
The group's normal existence is perturbed when Brad, Zeke, and
Jonathan start dating a woman that they develop serious feelings for.
It becomes chaotic when they find they are all dating the same woman,
Mia (Amanda Peet). Mia's refusal to choose just one of the three,
along with the guys' refusal to give her up undermines their
friendship. Eric also becomes involved because the relationships with
Mia threaten to disband the men's club that is his only respite from
the drudgery of his married life.
The story is basically a comedy, with primarily dialog based humor and
witty observations of the almost military tactics that are involved in
the dating process. Not all of the gags work, many of them are simply
gross or pathetic, but others are creative and insightful. The frank
portrayal of jesting character attacks between male friends is
accurate and entertaining. It does attempt to present a thoughtful
premise as the framework for the plot, namely that men would be
miserable if their own tactics were used against them. However, any
philosophical issues are only explored in a cursory manner, since they
are used simply as a skeleton on which to build the plot rather than
as a source of creativity. The intent of the film is mainly to be
entertaining, and it succeeds in getting laughs from the audience. It
would have been a better film if it had explored the dramatic angle
that it pretended it had.
It is often difficult to construct a comedy primarily around dialog,
but writer and director Peter M. Cohen is successful in keeping the
comedy flowing. Although some of the developments appear contrived and
many of the transitions are forced, the humor creates a momentum that
propels the plot through its rough points. It is important to note
that the raunchy humor could be offensive to viewers who are not
comfortable with frank, and often crude, discussions of sexuality. The
original cut of the film garnered an NC-17 rating, which was reduced
to R after some of the dialog was toned down.
Although the marketing for the film indicates that it is a vehicle for
Amanda Peet, the role of Mia is actually less important, and less
interesting, than any of the four primary men. Peet is successful in
the role, but the character is limited in scope. All the four primary
male characters are well portrayed, although they occasionally become
exaggerated.
Recommended. The film does not set lofty goals, but it is successful
in generating laughs. The humor is primarily based around sexuality
and is definitely coarse, so it may not entertain a general audience.
Although little sexual content is displayed, the discussions about it
are explicit. The film is targeted towards a younger audience which is
as obsessed with the opposite sex as the film's characters.

Title
Review for Elizabeth (1998)
Being a monarch during times of prosperity and stability is safe and easy,
but when there is discord and dissatisfaction then it can be treacherous.
This is the story of the ascent to the throne by Henry VIII's daughter,
Elizabeth (Cate Blanchett). Although Henry had broken with the Catholic
Church, his daughter, Mary, who followed him reestablished Catholicism as
the official faith. She earned the nickname "Bloody Mary" for her relentless
persecution of Protestants, usually having them denounced as heretics and
burned at the stake. Mary's half sister, Elizabeth, is next in line for the
crown, but she is a Protestant and thus a potential threat, so Mary has her
imprisoned in the Tower of London, and Elizabeth's survival is placed in
doubt. Ultimately Mary's health fails and an almost unprepared Elizabeth
becomes the ruling monarch. However, her reign is anything but certain. The
country is bankrupt, the military is weak, foreign powers are threatening,
and there is internal dissension.
Being a novice at governance, Elizabeth is forced to rely on the opinions of
her advisors. The elder Sir William Cecil (Richard Attenborough) is
stressing that the safest action Elizabeth can take to stabilize her reign
would be to marry a foreign royal to establish a political alliance and to
produce an heir. However, Elizabeth's love interest is her longtime friend
Robert Dudley (Joseph Fiennes). Beyond that, she does not wish submit
herself to another man, and also wants England to remain strong and
independent. To help stabilize her authority, Elizabeth has the help of her
advisor Sir Francis Walsingham (Geoffrey Rush), who through guile and an
intelligence network, seeks to find and destroy all who threaten Elizabeth's
reign.
Elizabeth's fate is known through any reading of English history. Not only
does she survive the unsteady early days of her rule, she remains fiercely
independent, she never marries or produces and heir, and under her reign,
England enters a "Golden Age" and once again flourishes. The film ends when
an experienced and hardened Elizabeth establishes her power base, and it
stops short of her rebuilding of England. And although the manner in which
that was accomplished would have been interesting to see, the drama of her
ascendence to power is compelling enough to provide enough substance to
anchor the story.
One difficulty of telling a historical story is the necessity to condense
several different occurrences from a large time period into a story that
fits the running length of a film. The result of this is that characters and
events can become oversimplified in their presentation. This film has this
problem with several characters. Queen Mary is portrayed as nothing more
than a repulsive and spiteful boor. In his introductory scene, Walsingham is
presented as a ruthless and cold-hearted, and the character never evolves
beyond this single dimension. As an advisor, he is conveniently all-knowing
and all-powerful. Rush does not even play the character with anything
besides a single, stoic facial expression. Elizabeth's royal French suitor,
Duc d'Anjou, is presented as an exaggerated, foppish buffoon.
Although the direction of Shekar Kapur is mostly successful, there are times
when his directorial flourishes become distracting. The injection of jump
cuts when Elizabeth is practicing her speech before Parliament is jarring
because it does not fit with the mood of the rest of the film. The washing
out to white between the scenes when Elizabeth learns of her inheritance of
the crown served no purpose, and only made the direction apparent.
The strength of the film is the well written and well performed role of
Elizabeth. Blanchett credibly shows the character's evolution from a strong
willed but naive young woman, to the capable and inspired monarch who would
lift her country to prominence. Ultimately, the real story of Elizabeth is a
fascinating one, and the film successfully translates it to the screen.
Recommended. The film is hampered by exaggerated characters and gaudy
direction, but tells the interesting story of a fascinating individual.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for High Fidelity (2000)
American popular music may have changed in style as time has gone by,
but has remained constant in theme. The topics of romance and
heartbreak remain characteristic of the genre, reflecting the
obsessions of its youthful audience. This film uses popular music to
metaphorically represent the turbulent romantic life of its
characters.
The story begins as Rob Gordon (John Cusack) and his current
girlfriend Laura (Iben Hjejle) are breaking up their relationship. Rob
is the main character, a young record store owner who has classified
and cataloged his romantic failures as obsessively as his record
collection. He recounts his most troubling breakups and analyzes where
in the pantheon this latest one should be placed. Rob decides (aided
by an apparition of Bruce Springsteen) that in order to understand his
bad luck with romance, he must revisit and dissect each of his worst
breakups and understand the problems in the relationships that caused
them. The most enjoyable part of the film is the depth to which Rob
goes in exploring all aspects of his old relationships. It is an
intelligent approach that is not often seen in popular film.
In contrast to its serious side, Rob's connection to popular music
also anchors its humorous part. The record store he owns specialized
in rare and collectible vinyl records, and the two clerks who work for
him are indeed odd characters. There is the neurotic and meek Dick
(Todd Louiso), and unrestrained Barry (Jack Black). The elitist trio
sneer at all people, even customers, who have "lesser" tastes in
music. It is a construction that does not necessarily make them
likeable, but makes them entertaining. Barry in particular is often
overboard, but also causticly funny.
Although it is common to use voice over narration at the beginning of
a film to set context, or at the end of the film to provide an
epilogue, it is not often used by good films as prominent part of its
storytelling. This film uses soliloquy (having Rob talk directly to
the audience) to distracting excess. It is far too easy to have the
character intravenously feed the audience his inner thoughts. Good
craftsmanship could have expressed these feelings in a more indirect
manner, such as inter-character dialog and expressive performance. It
is surprising that veteran director Stephen Frears chose this route.
The other major complaint is the use of an overly melodramatic plot
device to develop Rob and Laura's relationship. The suddenness and
force of this occurrence feels manipulative. The weaknesses of this
film are surprising considering the body of work compiled by Stephen
Frears, whose films are generally more oblique and engaging.
Recommended. The film attempts to intelligently and realistically
examine the issue of relationships in modern life, and it is mostly
successful in this dimension. It also uses character based humor that
is frenetic, but still enjoyable. The film has definite weaknesses
which keep it from reaching its full potential, but it remains a more
thought-provoking exploration of romance than what is typically
produced.

Title
Review for Love Serenade (1996)
Life in the country can be slow and uneventful. For sisters Vicki-Ann and
Dimity, who live by themselves in rural Australia, their time is spent at
their jobs in a beauty salon and Chinese restaurant, and fishing. When an
unsuccessful disc jockey from a larger town, Ken Sherry, moves next door,
Vicki-Ann sees a potential husband in the small town's new celebrity.
However, the emotionally withdrawn Dimity also takes an interest in him and
becomes her sister's rival. The dour, unexpressive, Ken Sherry is often
speaking philosophically about love, and has no problem with being involved
with both sisters simultaneously.
It appeared to me initially that this film was marketed (in previews) as a
romantic comedy. Since that is a genre that I do not like, I had very low
expectations for the film, which may be a factor in explaining why I enjoyed
it so much. This film is really a comedy which explores the interaction of
several quirky characters. Although his screen time is limited, Dimity's
boss and proprietor of the restaurant, Albert Lee, is hilarious. A small
amount of magical realism is introduced in the recurring subtext of fish,
and its limited appearance is just enough to be amusing without being
distracting. The title is a reference to a song by Barry White, and it is
important to know who he is to fully appreciate the film. White was popular
in the 1970's and in his low, smooth voice he sang songs about making love,
which were often cheesy rather than romantic. White's songs are the favorite
of Ken Sherry and are played throughout the soundtrack. It becomes apparent
that Ken Sherry's views on love are limited to only the sentiments reflected
in Barry White songs.
Highly Recommended. This is quite an enjoyable, quirky film.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Jana Aranya (1976)
(Dialog in Bengali, English subtitles)
This film is also known by the English title "The Middleman".
The business world can be harsh and corrupt. This subculture is
unraveled in this story, which shows a young man's difficult
initiation into the life of a middleman. Somnath (Pradip Mukherjee)
is a recent college graduate who becomes a victim of fate when his
paper is improperly evaluated, simply because the grader did not
having the proper glasses. The result is that Somnath receives
passing marks, but does not achieve the honors level he should have
earned. This is no trifling error, because the job market is lean,
and Somnath's prospects are grim without an exceptional academic
record. This setup shows a harsh world, where opportunities are
scarce and people must often do whatever they can to survive.
Desperation breeds corruption, and nice guys finish last.
Somnath fights an uphill battle trying to enter the corporate world.
He mails off a multitude of job applications and receives very few,
unsuccessful interviews. The absurdity in some of the interview
questions (like "what is the weight of the moon?") reflect the
futility of his struggle. Each day he fights this impossible battle
and returns home to face his morose father (Satya Bandyopadhyay)
and cynical elder brother. Only his sister-in-law Kamala (Lily
Chakravarty) keeps a positive attitude about Somnath's ability to
eventually establish himself.
One day as Somnath is out in his hopeless job search, he runs into
Bhombol (Dipankar Dey) who tells him about an alternative to landing
a job -- joining the business world. Somnath has misgivings, but out
of alternatives, decides to give it a try. Bhombol gets Somnath
started on how to operate as a dalal, or middleman. The basics are
to buy one man's surplus on the cheap and sell to another man's need,
and to ply favors. Somnath gets set up with a desk and support staff,
and with some tips, he sets off into the business world. He initially
makes a successful transaction but learns a lesson about playing his
cards close.
Somnath has some successes and failures along the way, but he is
able to work some connections with his friends to set up a potential
sale to a chemical company. If the deal goes through, he stands to
make a handsome profit, but more than that, he needs it to establish
himself, otherwise he might not last much longer in the business
world. Somnath enlists the help of an associate, Mr. Mitter (Robi
Ghosh), who is a "public relations" expert. Somnath learns of the
incredible depth of corruption that must be indulged, and the
seediness of the business world. He also understands the other
meaning of dalal, pimp.
The world as represented in this story is extreme and bleak, but
Satyajit Ray has crafted a film that remains believable because
it is based in reality. The depiction of corruption in this story
is so pervasive that at times it feels exaggerated. However, all
of the events still appear plausible. Somnath is presented as an
innocent thrust into a foreign world of difficult choices. The
decisions he makes are a mixture of his own nature and the influence
of the forces around him.
He is obviously a man of principle, but he cannot ignore the
desperation of his situation. The opening scene of the film showed
a classroom of students writing their final college exam, and the
majority are cheating in one way or another, but not Somnath.
Somnath sees that he has never been rewarded for adhering to
principle, but his nature makes it difficult to do otherwise. Somnath
sees that his classmate Sukumar remains principled, but without
opportunities, Sukumar and his family live a life of poverty and
misery.
The acting performances are all outstanding. Mukherjee effectively
conveys all the emotions that Somnath experiences. He expresses
Somnath's anguish through expression and body language as well as
manner of speech. Ghosh is exceptional as the sleazy Mr. Mitter,
striking a balance between comic absurdity, and the distasteful
pragmatism in being part of a corrupt system.
The story is perfectly paced as it slowly builds to a wrenching
climax. Although it is apparent early that Somnath will be descending
into a world without morals, his progression is so moderated and
gradual that it is gripping. Somnath begins as a naive young man, and
when his journey culminates, he stands staring at his reflection in
a man he despises. He sees that Mr. Mitter lives at peace with who he
is. In Mitter's personal life he is an ordinary family man, while his
professional life necessitates swimming in sleaze. Somnath cannot detach
himself so easily. The fact that his is a principled person in a world
without scruples causes him agony, but is it worse than an uncertain
future for both him and his family? It is easy to talk about the
shallowness of the pursuit of money when one has it, but a life without
means can be truly horrible. Somnath has a exceptionally difficult
decision to make.
Highly recommended. The film does feel extreme in its portrayal of
underbelly of the business world, but everything it depicts also has a
believable foundation. It is a gripping story about the way in which
desperation can breed corruption.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
Rushmore Academy is a prestigious private school and is also the main
passion of one of its worst students, Max Fischer. The reason Max is a bad
student is not because he lacks intelligence or because he cannot apply
himself. Rather, it is because he has devoted all of his energy in
participating in a multitude of extracurricular activities to the extent
that his grades are sagging. Max's most focused talent is as a playwright,
and it was his proficiency with drama at a young age that was the basis for
his admittance to Rushmore, not wealth like most of the other students. Just
as Max is being threatened with expulsion unless his academic performance
improves, he meets Rosemary Cross, a second grade teacher, and is instantly
smitten. Although a romance between the two would seem impossible to anyone
else, Max's unbounded determination and self confidence compel him to pursue
her. Age never appears to be a barrier for Max, as his best friend in school
is much younger than him, and he has established a friendship with an older,
wealthy Rushmore alumnus, the industrialist Herman Blume. However, Max's
friendship with Herman becomes a rivalry because Herman has also become
romantically interested in Rosemary. Herman's age and wealth does not
necessary give him an advantage over Max, because Herman is married, and he
is also a jaded man with a stiff personality.
The setup for the story is not an original one. Countless films have been
made about the misfit teen who pursues love and stumbles through many
obstacles along the way. Usually these films provide a skeleton plot and an
overdose of sophomoric humor. This film, thankfully, is a different entity
entirely. The characters are more than stereotypes, the humor does not
insult the viewers intelligence, and the plot is never predictable. In fact,
it is not really even a "teen comedy" as it initially might appear to be.
Although the humor is based mostly on the quirkyness of the characters, it
does not resort to cheap jokes for easy laughs. The drama provides plenty of
substance. The younger children characters, which are usually relegated to
cute comedy sources, are developed as full characters.
Bill Murray gives an exceptional performance as Herman, who is different
from the manic characters that Murray usually plays. Herman exists most of
the time with a blank, world-weary expression. This is a difficult role to
play, since body language and timing need to be utilized properly, and a
lesser actor would not have been able to pull it off. Newcomer Jason
Schwartzman is also successful as Max. He is able to express Max's youthful
zeal without going overboard.
Recommended. This is a fresh, entertaining story that shows that films based
around high school students need not be moronic. It has involving drama and
is also a consistently funny comedy.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Pather Panchali (1955)
[3.5/4.0]  (dialog in Bengali, English subtitles)
This film, with the English title "Song of the Little Road", is the
first component of Satyajit Ray's "Apu Trilogy".
The story begins with the introduction of the Roy family. The anchor
of the Roy family is Sarbojaya (Karuna Bannerjee). Because her husband
Hari (Kanu Bannerjee) is often out of work, she has the difficult duty
of managing all the daily needs of the family with meager resources.
Hari is not overly concerned with the family's plight because he more
concerned with spiritual needs than with material needs. He works odd
jobs as a priest and a clerk so that they scrape by, and he spends his
free time composing his literature. Hari's general view is that
"whatever God does is for the best." Although their most basic needs
are met, Sarbojaya knows that they live a precarious existence. Their
house is in disrepair, their daughter Durga (Runki Banerjee as the
small child, Uma Das Gupta as the adolescent) is acquiring a bad
reputation by stealing fruit from a neighbor's orchard, and it is
sometimes a struggle to make sure everyone has enough to eat. Hari's
elderly aunt, Indir (Chunibala Devi) also lives with the Roys, but
Sarbojaya dislikes how she spoils Durga. Sarbojaya, who is pregnant
as the story opens, eventually gives birth to a son, Apu (Subir
Bannerjee). Because Hari is often away working, Sarbojaya is the
backbone holding the family together.
The family's poverty is no drag on the spirits of the children. Durga
and Apu make their own world adventurous and carefree. Even though
they miss treats like being able to buy sweets from the traveling
candy man, they enrich their lives with the multitude of simple
pleasures available to them. From the joy of getting drenched by the
monsoon, to the thrill of traveling across the countryside to see a
train, Durga and Apu do not miss any pleasures of childhood. It is
only the responsibilities of the adult world that gnaw at the spirit
of the individuals. It is perhaps this specter that keeps Durga from
maturing. Her mother tells her that she should be more helpful in the
household, but Durga's only interest is in playing. As Durga watches
one of her friends get married, she gazes forlornly knowing that it is
difficult for a poor girl to get a marriage arranged. It is as if she
knows impending adulthood cannot be avoided. If she could choose, she
would probably want to spend her entire life as a child.
Although the trilogy is centered around his character, Apu himself has
a diminished role in this story. He is only a young boy through all the
events. The primary characters are really the women, and they symbolize
the major stages of life. The irrepressible Durga represents the
carefree nature of childhood, when dependence on parents allows the
spirit to be free. The somber Sarbojaya represents the heavy
responsibilities of adulthood, when life is a serious matter and the
needs of self and others are a constant struggle. The fragile Indir
represents the precariousness of old age, when the return to dependence
can become a shackle if one is restricted by
poverty.
Perhaps the only aspect that indicates that this film was made decades
ago is the quality of the print. In all other aspects, it displays a
remarkable moderness. Although the story is set in the 1920's, the
issues that it deals with are timeless. Only the absence of
technological advances (motorized vehicles, electric light, etc) and
the style of clothing indicate the time period. All the acting
performances are flawless. This is no small feat considering the depth
to which each character is explored. In terms of cinematography, it is
almost difficult to believe that this was Satyajit Ray's first feature
film. He displays a virtuoso mastery of the medium on par with any
filmmaker, regardless of era. The main narrative is interspersed with
simple and evocative scenes of nature, like water bugs skimming back
and forth over the surface of a pond. These images, along with the
languid pace of the story, serve to underscore the individual's
insignificant presence in the greater universe. Whatever the fate of
the Roy family, the world continues in its eternal rhythms unperturbed.
With this, his first film, Ray immediately established himself as a
master of Indian and international cinema. Although all aspects of
the story are characteristically Indian, he brings out concerns and
struggles shared by people in every corner of the world. This film
deservedly won several international film awards, including the
appropriately named "Best Human Document" at the Cannes Film Festival.
Highly recommended. This is an absorbing and moving drama. Ray is
able to portray the vagaries of the human condition in a simple,
poignant story.
--== Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/ ==--
---Share what you know. Learn what you don't.---

Title
Review for Train To Pakistan (1998)
[Screened at the Cinequest Film Festival 9, San Jose]
[3.0/4.0]  (dialog in Hindi, English subtitles)
The Punjab in 1947 pre-partition India is a powder keg. As the British are
about to pull out of their colonial holding, there are many people who would
like to have a new, single country, but instead sectarian and ethnic
prejudice is apparently going to create two new states -- the predominantly
Muslim Pakistan and the predominantly Hindu and Sikh India. The unfortunate
side effect of this is that many people living on their ancestral lands are
going to find themselves on the wrong side of the new border, since the
Punjab itself is being split in the middle. Mano Majra is a fairly typical
village; peaceful and quiet. Although its classes are stratified into the
unequal distribution of Sikh landlords and Muslim laborers, this economic
division has not been a source of tension. Both communities coexist
peacefully, but there are storm clouds on the horizon.
The communist party has sent the earnest Iqbal to organize worker and
discourage sectarian violence with the ultimate goal of keeping India
united. The local moneylender has been robbed and murdered, so the police
initially suspect the newcomer and detain him. There have also been many
agitators travelling the countryside who are encouraging the Muslims to
fight the Hindus and Sikhs, and vice versa. Because of this, the local
magistrate thinks maybe he can pin the crime on insurgent Muslim bandits
(although he knows it was really done by local Sikh bandits) and connect
Iqbal to them as an agitator. In jail, Iqbal meets Jagga Singh, one of the
local Sikh bandits who is following in the general profession of his
ancestors. Jagga is in love with Nooran, the daughter of a Muslim peasant,
but their union is doomed because of the difference of their ethnicity,
although Jagga naively declares that he is neither Sikh nor Muslim, but only
a bandit.
The magistrate is the narrator of the story, but is a flawed protagonist.
His main goal is to maintain peace and order in the district, but he is
perfectly willing to sacrifice few innocents. But can this action be
condemned? If he does not act, it appears a wholesale slaughter is possible,
as a trainload of dead Hindus and Sikhs sent from Pakistan demonstrates. His
cold-heartedness is apparently the result of the loss of his family. The
death of his daughter (we are not told how she died, but violence is
intimated) is a ghost that has swallowed his spirit. As a surrogate for both
his daughter and his wife, he detains a young itinerant dancing girl. The
girl herself symbolically represents the lost innocence of the subcontinent.
Ultimately the magistrate realizes that he must send the girl with the other
Muslims who are fleeing to Pakistan for their own safety.
The story is based on the novel by Kurshwant Singh. Anyone familiar with the
history of the events will recognize this as an accurate depiction of all
the factors leading to the tragedy; from the ability of radicals to exploit
longstanding ethnic differences to the way a small spark of unrest can
quickly escalate into an inferno, and to the way those who wish to control
the situation are rendered into helpless observers. The main problem with
the film is that it is too ambitious. Since this is a novel adapted to a
screenplay, it tries to fit as much of the narrative of the original work
into the running length of a film.
Recommended. The drama can be heavy-handed, but that is not unusual for
Indian productions. It does accurately portray the many aspects of the
issues it presents.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Sweet and Lowdown (1999)
The history of Jazz music is filled with interesting characters, often
talented and flawed individuals who excel at their skills, but unable
to succeed by normal standards. This is a fictional story presented as
semi-documentary about a supremely talented Jazz guitarist and his
obscure life. On the surface, this appears to be a typical Woody Allen
film, sans Allen as an actor. It features typical Allen elements, a
flawed antihero, love of music, and an examination of the redemptive
value of art.
Emmet Ray (Sean Penn) is a legendary guitarist who is hailed by
aficionados, but generally unknown outside Jazz circles. Because of
his lack of breakthrough success, little is know about his past, and
what is known may be exaggerated, or even false. The structure of the
film is that of a documentary with dramatic recreations. Several music
enthusiasts and historians relate what they know about Ray in talking
head format, and their stories flow into extended dramatic portrayals
without narration.
Ray's story centers around the peak of his career. As an itinerant
musician, he is able to dazzle women and has a different girlfriend in
the different parts of the country. On day on the Atlantic City
boardwalk, he encounters the mute Hattie (Samantha Morton). Although
he is initially not much enamored of her, her quiet character clearly
forms a complement to his outgoing, loud persona. He reluctantly
allows her to accompany him and his traveling band. Eventually, the
renegade artist pays a price for his lack of conscience, but like a
true artist, he never is able to (nor really wants to) reform.
Woody Allen film generally fall into three categories: comedies,
engaging dramas with humor, and engaging dramas without humor. This
film does not fit easily into any of those slots, and this iconoclasm
is not a virtue. The little humor that does exist is very simple and
uninspired. The drama of the film is unmoving. The acting, which is
usually a strong feature of Allen films, is hamstrung by poorly
sketched characters, with the exception of Morton as Hattie.
Not recommended. By Woody Allen standards, this is a bad film. By
general standards, it is merely slow and dull. The drama is not
engaging, and there is little humor. It attempts to examine the
typical Allen antihero, the loutish artist, but it fails to construct
an interesting story.

Title
Review for Metropolitan (1990)
Most of us are outsiders to the high-society debutante subculture, and so is
Tom Townsend. The association with some of his friends leads to an encounter
with some members of this group and he begins to associate with them more.
He not a complete stranger to this world, but his life in a simple Manhattan
apartment with his mother is much different than the more opulent lifestyles
of his new friends. However, money is not an issue with this group, so he
does not have trouble fitting in.
Although the film at first glance may seem to be an exploration of the
society subculture, it really is not. It is really about the interactions of
the members of the group, and the characters are very well developed. Tom is
initially befriended by Nick, who encourages him to continue his association
with the group even though Tom claims to despise the ideals that are
represented. Essentially, Tom is no more or less deep than these people who
are often described as shallow. In fact, being members of the upper classes
(or Urban Haute Bourgeoisie, as one character names it) make the people no
more or less interesting, they just hang out at different places.
Highly Recommended. The film has an array of intersting characters, and is
wickedly funny in many places.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Eyes of Tammy Faye, The (2000)
Many media observers have stated that modern American news coverage by
the mass media has shifted from substantive issue exploration to
tabloid journalism. In an intense competition to garner the most
viewers, issues are presented in a summary manner with only the
salacious details covered. This film is a documentary exploration of a
real individual, Tammy Faye Bakker, at the heart of one particular
scandal. It attempts to portray a broader picture than what could be
understood from news headlines.
In the late 1980's the television empire of Christian evangelists Jim
and Tammy Faye Bakker crumbled beneath allegations of adultery and
corruption. The pair had launched and run the successful PTL (Praise
The Lord) television ministry, which included a broadcast network and
sprawling theme park. Investigative reporting eventually uncovered an
affair between Jim Bakker and a ministry staffer which brought scandal
to the ministry, but it was the eventual revelation of embezzlement
that undid the Bakkers' empire. The public humiliation of the couple
was eagerly covered by the mass media.
The film gives a chronological recounting of Tammy Faye's biography,
concentrating on the details of the collapse of the PTL network. It
divides the events into several chapters which chronicle specific
upturns and downturns in Tammy Faye's fate.
Many viewers will remember Tammy Faye from the original press coverage
as a freakish, maudlin character sporting heavy layers of clownish
make up. The coverage portrayed her as a weepy, cloying whiner and as
a result outsiders may not have had a sympathetic opinion of her. Many
view television evangelists as inherently corrupt, and some were happy
to see the Bakkers punished for living a lavish lifestyle on viewer
donations. Some may have been happy to see the ministers publicly
humiliated for not living up to the principles they preached. The act
of preaching is intrinsically a patronizing relationship between the
preacher and congregation. When a broadcast medium is used for the
communication, some viewers will be offended by the assumption that
the they need to be preached to.
The reality presented by the film shows a less exaggerated, although
still odd, portrait. Tammy Faye lacked the judgmental vitriol of other
evangelists, as demonstrated by her unconditional acceptance
homosexuals and HIV infected patients from the moment the issue came
to public awareness. Although the Bakkers did live well, off the
contributions of others, they do appear to be less corrupt than many
of their contemporaries.
The basic purpose of a documentary is to frame a factual topic and
present the events in a manner that is enlightening and entertaining,
and this film succeeds at this level. For a documentary to excel, it
must raise a larger question and relate the story to a more esoteric
exploration, which this film falls short of. Although it is hampered
by the unwillingness of some of the key participants in the events to
be interviewed, the film is successful in constructing a coherent
narrative. The tone of the story is intentionally kept light in order
to present the quirkiness of the individuals to be entertaining. The
presentation is certainly sympathetic to Tammy Faye, but it does not
shy away from displaying her oddness.
Recommended. The film presents a detailed perspective on events that
were covered by the mass media, and shows that there is a story more
substantive and interesting than the sensational coverage may have
indicated. It falls short of exploring any serious philosophical
issues that a viewer might expect of a documentary, but it is an
entertaining insight into the world of television evangelism, and of
one particularly intriguing individual.

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
We know William Shakespeare as the giant of English literature, but who was
he before he was established? This is the question addressed by this film.
As the story opens, Will Shakespeare is starting work on his latest play,
the adventure/comedy, "Romeo and Ethel the Sea Pirate's Daughter". During
this time period, the theater is of questionable repute and is always under
threat of being shut down if the common mores are offended. The owner of the
Rose Theater, Philip Henslowe, is pressuring Shakespeare to quickly finish
and put on the play so he can ease his heavy debt burden. Viola De Lesseps
is a young woman from a rich family who is in love with the theater, and
fancies the works of Shakespeare in particular. She would love to be an
actor, but in those days women are barred from the stage. She furtively
dresses as a man, and lands the role of Romeo. Shakespeare falls in love
with Viola shortly before discovering that she is in his play. They pursue a
secret romance, even though her marriage to Lord Wessex has been arranged by
her family and approved by the queen.
It is not necessary to be deeply familiar with the works of Shakespeare to
enjoy this film, but it helps to have a good knowledge of "Romeo and
Juliet". Since it is a work in progress as the story unfolds, we see how
many of Shakespeare's experiences influence the actions and dialogue of the
play, often in comic ways. Cleverly, we see that the experiences of Will and
Viola parallel those of Romeo and Juliet. This technique was previously done
in the 1989 French-Canadian film Jesus of Montreal. (I would recommend for
anyone who enjoyed this film to also see that one.) Great effort was made
with the cinematography, set, and costume to accurately reflect the time
period, and at no point does it feel that what is presented is anything
other than the end of the 16th century.
The film is not without flaws. The Lord Wessex character is too convenient a
villain, and there is a partly deus ex machina resolution. However, to the
film's credit, it avoids crowd-pleasing sentiment and stays with its
intended direction. The dialog is consistently clever and witty. The acting
is superb, particularly Joseph Fiennes and Gwyneth Paltrow as the two leads.
Recommended. Admirers of Shakespeare will love it, but non-afficionados will
also find it an enjoyable comedy.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Six Days in Roswell (1998)
This film was screened at Cinequest 10, the San Jose film festival.
Human folklore has always contained references to mythical beings
whose existence could never be rationally proven. At earlier times in
history these beings were often woodland creatures and spiritual
entities. In modern times, these have been replaced by
extra-terrestrial beings and unidentified flying objects (UFO's). This
film is a light-hearted exploration of an annual festival held in
Roswell, New Mexico. The festival commemorates the supposed crash of
an actual flying saucer containing intelligent creatures from another
realm, which was covered up by the U.S. government. This film is a
semi-documentary that examines the odd subculture that celebrates this
modern folklore.
The structure of the film consist of one man traveling to Roswell to
attend the festival, and his encounters with the many odd attendees.
In concept, the film is similar to the recent Trekkies, and this not a
coincidence. This film is produced by Roger Nygard, who directed
Trekkies, and the correspondent/narrator is Rich Kronfeld, who was one
of the "trekkies" presented in that film. This presents an odd role
reversal for Kronfeld, who was one of the odd fans in Trekkies, but is
the "sane" investigator in this film. Kronfeld executes his role
perfectly, because although he is clearly more eccentric that an
average person, he seems normal compared to the alien believers, and
his dry wit highlights the commentary.
A back story is injected to give the film structure beyond simply
compiling footage of the festival. The story purports that the insular
Kronfeld (who still lives with his mother and has never left his home
state of Minnesota) joins a group of enthusiasts to travel to Roswell
to determine whether alien visitors actually exist. Kronfeld is shown
at home, at work, and with other people back in Minnesota. Although
this setting has its own quirky flavor, it is meant to present a
contrasting frame of reference to which to compare the truly bizarre
setting of Roswell. The filmmakers readily admit that much of this
story is fabricated.
The festival at Roswell is too odd to be fiction. The belief in aliens
is one thing, but the extent of fascination some people have is
incredible. The landscape of Roswell is transformed into a surreal
landscape, with apparent non-humans roaming everywhere. Kronfeld's
participation and interaction with the people is wry and amusing.
Instead of simply being a passive inquisitor, Kronfeld intentionally
becomes a character in the story. When Kronfeld asks one of the
numerous trinket vendors if one of his alien spaceships is not simply
a Star Wars X-Wing fighter, the vendor responds that simply calling
anything alien will make it sell. This quick scene typifies the
atmosphere, where anything and everything remotely alien is
celebrated.
The footage is primarily a composition of the many sights and events
of the festival. These vary from an outrageous fashion show to a
serious debate about the credibility of the evidence for alien life.
The footage culminates in the unbelievably kitschy production of
"Roswell: The Musical".
Highly recommended. Although the film has a documentary format, it
departs from the genre by trying to be funny and entertaining rather
than insightful. Because of this focus, it takes the liberty of adding
contrived, staged footage to provide a backstory to the actual
coverage of the festival. The film succeeds in being entertaining,
partly because it composes the rich source material into a coherent
collage, and because the staged footage is actually funny so its humor
makes up for the betrayal of the format.

Title
Review for Saving Grace (2000)
Films with a central plot revolving around marijuana use are not
uncommon, but they typically target a young, counter-culture audience.
This film is an oddity in that it is centered around marijuana, but it
is seeking a sedate audience that would want to see a cute, uplifting
sleeper.
The story begins with the newly widowed Grace (Brenda Blethyn) trying
to deal with the debt she inherits from her late husband. She has
lived a pastoral life on the English seacoast passing her time with
gardening, but she is suddenly faced with the prospect of losing her
house to creditors. The idea comes to Grace and her pot smoking
handyman, Matthew (Craig Ferguson), that they could solve the
financial problems by using Grace's gardening expertise to save
Matthew's dying marijuana crop.
It is not hard to guess where events lead. The rural neighbors are
supportive of the members of their clan, ignoring that they are
indulging in criminal activities. Matthew's girlfriend disapproves of
his irresponsible activities. The pair get involved in dangerous
circumstances, but never come across anything they cannot handle.
The positive aspect of the film is that it does have humorous moments,
even if those are merely plays on stereotypes. Director Nigel Cole
gets the benefit of a solid performance from veteran Blethyn, but adds
little of substance. The thin premise cannot support much, and hence
standard archetypes and story development are used to allow the
audience to follow along without expending much effort. Although the
combination of Waking Ned Devine and Cheech and Chong may sound
intriguing, this film is barely noteworthy.
Not recommended. The film uses standard characters in a formulaic plot
in an attempt to present the audience with a light, charming story.
The result is a tiresome, predictable adventure that only becomes more
silly as it goes along. If it were not for the quirkiness added by the
marijuana aspect, the film would have been devoid of substance. It
does occasionally elicit laughter, but is mostly boring.

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
The art of puppetry is commonly associated with children's
entertainment. However, when taken to its heights, it is sublime and
abstract, requiring the puppeteer to be both a dextrous manipulator
and an expressive performer. While acting requires the actor to
communicate mood and emotion through kinesthetic expression, puppetry
demands the same expressiveness while adding the extra dimension of a
separate body, one which is more difficult to control.
This curious film begins with Craig Schwartz (John Cusack), an out of
work puppeteer, looking for gainful employment. He is a master of his
art, but because he is unwilling to debase his talent for commercial
success, he must find some type of menial work to help support himself
and his pet-addicted wife, Lotte (Cameron Diaz). Craig happens to find
a position where some of his talents give him an advantage. His
dextrous fingers make him a superior file clerk, and he gets a job
with a mysterious filing company.
>From its outset, it is clear that the film will be unusual and
interesting. The opening scene of real puppetry is haunting and
mesmerizing. Lotte's eclectic menagerie of exotic animals portends an
odd, expressive story. It is not surprising that the director of this
film, which has a strong foundation in vivid imagery, comes from a
background of directing music videos. Although that medium is usually
characterized by insipid depictions of musicians and singers
unconvincingly pretending to be actually performing, a handful of
directors are able to inject real creativity into their craft, and
Spike Jonez is widely recognized as one of them. Among his works are
the Beastie Boys' Paranoid and Weezer's Buddy Holly. Jonez capably
translates his talents to the big screen with this film and produces a
work of stunning originality.
The emergence of more narrative developments fully launch the film to
its "cruising altitude". First, Craig becomes smitten with a sexy,
sassy coworker, Maxine (Catherine Keener), who is a stark contrast to
the dowdy Lotte, and proceeds to pursue her. The second, and more
momentous, development is that Craig accidentally discovers a tunnel
in his office that leads to an alternate reality. It seems that
whoever enters the tunnel becomes temporarily transported within the
mind of contemporary actor John Malkovich (John Malkovich). The
participant experiences all of Malkovich's sensations for a short time
before being abruptly dumped beside a New Jersey highway.
The most interesting aspect of the story is that the audience shares
in the experience of "being John Malkovich". That is, the role played
by the actor is that of the actor himself, therefore instead of seeing
the character on screen as a fictitious person (which he surely is),
the impression created is that the John Malkovich of the film is the
real John Malkovich, thus the viewers have the feeling that they are
peering into the everyday existence of the actor, John Malkovich.
The film is not flawless, as some inconsistencies are conveniently
ignored. However, this is dwarfed by all the other rewarding aspects
of the film. The film aspires to tell a story that is many dimensions
deeper than a typical movie, and it is highly effective in doing so.
Highly recommended. This is a film of exceptional imagination and
quirky curiosity. The surreal story is engagingly developed and its
many complexities are interwoven with deft craftsmanship. Director
Spike Jonez scores a breakthrough in his first feature film by
composing a clear vision for this complex and highly entertaining
effort. Viewers who desire a familiar, formulaic effort may find the
film difficult to digest, but anyone who appreciates originality and
creativity will enjoy this film.

Title
Review for Tian yu (1998)
(This film was released under the English title "Xiu Xiu: The
Sent-Down Girl".)
The Chinese Cultural Revolution was a period when government policies
were instituted to achieve idealistic reforms, but which sometimes
brought devastating consequences. One such policy was the program to
send city youth to the countryside to learn skills from the rural
craftspeople. Although the goal was to provide an alternate education
for a base of workers who would strengthen the republic, these
"sent-down" youth might find themselves isolated in the countryside in
a struggle with bureaucracy to try to get back to the city and their
families. This is the backdrop for this film, a tale of innocence lost
and a symbolic presentation of how simple human corruption can topple
tenuously constructed idealism.
Xiu Xiu (Lu Lu) is a Chinese girl living in the city. She is young and
inexperienced, and thus embraces the government policy of service that
ask young people to become educated in the countryside. She expects to
serve her country and return to her family when her service is
completed. Her assignment takes her to a powdered milk factory in the
remote reaches of Tibet, but she is quickly reassigned to learn horse
herding, with the goal of creating a young womens' cavalry.
The initial setup is given by a voice over narration from a childhood
friend of Xiu Xiu. Its past-tense reference gives a sense of
forboding, making it apparent that tragedy will befall the characters.
In the halcyon days of youth, Xiu Xiu is a lively girl who aspires to
serve her country, but it also represents the spirit of naivete with
which people clung to in this chapter of Chinese communism. It was
thought that simple devotion and organized hard work were the only
necessities in building the nation, but ignored was the fact that
simple human weakness will introduce corruption and exploitation.
Her apprenticeship is with Lao Jin (Lopsang), a Tibetan man who is an
expert rider. Although it might be initially seem inappropriate to
leave a young girl alone on the steppes with a man, it happens that
Lao Jin has an emasculating battle injury that renders him unable to
have a sexual relationship. This in conjunction with a spotless
service record enables the authorities to allow Xiu Xiu to be left
alone in a single tent with Lao Jin. Although he may be considered
less that a full man by the locals who know him, Lao Jin is an
effectual and fearless horseman. He stoically goes about his duties as
a master of his element. He is a powerful, capable man who controls
his own destiny, which stands in stark contrast to Xiu Xiu.
Xiu Xiu is not happy with her situation. Although the high plains are
a beautiful place, with piercing starlit nights, and vast open
expanses, it is a difficult place to live. For a girl raised in the
city, it is difficult to live such a bare existence, where even taking
a bath is a luxury. Xiu Xiu dutifully performs her assignments in the
hopes of eventually returning home to her family. However, as the days
drag on, she gets no word about the completion of her assignment, and
she begins to wonder if she has been abandoned and forgotten by the
authorities.
One day a trader comes by Xiu Xiu. He hints to her that he is well
connected back at headquarters, and that peddling influence could help
Xiu Xiu get a transfer back to the city. Although she is young and
naive, Xiu Xiu may have been able to see the trader's ulterior motives
if she was not gripped with the overwhelming desire to leave Tibet.
She begins an affair with him, mostly to gain an influential friend,
but partly because loneliness has made him attractive to her. All
attraction is shattered when other men slowly begin arriving at the
tent; all of them bragging about the influence they wield at
headquarters. The depth of Xiu Xiu's desperation causes her to have
relationships with all the men, in an attempt to curry favors. She
becomes blind to the fact that the more she gives in to them, the less
likely it actually is that they would want to have her transferred.
Although Lao Jin has grown to care for Xiu Xiu, he cannot help but be
repulsed by what she has let herself become. His skills and mastery of
the countryside kept them alive and well, but he is powerless to stop
the exploitation of Xiu Xiu, because it is a choice she has made. This
reflects situations when corrupt government policies bring misery, and
good people can only watch powerlessly and pity the victims.
The two acting performances are effective, with a standout performance
by Lopsang. The story is gripping, but occasionally exceeds into
melodrama. The film was banned in China for its sexual and political
content, but it does not criticize the intentions of government
policies, only the nearsightedness and ability for corruption.
Highly recommended. This film is a wrenching tale that typifies some
of the blind policies of the Cultural Revolution. It is filled with
inspiring cinematography, where the rugged plains symbolically reflect
the human soul, which can both contain beauty and treachery.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Getting to Know You (1999)
Bus depots are not cheerful places. Often the people found inside are
down on their luck, running away, or just poor. It is appropriate that
a bus station is the setting for this film. It is a story of people
towing their emotional baggage through the dreary way-points of their
lives, trying to reach a better destination.
Siblings Judith (Heather Matarazzo) and Wesley (Zach Braff) are in
transit, both literally and figuratively. They have just returned from
a visit with their uncommunicative, institutionalized mother Trix
(Bebe Neuwirth). Now they are waiting at the depot for buses that will
take them to different destinations. Wesley is starting college, but
Judith is still in high school. Their father Darrell (Mark Blum) has
severed all ties with them, so they are virtually orphans. As the
story opens, it is clear that Wesley and Judith have had a difficult
family life, although the nature of their problems is not initially
specified. It is clear that the two of them have provided the support
to each other that has been denied by their parents.
While waiting for the buses, Judith is approached by Jimmy (Michael
Weston), who claims he went to high school with her. Since her family
has moved so many times, Judith cannot recollect if she has ever seen
Jimmy before. She initially tries to avoid him, but due to boredom and
the desire to distance her from the studious and dour Wesley, she
begins talking to Jimmy. Mostly she listens because it is difficult to
out-talk the loquacious Jimmy. He says he likes to travel, and at the
very least he demonstrates this by going to different places in all
the stories he tells. He talks of some of the regulars in the station
and also constructs the stories of other travelers whose conversations
he has overheard.
The film is an adaptation of short stories by celebrated modern
American author Joyce Carol Oates. It is based on three separate
stories from the collection "Heat". Although in the book the three are
not connected, screenwriter and director Lisanne Skyler weaves them
together by having the characters voice them to each other. This
clever technique allows the stories to be told in a context where they
are relevant, and it also allows the characters to reveal themselves
in the process of telling and interpreting the stories.
The story begins opaquely as the characters are wrestling with a past
that is unexplained. However, as the narrative progresses, the events
that shaped the individuals form. Through flashback, Judith and
Wesley's family life is reconstructed and understood. Judith (and the
viewer) slowly connects with Jimmy by listening as he reveals himself
in the stories he tells, and as other characters in the bus station
contribute their own stories about him. The siblings are at an
important time in their lives. As children they have always been
together and relied on each other, but they are becoming adults, they
are going their separate ways. The film captures the essence of their
struggle, how people cope with difficulty, and how life experiences
shape them and influence their decisions.
The film is not flawless. The drama is sometimes forced, and it
sometimes feels the need to explicitly reveal events and situation
that have already been implied. This is especially true as Jimmy is
understood. Everything that needs to be understood about Jimmy is
revealed indirectly in the stories and other conversations, so when
his character is explicitly uncovered, it feels redundant. However,
these flaws are easily forgivable because so much of the story is done
right. One of the main themes is about using storytelling as a means
of traveling, not to distant places, but to the interior of both the
storyteller and the listener.
Highly recommended. The film is both well written and well acted. The
narrative adeptly cuts between multiple stories and flashbacks without
feeling disjointed or obtuse. Although it is not a cheerful film, it
is compelling and engaging, and well worth seeing.

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
The logical progression, according to the dictates of the modern
American film industry, is to take a successful television series, and
capitalize on its fan base by releasing a feature film of that series.
"South Park" started as a short which was popular enough to prompt a
series on the Comedy Central television network, quickly becoming one
of that station's most popular series.
The appeal of the series lies in its contradictions. The animation is
rough and jerky, but the result is a minimalistic, almost avant-garde
quality. The children are drawn in an innately cute manner, with large
heads and large eyes, but their dialog and actions can be quite
vulgar. However the best quality of the series is the satire, which is
constantly skewering various aspect of American pop culture.
The four main characters are Stan, Kyle, Eric, and Kenny. They are
third grade students in the quiet town of South Park. One day they
sneak into an "R" rated film starring their favorite television
personalities, Terrance and Phillip. While most of the audience is
instantly turned off by the films excessive profanity and flatulence
based humor, the boys are riveted. When the impressionable boys mimic
the movie's vulgarities back in the classroom, the teachers and
parents are outraged. Kyle's mother takes an especially vociferous
role in determining how to protect their children from such bad
influences. A quick evaluation determines that because Terrance and
Phillip are Canadian, America must ban all things Canadian, as well as
execute Terrance and Phillip.
The undertone of the film is a clever self reference. Obviously this
film contains excessive profanity that the parents object to in the
Terrance and Phillip film. The point being made is the hypocrisy in
the allowable levels of objectionable content in mass media. Typically
in American film, profanity and sexual content are derided, but
violence is tolerated (although recent tragic events may have elevated
the objectionability violence). In reality, just as in this film,
there is no shortage of knee-jerk reactions (and an ambiguous
assignment of cause and effect) when discussing objectionable images
reflected in mass media.
An extra dimension is added to the story when it is revealed that the
impending execution of Terrance and Phillip is the event that will
unleash the Armageddon. Kenny is killed (just as in every television
episode) when he imitates a scene from Terrance and Phillip, and finds
his access denied into the sparsely populated heaven. When he enters
hell, he discovers that Satan is preparing to ascend to rule Earth
along with his lover, the recently deceased Saddam Hussein. Kenny
desperately tries to warn the other boys that the must rescue Terrance
and Phillip from death in order to save the world.
The strength of the film is its biting satire, which is often extreme.
Among the targets are American cultural imperialism, racial politics,
and fundamental Christian images of heaven and hell. One example is
the shocking image of Mahatma Gandhi welcoming Kenny to hell, which is
a commentary on the fundamentalist Christian view that Gandhi has met
the same fate in the afterlife as Adolf Hitler. Sensitive viewers may
feel that the film tries to be funny by simply being vulgar. Indeed,
the profanity is extreme and occasionally distracting, but often it is
a part of the deeper lampoon. Another dimension of the satire is the
multitude of musical productions. For viewers who dislike musicals,
these provide an enjoyable roasting of the usually wholesome genre.
Perhaps the best number is when Satan longingly sings of his desire to
rise and rule the Earth. The popular song from the television series
in which Eric derides Kyle's mother is also presented in the film.
Recommended. Viewers who enjoy the television series will probably
also like this film. It is definitely more vulgar, and at times the
obscenity becomes tiresome rather than funny. Viewers who are not
familiar with the television series can also enjoy this film, filled
with scathing satire and commentary about American pop culture. The
film is intentionally extreme in its profanity and sexual content, so
sensitive viewers will be offended. Although it is a cartoon, this
film is definitely not intended for children.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for East Is East (1999)
The immigrant experience can be difficult for families where the
parents adhere to the customs of one culture, while raising their
children amidst another. This film is an exploration of this conflict,
with the additional complication that the children are interracial.
The film is set in the early 1970's and begins by introducing George
Khan (Om Puri), a Pakistani immigrant who 25 years earlier married a
white Englishwoman, Ella (Linda Bassett). The couple, along with their
7 children, run a small fish and chips shop in Northern England. The
large family is cramped in a small house in a working class
neighborhood and manage a decent existence on their limited income.
Their cramped quarters is often a source of conflict, but the main
source of tension by far is the clash between George's desire for the
children to strictly observe Islamic and Pakistani customs, and their
desire not to.
The children are able to cope by meeting George's overbearing demands
when he is around, and by doing what they want (drink, eat pork, date)
when he is not, although some individuals rebel more than the others.
The dichotomy between their actual existence and the one they present
to their father, plus the difficult manipulations required to hold the
two separate, provides much of the humor in the film. The children
manage this dual existence, but only to the point when their father
decides to arrange their marriages. This is one event where they
cannot both placate their father and satisfy themselves.
The story of a domineering and sometimes abusive father, and the
ensuing conflict is not particularly original. The interesting aspects
of the relationships in this story are George's motivations and his
apparent hypocrisy. George is clearly holding his children to a
stricter standard when it comes to marriage choice than he held
himself. Part of the reason is that he is proud of his own ethnicity,
but he sees that without his overt control, his children's culture
will diverge from his. George does not see his children as fully
Pakistani, so he attempts to force them to be.
Another reason for George's behavior has to do with why the story was
set in the 1970's. At that time, British residents of South Asian
origin were subject to more overt racism, like a political movement
for repatriation. Although there are some who will always be
prejudiced against a differing skin color, others will only reject a
person of a different culture. The Khan children have little trouble
in their associations with their contemporaries because they are
British kids just like their friends.
The story, written by Ayub Khan-Din and based on his original play, is
built on a solid foundation, but could have gone further in its
explorations. The conflict between George and his children exists only
at a surface level, whereas George's internal motivations are more
engaging. The film focuses more on the former, although Puri is able
to express the character as more than just a brute, as the
underwritten role might project. The relationship between George and
Ella is also seemingly rich yet underserved. Basset is convincing as a
woman who yields to her husbands demands not through fear or weakness,
but through empathy and love. It is unfortunate that the plot focus so
little on this dimension. The direction by Damien O'Donnell is capable
but not particularly noteworthy. The film does manage to balance drama
and humor, although its sense of humor can be quite crude and not all
that funny.
Recommended. The story does not simply use the stereotype of the
authoritarian immigrant father, and thus it presents an intelligent
examination of the cross-cultural family. The clash of mindsets is
used as both of source of conflict and of humor. The film would have
been more engaging if it had delved further into the relationship
between the parents, instead of spending too much time focusing on the
children. It will be entertaining for a general audience, but it will
have the most resonance with viewers familiar with the immigrant
experience.

Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
Bank robber Jack Foley is a career criminal, but he's not a bad guy. As he
is escaping from prison, he is forced to kidnap federal marshal Karen Sisco
when she stumbles upon Jack emerging from a tunnel. Although she manages to
escape from Foley and his accomplices, they both remain obsessed with each
other. Foley eventually meets with some fellow ex-convicts in a planned
robbery of a swindler who has a fortune in uncut diamonds hidden in his
mansion. However, Sisco is on a crusade to find Foley, with or without the
FBI, and she is closing in on him.
I had high expectations for the film since it was directed by Steven
Soderbergh, but I was disappointed. It was not necessarily the direction
that was weak, but the story had too much shallowness that no amount of
direction could patch. This seemed to be a departure for Soderbergh in that
this is a traditional Hollywood film, whereas he is usually helming more
independent projects.
The basic premise of the story, the improbable attraction between the career
criminal and the law enforcement agent, was just that -- too improbable. It
is not that such romances are impossible, but rather that it was portrayed
as love at first sight (or rather, love at first kidnap), and there was no
apparent basis for their chemistry. Of course, Foley is portrayed as
likable. He never does anything distasteful, and even his crimes are
portrayed as victimless. Although this was meant to make him attractive, it
made him unbelievable.
Another major problem is a lingering lack of tension. From an early point,
we know where the story is going to go, and the film takes forever to get
there. Adding in the fact that antagonists are sociopathic thugs that
viewers are forced to hate underscores the blandness of the film. An
interesting directorial flourish is the fact that the scenes of the story
are not always presented in chronological order. The challenge of
determining the proper sequence was really the only enjoyable part of the
film for me.
Marginally Recommended. It may appeal to some viewers. It did not to me.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
Neo (Keanu Reeves) is a computer hacker. He is talented, but he has a
general disrespect for authority. He is contacted by Trinity (Carrie-Anne
Moss), a mysterious fugitive who is connected to the infamous subversive,
Morpheus (Laurence Fishburne). It seems that Morpheus wants Neo to join his
movement. At the same time he is being tracked by the authorities who want
his help in capturing Morpheus. It is no surprise that he chooses to join
the outlaws, and in doing so, he begins a surreal adventure, very similar to
"Alice in Wonderland".
At the core of the story is the distinction between perception and reality.
This is a very profound subject, and although it is not plumbed very deeply,
it is a much more intelligent foundation than can usually be expected from a
large-budget, special effects based action film. What the human mind
perceives as "reality" is the result of the signals that the human brain
receives from the eyes, ears, etc. However, it is well known that during
dreaming and with no sensory input, the mind constructs a very real world,
complete in all detail, which is obviously not part of the physical
universe. It would have been nice to see an engaging exploration of this
profound subject, but much more than what is attempted would probably
detract from the film's appeal to the mass market.
The narrative of the story is quite engaging. From the opening scene, it is
unclear what exactly is going on. This is very effective because it places
the audience in the same frame of reference as Neo, and only when Neo
understands the true "reality", does it become understandable. The film
mostly attempts to be intelligent and is usually successful, but sometimes
it cannot construct a seamless premise. The situation in which the humans
are placed is explained but does not fully make sense. There are often
inconsistencies in the powers accorded to different characters. There is
also the serious question of why an entity that defines the rules would not
be thus omnipotent and impenetrable. However, these weaknesses are mitigated
by the fast pace of the film and the unravelling of the mysteries. The film
is not meant to be a serious exploration of its philosophical elements, but
rather it is intended as a thrill ride, and it is quite successful in that
regard.
The acting performance are mostly unremarkable, but that is due mainly to
the writing and is not the fault of the performers. Considerable effort is
given in creating the story, but the drawback is that the main characters
are not fully developed, and the side characters are mere stereotypes.
Although Reeves is competent in the lead role, his performance is mostly
wooden, sometimes comically so. When Morpheus uses the term "AI" in
discussion with Neo, Reeves blankly asks "You mean Artificial Intelligence?"
in such a dry, moribund way that one cannot believe he is trying to portray
a computer hacker. To his credit, he performs well in the action sequences,
even paying homage to Bruce Lee in a Kung Fu fight.
The film cannot claim to be completely original. It borrows generously from
"2001: A Space Odyssey", the "Planet of the Apes" series, and it even has
many similarities to the recent "Dark City." It uses stock antagonists, and
other standard characters. However, the success of the film is that it
combines its sources into a balanced and cohesive result. It shows
remarkable restraint by not relying exclusively on special effects or action
to dazzle the audience at the expense of the story.
Recommended. It is definitely not a great film, but it is rather enjoyable.
It has an appealing mix of science fiction, Hong Kong style action, and
special effects that will appeal to a large audience.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Xiangnu xiaoxiao (1986)
Time passes slowly in the rural countryside, so customs and traditions are
often slow to change in the absence of outside influences. Xiao Xiao is a
young girl just entering adolesense. Following custom, she has her marriage
arranged to Chun Guan, who is a child of about five years of age. The story
begins as Xiao arrives at the rustic family farm of Guan's family. Although
they are actually man and wife, their relationship at this stage more
resembles younger brother and older sister, in fact he addresses her as
"Sister". Guan's time is mostly spent in play and Xiao Xiao's time is mostly
spent in numerous farm chores. It actually quite a pleasant, contented life.
However, Xiao Xiao's friendship with one of the farmhands eventually
develops into a romantic relationship. This not something that she is know
would happen, because in her youth and naivete she cannot know the
consequences of her actions. She see first hand that the penalty for
adultery is severe by traditional law, but only when it is too late does she
realize the trap she has entered.
When people from one culture observe the customs and practices of another,
there invariably will be some that are shocking. There may be the perception
that the story is an illustration of the injustices of a particular culture,
but this is not the case. It merely provides the context in which customs
and practices exist in an equilibrium state. Certainly some of the events
are barbaric through Western eyes, but that is because of the context in
which they are viewed. It is not a depiction of a system that is perfect, in
fact there are undeniable injustices, but it is a system that serves to
order and balance the lives of its people.
This is a film that very ambitious and highly successful. It was apparently
not intended for the Western audience judging by the long period with no
distribution. To tell a story of one culture to another is very difficult
considering the lack of background that the audience will have. The story is
brilliantly written and flawlessly acted. The writing and cinematography are
so well done that viewing the film feels like living in a Chinese village.
Highly Recommended. Those familiar with Eastern cultures will reallly
appreciate the honest depiction of rural country life. The dialog is Chinese
with subtitles.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Hanuman (1998)
This film was screened at Cinequest 10, the San Jose film festival.
Hanuman is the revered monkey god of Hindu mythology, and this film is
a reflection of the anthropomorphic deity in the fact that his spirit
is examined, and also by the fact that many of the primary characters
in the film literally are monkeys.
The film is set in the south Indian countryside near a Hanuman temple,
and it follows two parallel stories. One is among monkeys that live
near the temple, and the other is in the human world. Hanu is a young
member of the troop who is in love with another young monkey who
happens to be the princess daughter of the troop leader, Long Tooth.
Long Tooth is angry that his regal daughter is interested in a
commoner, so he chases Hanu to the fringes of their society. Tom
(Robert Cavanaugh) is a Briton whose father was a renown archeologist
who researched the Hanuman temple when Tom was a young boy. When Tom
discovers that the artwork of the temple is being looted for profit,
he impulsively decides to travel to India to continue his father's
inquiries and to hopefully try to end the plundering of the
antiquities. Eventually, the two kindred spirits cross paths.
The film is a mix of curiously contrasting halves. The storyline
following the monkeys is consistently cute and entertaining, whereas
the storyline following the humans is poorly written, horribly acted,
and completely unimaginative. It feels as if a story was developed
with only monkeys, but the extra human plot was tacked on to make it
reach a desired running length.
Clearly the film required a great deal of craftsmanship to work with
the monkeys. Voluminous footage must have been shot and painstakingly
edited. The result is a cohesive and clever plot. Indeed, it seems
that the monkeys in this film are better actors than the humans. The
insipid human-based plot demonstrates the ugly result of mixing bad
acting with bad writing. It is unimaginable that a performance could
be worse than the one given by Cavanaugh.
The incompetent portions of the film may be ignored and accepted for
viewers who are only interested in the monkeys, and thus it might be
enjoyable for children. However it does contain some violent content.
Marginally recommended. Although the film contains vivid
cinematography and outstanding coordination of animal footage, it is
drowned by a weak plot and horrid acting. The film may be enjoyed by
young children, but it is barely bearable for adult viewers.

Title
Review for Sliding Doors (1998)
Helen's day has been cut short since she has unfortunately been fired.
Something strange happens on her way home. Her reality is separated into two
parallel universes, and the viewer follows her in each of the separate
storylines. In one storyline, she just catches her train and arrives home to
find her boyfriend with another woman. In the other storyline she misses her
train, so by the time she arrives home, the other woman is gone, and she is
none the wiser. The viewer is then presented with the obviously different
consequences of each situation.
The reason for the split into parallel universes is not given, and is not
all that relevant since this is meant to be a romantic film rather than a
science fiction presentation of chaos theory and the butterfly effect. No
meaningful exploration of those issues, or any of the science of the topic,
are in this film. The juggling of the different storylines is handled very
well and the viewer is never confused. However, nothing significant is
presented by having the two "what if" scenarios, and as a result it ends up
as appearing as just a gimmick. Besides the split, this is a standard film.
The protagonists have no flaws and the antagonists have no redeeming values,
and melodrama is routinely injected to keep the story going to its
underwhelming end.
Marginally Recommended. There is nothing exceptional about this film. It
does not take any real chances and does not offer anything new. For those
who like romance films, this will probably be enjoyed.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Mr. Death: The Rise and Fall of Fred A. Leuchter, Jr. (1999)
When examining controversial subjects, discussions often diverge into
the emotional dimensions of the topics involved. This makes it
difficult to present a story based around a charged issue, because
there is the temptation to delve into the more sensational aspects.
With this film, veteran documentary filmmaker Errol Morris examines an
individual connected with two grave subjects, capital punishment and
the Holocaust.
The film begins by showing the main character, Fred Leuchter, sitting
inside a metal cage that is rising towards a Van De Graaff generator.
The artificial lightning repeatedly strikes strikes the cage,
symbolizing the controversy surrounding Leuchter. Then the narrative
slowly explores Leuchter's background, mostly in first person. He
immediately strikes the viewer as an odd character, with his mousy
appearance and whiny voice with a thick Boston accent. Morris' films
usually focus on individuals with odd or amusing interests and
passions, and this film is no different.
Leuchter has been associated with death and execution all his life.
His father worked at a prison, and growing up in that environment gave
Fred and interest in capital punishment. He taught himself the repair
and design of electric chairs. Eventually his interest branched out
into other forms of execution equipment, and he grew from a
self-taught technician to an engineer with a successful business. Few
people work in his field, so Leuchter established himself and designed
electric chairs, gas chambers, and gallows for the penal system for
several states.
Through this point in the story, Leuchter is an interesting character,
but hardly a controversial one. In fact, he even appears
compassionate. He is driven by the desire to make execution efficient
and humane. His primary concern is for the safety and dignity of both
the the executioner and the condemned. Although the tone of the
subject is morbid, there are numerous instances of odd humor based on
the quirkiness of Leuchter's character, like his claim to drink 40
cups of coffee a day.
The film then proceeds to examine the source of Leuchter's infamy--his
role supporting Holocaust denial. There are few topics as charged as
the mass slaughter of Jews that took place in Nazi Germany during the
middle of the Twentieth Century. It is a tragedy of such immense scope
that today it symbolically represents the lowest depths of evil to
which modern man can sink. However, there still remain a small
minority of Nazi sympathizers who dispute that the Holocaust actually
happened. Their claims of distorted pro-semitic propaganda are not
usually taken seriously, and the historical fact of its occurance is
not an open topic for objective analysis. When one particular
Holocaust denier seeks to scientifically examine whether the Holocaust
actually occurred, he is unable to find anyone who is willing to even
consider the question, except Fred Leuchter.
Unlike most people involved in this inquiry, Leuchter has no political
agenda. He is willing to keep an open mind and use forensic evidence
to determine whether six million individuals could have been killed by
the Nazi regime. Leuchter feels that as an expert on execution
methodology, he can determine whether the facilities proportedly used
for the mass killings were actually used. Leuchter travels to the
remains of a death camp and surreptitiously takes samples of the site.
He meticulously documents his research, including ample videotaping of
his activities. The viewer sees the diminutive, unassertive man
crawling through all parts of the historical site with a hammer and
chisel, chipping off pieces of the buildings so he can have them
tested for cyanide residue.
After he returns home, he has the samples analyzed and finds that
there is no basis, according to his knowledge of execution procedures,
to say that mass killings could have taken place. He publishes a paper
detailing this finding, and the infamous "Leuchter Report" completely
alters his life. It is obvious to the viewer that Leuchter has made a
Faustian bargain. He overestimated his knowledge of the scientific
basis of his testing. He took on an important study as an expert in
the field that boosted his ego, but it makes him more enemies than
friends. Eventually, Leuchter is shown in his present situation where
his wife has left him, he has become unemployable, and his only
admirers are people that no one takes seriously. He is merely a pawn
in a larger political game, but it is a role he entered voluntarily,
without assessing the consequences.
Unlike the majority of Holocaust deniers, Leuchter come across as
pitiable rather than evil. Most are anti-semitic radicals who believe
the Holocaust was an exaggeration, and are looking for proof to
support that belief. Leuchter, on the other hand, approaches the topic
from a completely objective perspective. He makes no assumptions, and
uses his expert knowledge to extract scientific evidence that either
support or contradict historical Holocaust claims. Ultimately the film
paints him as a pathetic victim of his own ego. Although he is an
expert on constructing execution machines, he is not qualified to be
an investigator of historical events. Interviews with other experts
reveal the fatal flaws with Leuchter's approach and methods. Being in
the middle of such heated controversy, most observers are split into
two groups, the fringe radicals who support him and believe his
conclusions, and the majority who denounce him as a tool for hatred.
Morris' film carefully avoids judgments and allows the viewers to see
the man clearly and allows the alternate assessment, that he is simply
a naive, pitiful fool who allowed his ego to drag him into his own
ruin.
The style of the film is different than what is typically seen in
documentaries in that actual footage is mixed with dramatizations.
These dramatizations are done for viseral effect. For example, there
is plenty of footage of Leuchter rummaging through the ruins of
Auchwitz, but there is also footage of Leuchter re-enacting those
actions in a studio, as an eerily backlit silhouette. By using
contrived scenes such as these, Morris is not augmenting the factual
basis of the narrative, but he is accentuating the imagery in order to
build mood. It is a bold style for a documentarian, and a technique
that Morris has perfected.
Highly recommended. The film deals with difficult and sensitive
subject matter, and although it is mostly free of disturbing imagery,
the topics discussed may be disturbing to sensitive viewers. That same
dimension makes it a powerful and thought provoking exploration of an
individual. Director Errol Morris skillfully navigates the narrative
through many charged subjects, but consistently keeps the focus on the
examination of the central character. He is brought to life and
objectively displayed for the audience to dissect and examine for
themselves.

Title
Review for Kurt & Courtney (1998)
Everyone who follows the popular music scene knows the musical group
"Nirvana", who had a large world-wide following and, as the prototypical
Seattle band, defined the genre of "grunge rock". The creative leader of the
group was writer and guitarist Kurt Cobain. Cobain ended his life with a
shotgun blast to the head in April 1994. For many people, the story ends
there, but as veteran documentary filmmaker Nick Broomfield finds out, there
may be more to the story. He finds many people who feel that Cobain's death
was not a suicide, but was rather a homicide that was covered up.
All of the conspiracy theories have a common thread. They all connect
Cobain's wife, Courtney Love, to his death. No one appears to claim she
pulled the trigger, but some claim that she hired someone else to do the
job, or else she drove Cobain to do it himself. In all, no one has much to
say that is very positive about Love. She is generally portrayed, as a
shallow, manipulative, opportunistic, gold-digger, which is in stark
contrast to the caring, introverted, Cobain. As might be expected when
researching a typical conspiracy theory, many of the sources are vague and
many of the people are shady. Amazingly, one of the people suggesting Cobain
was murdered is Love's own father.
This is an interesting film, but there are two glaring weaknesses. First,
most people believe that Cobain's death was simply a suicide. Second, and
more annoying, Broomfield has chosen to make himself too much of a
participant in the story. Besides the usual amount behind-the-camera
narration expected in a documentary, Broomfield spends too much time in
front of the camera. At one point he even voices a position against Love at
an awards ceremony. Also annoying is Broomfield's continuous complaints of
how Love is continuously trying to sabotage the film by denying the use of
any "Nirvana" music, and by persuading the producers to pull funding.
Perhaps it is because she has something to hide, but one also understands
that she knows this will be an unflattering portrayal of her and her actions
is well within her rights.
Recommended. It may not be of interest to viewers who do no care for
documentaries, since it is not a very good entry for that genre. However,
the enjoyable aspect of the film in not in any revelations, but rather in
seeing part of the cast of sordid and quirky group of people that have been,
and still are, associated with Kurt and Courtney.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Swimming (2000)
Adolescence and young adulthood is a time when people often struggle
to find direction in their lives. It is a pivotal time when decisions
are made about what they want to do with their future. This film is
about a young woman who feels that she is treading water - that her
life is idling - and is searching for some type of escape.
Frankie (Lauren Ambrose) is longing to leave Myrtle Beach, South
Carolina just as the summer tourist season is about to begin. Her
parents had moved to Arizona, leaving the family restaurant to Frankie
and her married older brother, Neil (Josh Pais). Her days are spent
working in the restaurant, and her nights are spent generally hanging
out with her unrestrained best friend, Nicola (Jennifer Dundas Lowe),
who runs a small body piercing stand.
When drifter and siren Josee (Joelle Carter) shows up and gets hired
as a waitress in the restaurant, Frankie's world becomes unbalanced.
Frankie and Josee develop an instant liking towards each other,
whereas, Nicola openly antagonistic towards the alluring newcomer, who
Nicola feels uses her good looks to get what she wants. Frankie must
decide on what she wants from her life and she must come to grip with
how her new friendship is undermining an existing relationship.
The strength of the film is its characters. The primary focus is on
boyish Frankie, and Ambrose breaths life into the character, without
having the benefit of much dialog. The character is both homely and
attractive, and she is utterly likeable for her innocent charm, and
all these features are communicated nonverbally, because the character
is generally introverted and reticent. The role of Nicola is more
clearly defined, but Dundas Lowe is able to meet the challenge of
reflecting the character's energy with restraint, and not allowing the
it to become exaggerated.
The pace of the film is unhurried, so the viewer is steeped in
Frankie's world and is allowed to get close to the characters'
emotions. The plot is confidently translucent so that course that
events will take is never clearly apparent.
Another film may have used the assistance of voice-over narration to
allow the main character to directly express her inner thoughts to the
audience. However this film forgoes that crutch and undertakes the
more difficult task of nonverbal expression for this communication.
This is an indication of a solid script, skillful direction, and
accomplished acting. The story occasionally tries to do too much (like
a minor character with an imaginary friend) but its shortcomings are
dwarfed by its accomplishments.
Highly recommended. This is a slow, character-oriented drama primarily
about teenage angst. Although not perfect, the film should be
commended for its intelligent approach. It is a moving, enjoyable film
with likeable, well defined characters, and an engaging story.

Title
Review for Kanchenjungha (1962)
(Dialog in Bengali, English subtitles)
The purpose of a vacation is often to forget the details of daily
life, using the fresh surroundings to cleanse the mind and to reflect
upon some aspects of life from a different perspective. The Choudhuri
family is spending a some time at the beautiful hill station of
Darjeeling doing just that, and as the story opens, they are nearing
the end of their trip. The majestic peak of Kanchenjungha has been
obscured by clouds, and likewise, some of the individuals are
symbolically having difficulty seeing with clarity what they want in
their own lives. The patriarch, Indranath (Chhabi Biswas) has no
problem understanding what has made him a powerful and successful
industrialist -- adopting the values of the system. His main concern
at the present time is the impending marriage of his youngest
daughter, Monisha (Alaknanda Roy). She is at a good age to marry, but
she has not completed her studies, and is unsure of what she wants
for herself. Indranath approves of the good match they have found
in Bannerjee (N. Viswanathan), who is a rising professional with a
bright future. However, Monisha fears he would make a dull, although
secure, husband.
Ashoke (Arun Mukherjee) is a struggling young man, on holiday with
his uncle, who had tutored Indranath's son Anil when he was a little
boy. By coincidence, they run into Indranath, and it seems to be
good fortune that they may be able to use this connection to land
Ashoke a job that he desperately needs. The meeting also offers an
introduction to Monisha who sees in Ashoke some characteristic that
she finds more appealing than Banerjee. Also with the family is
Monisha's older sister, Anima (Anubha Gupta), and her husband Shankar
(Subrata Sen Sharma), and it is clear that their relationship has
become strained.
Satyajit Ray displays the full force of his talent in this film.
In addition to producing and directing it, he wrote the original
screenplay and composed the original music. This was also Ray's
first color film, and the use of color is important because it
displays the natural beauty of Darjeeling as an integral component
of the film. (Ray returns to black and white for his next few films.)
All the characters are enchanted by the natural beauty, which fills
them with a sense of idealism and allows them to evaluate themselves.
Ray effectively communicates this through the visual imagery and
through the charming music.
The writing is exceptionally poignant in its decision to remain
understated. Although characters reach decisions at their turning
points, it is always clear that it was done in the intoxication of
idealism. The possibility that they may think differently when they
return to their mundane city lives is never expressed explicitly,
but it is an obvious possibility. The dilemma faced by Monisha is
usually not a dilemma in formulaic stories; often a woman is being
forced to marry a despicable man she dislikes while desiring a
virtuous man she cannot have. That is not the case here. Both men
are decent, likable men. Bannerjee is noticeably older than Monisha
and as a result he represents to her the selling of youthful idealism
for safe, drab existence. Her dilemma is not that she trying to
escape this path, but that she is not sure if it is what she wants.
When she comes to a decision, this will be a possibility.
The story contains many parallel subplots. As characters stroll
through the scenic hill station, they chance upon the other
characters and establish the many interconnected components of the
story as a whole. The viewer remains a detached observer, just like
the native villagers who are going about their daily lives as the
outsiders are on vacation.
The subplot of Anima and Shankar does not contribute as much as
the other component stories, but its inclusion adds a more dire
dimension that the other threads In contrast, the character of
Monisha's brother Anil (Anil Chatterjee) appears briefly, mostly
for comic relief. However, he also represents how some people have
the luxury of being light-hearted when dealing with issues that are
much more serious to others.
The acting in the film is uniformly superb, with the standout
performance being that of Indranath by Chhabi Biswas. Indranath
is a much deeper character than he may initially appear. Being that
the story takes place not long after Indian independence, his
admiration of all things British represents his knowledge of how to
work within the system. In the course of his stroll with Ashoke, he
delivers a long speech of his beliefs, which basically is a
demonstration of how he has sold out at every step and how he reaped
the rewards. He has been a complete success and "his lordship" usually
gets what he wants, but it is real concern and not selfishness that
guides him. This time, when the mist clears and characters see the
elusive Kanchenjungha, he may or may not get what he wants.
Highly recommended. This one of Ray's more obscure films, but it is
a masterpiece. It interweaves several story lines into a rich
tapestry, and uses multiple layers of symbolism. Ray exercised total
creative input into the film and executed it flawlessly.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Sa pusod ng dagat (1998)
[Screened at the Cinequest Film Festival 9, San Jose]
[1.5/4.0]  (dialog in Tagalog, English subtitles)
The remote islands of the Philippines are a beautiful place. Life there is
simple, but not easy. Although the people live in the standard definition of
poverty, there is a richness to their lives that is missing in what is
commonly called civilization. This story is narrated from the point of view
of Pepito, a young man living on an island. Pepito's father died as sea when
he was young. Because his mother is the island's midwife and he has no
female siblings, he has been forced to become an apprentice midwife, which
is highly unusual for a male. This occupation keeps them busy because the
families of the island are continually having children. Some of the young
adults are drawn to life in the big city as an escape from the boredom of
the island, and although Pepito travels to the city due to his love of the
travelling schoolteacher, he is eventually drawn back to the place he
belongs to.
Although the story has the potential to be compelling, the film squanders
its opportunities by choosing to squeeze in as much melodrama as possible.
This predilection is demonstrated early when the tragedy of Pepito's
father's death is dwelled upon for much too long. In fact, several
exceedingly tragic turn of events take place in the story, thus making the
whole narrative feel manipulative. The inclusion of elements of magical
realism, like functional voodoo dolls and a woman giving birth to a snake,
further made me feel removed from the film. Also adding to the feeling of
detachment are the many poor acting performances, which made me feel I was
watching amateur actors rather than real characters. To be fair, there is
probably a cultural context to the story that the film builds upon that I
missed, and I have not seen any other Philippine films to compare it
against. The cinematography cannot be faulted, as the stunning beauty of
this tropical paradise is well presented.
Not recommended. It probably will be enjoyed by fans of magic realism, and
it probably captures some of the spirit of rural island life in the
Philippines, but it is hampered by stiff acting, plodding story, and
overwrought melodrama.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for O.K. Garage (1998)
[Screened at the Cinequest Film Festival 9, San Jose]
The O.K. Garage is not a place you would really want to have your car
repaired, but Rachel finds this out the hard way when her car breaks down on
the way to work. Although the owner cheerfully claims all the work is
satisfaction guaranteed, he usually will do practically nothing and still
overbill for the work he claims to have performed. Besides this simple petty
crime, he is collaborating with bigger mobsters in a scheme to steal the
cars of some former customers, which should be easy since he has their
addresses and even car keys.
Rachel has a friend, Sean, who is a rather odd character. He is a writer who
of late has taken to playing with and carrying around lizards. Although
there is an obvious attraction between them, so far their relationship has
been platonic. Russell has an acquaintance, Johnny, who is himself a bit
odd. He refuses to deposit his paychecks because he is attracted to a bank
teller, but is so shy about it that he cannot get himself to go to the bank.
This is basically the story of these three characters, brought together when
Rachel seeks Sean's and Johnny's help in recovering her money.
Writer and director Brandon Cole confesses that he provided very little
direction and let the actors interpret the characters; Lili Taylor as
Rachel, John Turturro as Johnny, and Will Patton as Sean. The strength of
the film are the performances of Taylor and Turturro. Taylor is particular
strong as Rachel. The way she actually stomps up stairs reflects the
confidence and pluck (and attractiveness) of the character. Turturro is also
good as Johnny, but the character is often uneven, due mainly to the writing
rather than Turturro's performance. However, Patton was rather grating as
the odd Russell. With a constant wry smile and vacuous expression, he
appeared to be rigidly forcing his performance as a stereotypical eccentric,
rather than allowing the character have a natural flow. Having heard Cole
speak before and after the film, it appears that Patton based his portrayal
of Sean on the style and demeanor of Cole, but the character would have been
better with more definition.
The subplot of the garage owner's relationship with the mobsters injects
some life into the story. The developing romance between Johnny and Rachel
is telegraphed early and feels slightly forced, but it is not dwelled upon
so it is not objectionable. Ultimately the story feels as if Cole is trying
to communicate a larger point, but fails.
Marginally Recommended. There are good performances, but the writing was
rather empty. It is entertaining, but quite uncompelling.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Masala (1991)
Krishna lost his family to a terrorist bombing years ago. He has finished
treatment for his drug problem and shows up to stay with his aunt's family
for a little while. Lord Krishna is in Canada (although he admits it is
usually out of his jurisdiction) because a temple to him is being
consecrated. These two different characters with the same name symbolically
represent the two polar components of the Indian immigrant experience.
Srinivas Krishna wrote, directed, and played the lead role of the human
Krishna. However, that character is probably the most poorly realized
character (Does he need to be constantly brandishing his knife? We caught on
early that he is an angry young man.) The roles of his uncle, his uncle's
brother, and Lord Krishna are all played by Saeed Jaffrey. The uncle, Lallu
Bhai, is bascally the same character that Jaffrey played in "My Beautiful
Laundrette" -- the sleazy business owner. He also essays wonderfully the
role of Lord Krishna. He is not given much to do as the character of Lallu's
brother who is underdeveloped, even though he is central to the main plot.
Jaffrey's excellent performances demonstrates good acting and show up the
other actors as amateurish. (Jaffrey's real-life daughter Sakina portrays
Lallu's daughter and proves that acting talent is not purely genetic.)
There are numerous threads in the story: Krishna's interactions with his
aunt's family, the dynamics within that family, the dynamics of his uncle's
brother's family, the connection the a Sikh separatist, the influence of
Lord Krishna, and the acceptance/nonacceptance of the western culture the
Indians live in. Lord Krishna's presence is usually for comic relief since
he is depicted in a rather profane, but never really offensive (if one does
not mind seeing him dressed in an ice hockey player or airline pilot),
manner. Underneath the lightness of his character is a serious role
represented, like when he asks himself "Why do these people move to some
foreign place where the don't fit and then ask me to bail them out?"
The human Krishna is the personification of the assimilated component of the
community. This is usually the younger generation. Lord Krishna is
representative of the older generation and their tenuous grasp on a mindset
that is often incompatible with their immediate surroundings. The contrast
of the different parts of the Indian experience is a recurring dramatic and
comedic element. In one scene, one young woman fantasizes about her love
interest and it is envisioned as a typical Indian film musical number with
the typical cheesy sets and nonsensical costume changes, but with some of
the words in English. In another, a young man fantasizes about a prospective
arranged bride as an rather explicit Kama Sutra style scene.
This film is not flawless. Some of the acting is wooden, and sometimes the
direction is uneven, but overall it is a very good film. The reason it
appears to fail in some places is because it aspires to do too much.
However, it is good to see a film choose to set high standards and fail
rather than set low standards and achieve them all.
Highly Recommended. Non-Indians will enjoy this film, but Indians will be
able to fully appreciate the level to which issues involving the Indian
diaspora are addressed.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Waking Ned Devine (1998)
Tullymore is a quiet little Irish country village. When two old friends,
Jackie and Michael, discover that the latest lottery was won by one of the
village's residents, they hatch a plan to find out who the winner is (which
should not be hard since they know everyone in town), befriend them, and
share in the winnings. Then they discover that the winner was kind old Ned
Devine, who had immediately died upon the shock of his win. Since Ned has no
family, his winning would be going back to the lottery, so Jackie and
Michael decide it would be best if someone else pretended to be Ned, claimed
the prize, and shared the winnings. It will not be easy since they will need
the cooperation of the whole village and not all may go along.
Like most of the characters in it, this film is quite cute. It presents the
Irish coastal countryside as almost a character by itself, with beauty and
charm. The rough cliffs, lush woods, and enchanting streams reflect a
simplicity and purity to the slow, rustic life. However, many of the
characters presented were not given much depth, and the subplots of the pig
farmer's romance with a single mother, and the small boy who seems wiser
than the substitute priest seemed extraneous. There is a similarity in the
narrative to A Simple Plan, but this film has an altogether different tone
than that one. The need to neatly wrap up the subplots at the close of the
main narrative felt jarring in its superfluousness. The film has a pleasant
lightness of tone and provides a good share of well-paced laughs, and the
cuteness of its main characters (particularly Michael) is quite endearing.
The storyline closes at what would appear to be the beginning point of the
more interesting story, but it goes far enough as a showcase of the charm of
rural Ireland.
Moderately Recommended. This film does not contain anything exceptional, but
is certainly charming and enjoyable. It does not strive to do very much, but
does accomplish what it sets out to do.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for American Movie (1999)
The phenomenon of ultra-low budget independent filmmaking has achieved
some measure of commercial success in recent years, with the best
example being 1999's ubiquitous Blair Witch Project. However, for
every film that manages to reach audiences, there are countless many
that go unnoticed. Simply being an independent production does not
mean that a film is being developed from quality source material. Even
when the fundamentals are sound and the filmmaker has a clear vision
for the project, restricted resources can present crippling obstacles
that keep the film from developing into a coherent product.
This film is a documentary that chronicles the struggles of Mark
Borchardt, an aspiring filmmaker, and his attempt to fulfill his
dreams. He is a young man who is unable to keep his personal life
completely stable, but who has a strong vision and an indomitable
determination to succeed in film. Fittingly, Mark does not toil in the
shadows of the studios of Hollywood, but instead pursues his craft in
a working class suburb of Milwaukee, Wisconsin. Mark is a rather odd
person, and thus he is a compelling character to anchor a documentary.
Mark does not have the luxury of being a fulltime filmmaker. He works
menial odd jobs to scrape up enough money to keep his project going,
and to occasionally have a beer with his friends. Mark's background is
fleshed out through interviews with his family members and his
friends. Hardly any character occupying significant screen time comes
across as a "normal" person, and this gives the film a surreal tone.
Particularly Mark's close friend, Mike Schank (whose original music
appears in this film), seems like an exaggerated caricature. The
surrealness gives the impression that this not an actual documentary,
but a fictional mockumentary, where all the humor was actually
scripted.
At the beginning of the story, Mark is working on a feature film,
Northwestern, his master work. However, production must be halted due
to a serious lack of funding. Mark's plan becomes to finish a short
film, Coven, (which is also a work in progress) and use the proceeds
from its sale to underwrite Northwestern. The problem of funding still
remains for his work at hand, but Coven is fully written, and requires
less money since it is only a short.
Since his minimum wage job(s) barely contribute anything, and since
his parents are unwilling to give him more money than they already
have, Mark turns to a miserly uncle, Bill, for funding. Although a
cynic might assume that Mark treats his uncle well because of his
money, it is clear from the footage of Mark's interaction with Bill
that he truly cares for him. These are the most moving parts of the
film. It is not often that one sees a deep intergenerational
relationship in modern cinema (except perhaps for the relationship
between a young child and an elder).
As the story progresses, Mark is able to shoot parts of his film
whenever he has the resources. The story culminates in Mark's final
composition of Coven and its first showing. Small parts of the film
are shown, and it is striking to see how parts that were haphazardly
filmed ended up being so vividly striking.
Ironically, the making of this film was an effort not unlike Mark's
struggles. The budget was always an impediment, equipment broke,
footage was lost, and many other obstacles were faced that were
typical to an independent feature. The result here, unlike many
projects that become overwhelmed by obstacles, is a coherent and
successful film.
Recommended. Fans of independent film will enjoy this portrait of a
quirky filmmaker. Non-fans of the genre will be entertained by this
look at an odd individual. Although the narrative of the documentary
lacks some smoothness, it is still a compelling story with highly
interesting characters, and even some suspense in seeing whether the
filmmaker achieves his goals.

Title
Review for Aranyer Din Ratri (1970)
(Dialog in Bengali, English subtitles)
This film is also known by the English title "Days and Nights in
the Forest".
Trying to escape the pressures of their daily lives, four young men
embark on a vacation to the rural forest. They are unsure what to
expect, but they are eager to be able to focus on their adventure
into the unknown. The leader of the group is Ashim (Soumitra
Chatterjee). Sanjoy (Subhendu Chatterjee) is a docile office worker
who rarely stands up or takes risks. It is not that he is a coward,
but rather he always plays it safe. The ill-tempered Hari (Samit
Bhanja) was recently jilted by his girlfriend, and as a result has
some open issues to resolve. Finally, there is Shekhar (Robi Ghosh)
who is self-confident and earnest, but often so much so that he is
comical. The journey into the unknown of the forest unintentionally
becomes a journey of self-discovery, as the decisions they make and
the lessons they learn will change them.
The first decision they must make is in their accommodations. Being
carefree young men, they have neglected to make any plans. The come
across a rest house that suits their needs, but since they have not
made reservations, they must bribe the caretaker in order to stay
there. The caretaker knows he is risking his job, but his wife is
ill and so he is in desperate need of the money. At the rural tavern,
they stop for a drink, and encounter some of the people of the forest.
They particularly notice the women who have no taboos about drinking
in public like the women of the city would. Hari in particular is
drawn to one of them, Duli (Simi Garewal), whose untamed quality
enhances her appeal. The other men are more interested in the two
obviously civilized women they chance to see walking near their
bungalow one day. After following them to their cottage, they find
that the women are also visitors to the forest. Aparna (Sharmila
Tagore) is a strong, self-assured young woman who is staying in the
vacation house with her father and widowed sister-in-law, Jaya
(Kaberi Bose). What begins as casual social interaction between the
men and the women eventually becomes more serious as they come to
understand each other better. Although the men's interests often
lead to funny, awkward situations, there are serious issues just
beneath the surface.
Although it might appear to be a familiar premise, Satyajit Ray
takes the story (written by Sunil Ganguli) and fashions an
engrossing film. It is obvious that as the men enter the unknown
surroundings and encounter new people, their reactions will be
reflections of their own character. This is not a new approach, but
what makes the story powerful is the unpredictability of the
narrative, and the development of the characters. None of the
characters are be slotted into a stereotype for easy digestion, and
the eventual turn of events are not telegraphed. From an early point,
the viewer gets immersed in the characters. Just as the characters
stumble around to make sense of their situations, the viewer closely
follows their actions. The most engaging episodes are when the men
interact with the women, and the contortions they go through in
their potentially romantic pursuits. Since a primary component of
the story is this interaction, and because there is not a matching
number (four men versus three women), it is clear that the story
progression will not be a simplistic pairing off into couples.
The situations presented to the men are varied, and as the story
progresses they become more serious and dramatic. However, the
narrative keeps from becoming overly tense by the timely and
effective use of humor. One particular scene involves the men being
caught in an embarrassing position when the women unexpected drop
by while they are bathing at a well. The structure of the comedy is
simple and pure, and although the setup may sound stereotypical,
the flawless execution makes it a particularly hilarious moment.
Of the four young men, Shekhar is the only character whose inner
self is not examined. His heightened earnestness makes him a comic
character, but Ghosh plays him perfectly so he does not become
glaringly exaggerated. Striking this balance make it the standout
performance. The other characters have differing degrees of
complexity, but they are all handled well.
Highly recommended. This is both a powerful and entertaining film.
There is both intense drama and light comedy. The story focuses
on the many characters and develops them fully.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Office Space (1999)
Many office workers have experienced a "bad case of the Mondays", that
feeling of lethargy at the beginning of the week caused by the meaningless
banalities of the white-collar work culture. Peter Gibbons experiences this
with a horrible commute, multiple levels of bosses hounding him to adhere to
the minutia of corporate bureaucracy, and most of all, the feeling that this
type of life is not meant for him. After a mishap during a visit to a
hypnotherapist, Peter undergoes a personality change and begins to unyoke
himself from the norms of corporate culture. He parks in his boss' reserved
parking space, he disassembles his stifling cubicle, he dresses any way he
wants, etc. When he finds out that his two best friends in the department,
Samir and Michael Bolton (no relation to the pop singer) will be laid off in
the impending downsizing, he persuades the two software engineers to join
him in a plot to get even with the company.
Director Mike Judge has achieved success with his television creations
"Beavis and Butthead" and "King of the Hill". He also is behind the animated
"Milton" shorts, which have appeared on the television series "Saturday
Night Live" from time to time. This story is based on that series, and the
character of Milton (the wormy office pariah who is continuously dumped
upon) is a part of this story, but remains a side character. Typical of
Judge humor, there are satirical attacks on this particular subculture, and
also the general popular culture. From the business oriented restaurants
with insipid names like "Chotchkie's" and "Flingers", to the various
creatures who populate the corporate jungle, there is a continuous undertone
of cynically essaying the life of the office worker.
Although the film is consistently funny, the story lacks the narrative
continuity that even Judge's television episodes have. Peters romance with a
restaurant waitress is wholly superficial and uninteresting. It was
apparently inserted simply for marketing purposes. The Milton character is
grating and is mostly unnecessary also. The entire story has the feel of
being stretched in order for the kernel material (which is good) to fit
within the framework of a feature film. This film has many similarities to
another, "Clockwatchers", and although that is not as funny, it constructs a
better story.
Moderately recommended. The film is consistently funny. Anyone who works in
the office environment will see parts of their everyday lives reflected and
skewered on the screen. However, the story is not smooth and often is
conveniently manipulated to serve the narrative.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for 20 Dates (1998)
Myles Berkowitz thought it would be interesting to combine his two biggest
failures--his professional life and his personal life. Being a recently
divorced, failed filmmaker, his idea is to make a documentary about finding
love by filming himself going on dates with women. Just meeting women is
difficult for Berkowitz, but he must also persuade them to allow him to put
the date under the microscope of the camera. It is hard to kindle romance
when followed by a film crew. He must wrestle with his financier who
believes that Berkowitz' approach is too boring and that there must be more
prurient and marketable items in the final product. Another big obstacle is
that he is taking both the dates and his film very seriously. He must deal
with the issue that if he is successful at finding love along the way, would
it be possible to attend the remaining dates with other women?
The concept of portraying real romance in a documentary is a very compelling
one because of the way it would compare with the view of romance that is
usually depicted in film. It is Berkowitz' intention that the film takes
both a serious and comic look at this concept. He mostly fails at the
former, but succeeds at the latter. It is hard to imagine that anyone who is
taking a date seriously would consent to allowing two extra people along to
handle the camera and sound recording. This makes any serious exploration
doomed to failure, and it usually also gives the women an unflattering
opinion of Berkowitz.
It seems that Berkowitz has kept the film from becoming a muddled mess by
staging much of what is portrayed. The surreptitiously recorded discussions
with Elie, the film's funder, are quite funny, but not believable. Among
many other questions, if Elie is opposed to the concept of the film to begin
with, why is he so insistent that Berkowitz attend exactly 20 dates? The
interaction between Berkowitz and strangers on the street all seem real and
are often entertaining. The interaction with some of the women he actually
dates sometimes seem scripted. How is it that some of the women can react
negatively to Berkowitz, even threaten to sue him for taping them, yet
apparently allow him to use the footage in the final film? If Berkowitz had
been up front and admitted that some of the film was dramatized for the sake
of comedy, it would have been easy to forgive, because much of the film was
entertaining. Instead, there are too many inconsistencies to ignore, and the
viewer might feel cheated for taking it seriously. However, the film can be
rather entertaining if not taken seriously and viewed for its comedy.
Recommended. The most annoying aspect of the film is the implication that
all the events were real, when there are too many parts that appear staged.
Berkowitz himself is a rather uninteresting person, but his interaction with
seemingly random people is entertaining and sometimes hilarious.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Trekkies (1997)
In the history of American television, no series has attracted as much
devotion as Star Trek. The original series and its progeny have
created a following that contains elements stranger than anything that
ever appeared on the science fiction series. This film is a
documentary that examines the obsession some people have with the
show.
The film is narrated by Denise Crosby, who is a former cast member and
also a participant in the documentary's inquiry. The technique used is
primarily interviews and profiles of particularly possessed
individuals, interviews with current and former cast members
recounting their experiences, and encounters with the show's fandom.
Interspersed with the interviews are many scenes and quick sound bites
from several of the many of the series' ubiquitous conventions, where
fans gather, in complete space regalia, to listen to cast members
talk, buy and sell memorabilia, and generally commiserate with other
fans. The propensity of the conventioneers to dress as characters from
the show creates an odd and humorous mood. It is not unusual to see
people take an interest, but the absurdity of the lengths they go to
is continuously laughable.
What is most compelling is that it is possible to discern several
different types of fans. There are those who digest the moral order
espoused by the show and synthesize it as a personal religion by which
they live. There are some who put all their creative energy into
following the show, like the teenage fan who appraises and trades
memorabilia, and who even developed a computer graphics generated
sketch of an episode based on the series. Some fans are more casual
and do not feel the need to outwardly display their affiliation with
the show but they see the meaning and poignancy developed in the
series' narrative, and they like to discuss this with others. All of
these seem like harmless and quirky individuals who have an interest
but not an unhealthy attraction to the show. However, one type of fan
was unnerving, and that is those who have an obsession with a
particular cast member and character. One woman in particular keeps
her multitude of pictures and other totems connected to her favorite
cast member in a safe, and paints a disturbing picture of obsession.
The primary flaw with the film is that it does not have a focused
theme that it follows through its narrative like a standard
documentary. It meanders between the various interviews with short
convention snippets collected in between. Without a central theme, the
film appears to be little more than a carnival freak show.
Recommended. Judged by the requirements of documentary filmmaking,
this film is lacking in vision by not making a clear statement about
its subject. It is definitely entertaining. Watching the film is
probably more fun as a group activity, since a group of viewers can
laugh together at the odd creatures on screen.

Title
Review for Limbo (1999)
Limbo, a term meaning "a condition of unknowable outcome", is the
perfect title for this film. Not only are most of the characters
mired in this state, but the audience is also thrust into it. This
will appeal to some viewers, but it will undoubtably put off many who
expect a standard narrative. John Sayles has a track record of being
a master storyteller, and because he has established the ability to
successfully construct an unconventional narrative, he is able to
take risks in this film.
Alaska is different things to different people. For cruise tourists
it is a picturesque countryside with quaint attractions. For tour
operators it is potentially "one big theme park." For loggers it is
a treasure chest of available timber. For the local people, it is a
tough place to make a living, but it is a part of who they are. Joe
Gastineau (David Strathairn) has lived there his whole life. He had a
chance to leave to become a college athlete, but injury ended those
hopes. He became a successful commercial fisherman, but a tragic
accident deeply scarred him and made him abandon that line of work.
He has scratched around doing odd jobs and lately he has become
a handyman at a local lodge. Donna De Angelo (Mary Elizabeth
Mastrantonio) is there only temporarily. She is a lounge singer who
is booked in Alaska for a year, and is currently working at a local
bar. She is certainly talented, but a recording career never gelled,
and now she is too old to expect her singing career to amount to much.
Still, she feels enough passion for it that she would feel stifled
doing anything else. Donna has brought along her daughter, Noelle
(Vanessa Martinez), who has slowly drifted away from her mother. The
years of continuous uprooting, moving between schools, and enduring a
string of her mother's boyfriends has left Noelle friendless and
disaffected. Because she blames her mother for these problems, their
relationship has grown tense, although it is apparent they still care
deeply about each other. These three scarred souls form the nucleus of
the story.
When Joe and Donna meet, they hit it off and grow closer gradually.
Although they have different personalities, they have a palpable
chemistry. Sayles develops all the inter-relationships (Joe and
Donna, Donna and Noelle, Joe and Noelle) with care and attention to
detail. All three actors are outstanding in their roles. The standout
is Mastrantonio, who takes what is usually a stereotypical character
and gives it depth. She skillfully displays Donna's passion in the
vocal performances (using her own impressive singing talent), and her
vulnerability in her infatuation with Joe. Strathairn is convincing
as the pensive, brooding Joe, a strong man wounded by self-doubt. The
only flaw with Joe is that his character, as written, is slightly
exaggerated, and his likability is overstated. Besides the main
characters, there are many others who are interconnected. All of them
are developed as important subcomponents, each defining an aspect of
the overall theme.
While the first part of the story builds the relationship between
Joe, Donna, and Noelle, the story abruptly shifts when Joe's half
brother Bobby Gastineau (Casey Siemaszko) enters the picture. Bobby
recruits Joe into doing him a favor, helming his boat for a simple
run. Joe, assuming the trip to be an innocuous one, invites Donna
and Noelle along. When the situation unexpectedly deteriorates, the
trio are forced to abandon the boat, and become stranded on a remote,
unpopulated island. The focus of the story then becomes their attempt
to survive in the wilderness in hope of rescue. In close quarters,
they are forced together closer than they would have imagined. Noelle
finds a diary in an old abandoned shack where they seek refuge, and
the story that unravels from her daily readings are a microcosmic
reflection of the larger story.
The problem that many viewers will have with the film is with the
ending. Without revealing too much, it is enough to state that it
is an unusual conclusion based on the standard flow of typical
dramas. Although it may be viewed as a gimmick, or an attempt at
cleverness, it is a device that was carefully planned by Sayles. The
ending is consistent with with the rest of the story, and it is even
alluded to in more than one way, and thus it is an integral part of
the film.
This is not a flawless film. It has some missteps when using
generalizations to define several of the characters. However, the
level to which Sayles aspires is not imaginable for most filmmakers,
who restrict themselves to easily digestible stories designed for the
largest audience possible. Sayles has the specific intention of making
the viewer an active participant in the story. His idea is to provide
enough material that a rich portrait is drawn with the characters on
screen, and the viewer is allowed to fill in any remaining details
themselves. By doing this, Sayles strives to create a highly literate
film, but risks isolating the part of the audience that desires a
simple passive viewing experience.
This film has a lot in common with Sayles' previous work, "Lone
Star". Both have a rich tapestry of characters whose composite reflect
the personality of the region in which they live. Both feature a
primary plot element which is the most insignificant part of the
story. In this film, the main narrative is merely a skeleton on which
Sayles overlays a story about people.
Highly recommended. This film will definitely not appeal to some
viewers. It will be a disappointment to anyone expecting a standard
narrative. It chooses to minimize the importance of the main plot
and instead, focus all attention on the characters. It is successful
in drawing full portraits of the many individuals and the land in
which they live. It is a typical John Sayles film in which he cares
deeply for his characters and he tells a moving story.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for My Son the Fanatic (1998)
People emigrate from the Indian subcontinent to the West for a variety
of reasons, but the most common is to just make a living, because for
many that is easier in the foreign land than it is at home. The
sacrifice that is made, often unknowingly, is a way of life, and often
the scorn of the Westerners who see the newcomers as threats. Some
people are able to retain the value system of their old culture, but
many also assimilate into the new surroundings. Some do this because
they know their existence in the foreign land is more than temporary,
so they try to be less foreign. Others do it simply because they want
to fit in more easily, and be accepted by the locals so they can live
their lives without disturbance.
Hanif Kureishi has written many stories centered around Pakistanis who
have settled in England. Some have been produced as films, most
notably My Beautiful Laundrette and Sammy and Rosie get Laid. My Son
the Fanatic is an adaptation of one of his short stories. Usually his
main characters are highly assimilated members of the second
generation. These people often identify themselves mainly as British,
but are still influenced by the Eastern culture of their parents. The
roles are reversed in this story, because it is the parent who has
assimilated, while his son is driven into a zealous pursuit of
religion and culture in an attempt to fill his self-realizational
needs.
Parvez (Om Puri) is a taxi driver in an economically depressed English
city. Although it once had a thriving textile industry, the factories
have gone and the population has faced hard times. Parvez often sees
the dark underside of the town as his job takes him through all parts
at all times. Parvez's friend Fizzy (Harish Patel) arrived in England
the same time as Parvez, twenty five years prior, but the two men's
fortunes followed different paths. The enterprising Fizzy has worked
hard and become a restaurant owner. The unambitious Parvez has been
driving a cab for a quarter century. Although Parvez barely makes a
living, he is fully content with his lot in life. However, his
self-satisfaction contrasts with the attitude of his family. His wife,
Minoo (Gopi Desai), resents the fact that Parvez has not risen to a
more respectable profession and become a better provider. Besides the
fact that driving a taxi pays minimally, it keeps Parvez occupied and
outside the house, leaving him little time with his family. Over time,
the relationship between Parvez and Minoo has become distant, but a
deeper split emerges between Parvez and his son, Farid (Akbar Kurtha).
Farid has grown up in England, is studying accounting, plays guitar,
and has gotten engaged to an English girl. At the start of the story,
Farid is cast as a typical second generation immigrant--he is aware of
his culture, but has apparently assimilated. However, there are
barriers to his assimilation that anger Farid. He sees that people
look down on his family because not only are they dark-skinned
"Pakis", but also because his father is a lowly taxi driver. Farid
reacts by rejecting the Western culture that rejects him. He breaks
off his engagement and joins a group of devout Muslims who decry the
immorality of Western culture. He is also angry that his father
accepts the place in society that they are forced into. Such concerns
really do not register to Parvez. His whole approach to life is mellow
and accepting. Although he does face bigotry, he is not affected by
it. He accepts it as one of the facets of his world.
Parvez finds a kindred spirit in Bettina (Rachel Griffiths), one of
the many prostitutes who ply their trade on the streets that Parvez
drives. In fact, they have almost become business associates because
their occupations bring them in contact so often. Over time they have
developed a friendship. Bettina is grounded and self respecting, and
Parvez is a rare man who treats her with kindness. Bettina a is caring
listener who has learned quite a lot about Parvez's feelings and
concerns from the time they have spent together. Parvez finds and
acceptance and admiration from Bettina that he does not get from
others. Although he does not care any less for his wife and son, he
has developed a tender relationship with Bettina.
The story takes on several serious issues and is engaging. However, it
does appear weak in one place--the character of Bettina. The character
of a sympathetic prostitute is hardly original. Although Griffiths
gives a capable performance, she is limited by the stereotype. In
contrast, Puri gives an exceptional performance as Parvez. There is
nothing extreme about Parvez, but Puri molds a character that the
viewer fully understands, appreciates, and admires by the end of the
film. Parvez's strength, his fairness and sensibility, are not
extruded at discrete moments, but rather the character builds with all
he does and says. He is written with depth, and portrayed effectively.
No one else is developed as thoroughly as Parvez. Farid is given
relatively little depth. At the beginning of the story his is on the
cusp of his rejection of Western values and his immersion into
fundamentalism. After that he is given little development, but this is
because as a character, he is not important. He represents an
antagonistic view to Parvez's general outlook. This conflict is
intelligently portrayed because Parvez does not directly represent the
values opposed by his son. The conflict is not between Parvez and
Farid, but rather it is between the many components of Parvez's world.
Highly recommended. It is a very ambitious film, but the story does
take shortcuts. This is easily forgivable because it also takes on
serious subjects and does not feel the need to preach.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Aparajito (1956)
[3.5/4.0]  (dialog in Bengali, English subtitles)
This film, with the English title "The Unvanquished", is the second
installment of Satyajit Ray's "Apu Trilogy".
Although it is can be coherent story when viewed by itself, it
definitely builds upon the context provided in "Pather Panchali".
That narrative concluded with the Roy family leaving the ancestral
village to seek a better existence in Benares, the holy city on the
Ganga (Ganges). This film picks up at that point, and we see that
the Roys' fortunes have improved. Although they live in a shared
house, Hari's (Kanu Bannerjee) regular work as a priest brings in a
steady income and Apu (Pinaki Sengupta as the child, Smaran Ghosal
as the adolescent) has made new friends and he is thriving. Sarbojaya
(Karuna Bannerjee) still worries, but they have found the stability
she had been seeking. However, this all changes when Hari dies of a
sudden illness. With the death of her daughter (which occurred in
the previous film) and her husband, Sarbojaya now only has Apu. She
decides to move them to the countryside, and there Apu is able to
learn priestly duties from his grand-uncle. However, Apu aspires to
go to school, and with determination and their meager savings, he is
able to attend. At school he becomes an outstanding student, and
earns the opportunity for further studies in Calcutta on scholarship.
Going away to school has opened a new world for Apu, but it has also
separated him from Sarbojaya.
Once again, Satyajit Ray has sculpted a masterpiece. It continues the
saga of the trilogy, but it also explores somewhat different themes.
 "Pather Panchali" dealt with the road of life, this film focuses more
narrowly on the dynamics of an individual relationship, namely that of
Sarbojaya and Apu. As a result, the pace of this film is more crisp,
with limited use of interspersed cinematic flourishes which would slow
the narrative. The issues of commitment and dependence are explored.
Sarbojaya displays the strength of her spirit by not being broken from
the hardships that have befallen her. The soberness of the story is
tempered with small nuggets of simple humor. As in the previous film,
this film is backed with the delightful and appropriate music of Ravi
Shankar.
The acting performances are outstanding, although few characters are
given exposure besides Sarbojaya and Apu. Kanu Bannerjee is again
exceptional, as she handles the character's evolution into a world-
weary but resolved and loving mother. Smaran Ghosal does a fantastic
job as the adolescent Apu. The character is naive, and often self-
absorbed, from simple childish immaturity. Although he does not intend
to be uncaring, his determination blinds him to the requirements of
responsibility. This is a multifaceted character and Ghosal is able to
combine all the parts into a credible whole.
As Apu discovers a passion for learning, he immerses himself in that
world, which unwittingly separates him from his mother. Apu proudly
recounts what he has learned to Sarbojaya, and she shows her happiness
in seeing her son doing well as something he loves, a success which
eluded his father. However, in these scenes, like Apu describing the
positions of the sun, earth and moon to Sarbojaya, it is obvious that
this is a foreign world to her. Eventually, his passion takes him to
another city, and essentially away from Sarbojaya. It is wrenching to
see the conflicts involved with Apu's decision to study away in
Calcutta. Apu's intoxication with knowledge is so endearing and his
drive to succeed is so overriding that it is wholely understandable
that he does not see how his departure would affect his mother.
Sarbojaya's desire for Apu to stay with her is also understandable
because she desperately wants to keep her last remaining treasure with
her, not because she wants to restrict Apu in any way. She shows her
tremendous strength of character by not being possessive of Apu.
Eventually fate unrolls the results of the decisions the individuals
make.
Highly recommended. Ray has crafted another masterpiece which captures
the drama of the human condition in a simple story. The story is
engaging and moving. It can be watched on its own, but for full
appreciation, it should be viewed after "Pather Panchali."
--== Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/ ==--
---Share what you know. Learn what you don't.---
